






























Guinness Asset Management Ltd Takes Position in Oasis Petroleum Inc. (OAS) - Chaffey Breeze













































 
















 



  
 
 
























Daily Ratings & News for Oasis Petroleum Inc.

        
	Complete the form below to receive the latest headlines and analysts' recommendationsfor Oasis Petroleum Inc. with our free daily email newsletter:










Follow @chaffeybreeze












Recent Posts

Stock Yards Bank & Trust Co. Has $325,000 Position in Stanley Black & Decker, Inc. (SWK)
Chemical Financial Corporation (CHFC) Now Covered by Piper Jaffray Companies
Mizuho Financial Group, Inc. (MFG) Lifted to “Sell” at BidaskClub
Northern Trust Corporation (NTRS) Upgraded to “Strong-Buy” by BidaskClub
Kinder Morgan, Inc. (KMI) Upgraded at BidaskClub
Check Point Software Technologies Ltd. (NASDAQ:CHKP) Stock Rating Lowered by BidaskClub
Monogram Residential Trust, Inc. (MORE) PT Set at $11.00 by Canaccord Genuity
Progenics Pharmaceuticals (PGNX) Getting Positive Press Coverage, Report Shows
Financial Comparison: Century Communities (CCS) versus Lyon William Homes (WLH)
American States Water Company (NYSE:AWR) Director Sells $28,698.00 in Stock
Reviewing Woori Bank (WF) & First NBC Bank Holding (FNBC)
Reviewing Main Street Capital Corporation (NYSE:MAIN) & On Deck Capital (ONDK)
Somewhat Positive News Coverage Somewhat Unlikely to Impact Swiss Helvetia Fund, Inc. (The) (SWZ) Share Price
Viveve Medical (VIVE) Receives Daily Media Impact Rating of 0.21
Discover Financial Services (NYSE:DFS) CEO Sells $1,875,600.00 in Stock
Positive Press Coverage Very Unlikely to Affect Trustmark Corporation (NASDAQ:TRMK) Stock Price
WageWorks (NYSE:WAGE) Receiving Favorable News Coverage, Report Shows
Guinness Asset Management Ltd Has $3.23 Million Stake in Verifone Systems, Inc. (PAY)
Guinness Asset Management Ltd Takes Position in Oasis Petroleum Inc. (OAS)
Plains Group Holdings, L.P. (PAGP) Given Coverage Optimism Rating of 0.46







Guinness Asset Management Ltd Takes Position in Oasis Petroleum Inc. (OAS)


					Posted by Lucas Kauffman on Jul 28th, 2017 // No Comments




Guinness Asset Management Ltd acquired a new position in shares of  Oasis Petroleum Inc. (NYSE:OAS) during the second quarter, according to its most recent disclosure with the SEC. The institutional investor  acquired 600,000 shares of the energy producer’s stock, valued at approximately $4,830,000. Guinness Asset Management Ltd owned approximately 0.25% of Oasis Petroleum as of its most recent SEC filing. 
Several other hedge funds and other institutional investors also recently made changes to their positions in the stock. DekaBank Deutsche Girozentrale boosted its position in shares of  Oasis Petroleum by 14.8% in the first quarter. DekaBank Deutsche Girozentrale now owns 11,819 shares of the energy producer’s stock worth $164,000 after buying an additional 1,526 shares during the period.  Hudson Bay Capital Management LP purchased a new stake in  Oasis Petroleum during the fourth quarter worth $227,000.  Stephens Inc. AR raised its stake in  Oasis Petroleum by 13.8% in the first quarter. Stephens Inc. AR now owns 16,050 shares of the energy producer’s stock worth $229,000 after buying an additional 1,950 shares in the last quarter.  Advisory Services Network LLC bought a new stake in shares of  Oasis Petroleum during the first quarter valued at approximately $242,000.  Finally, Atria Investments LLC raised its stake in shares of  Oasis Petroleum by 4.3% in the first quarter. Atria Investments LLC now owns 17,075 shares of the energy producer’s stock valued at $243,000 after buying an additional 700 shares during the period. 97.50% of the stock is currently owned by hedge funds and other institutional investors. 


 Get Oasis Petroleum Inc. alerts:



Shares of Oasis Petroleum Inc. (NYSE OAS) opened at 8.01 on Friday. The company’s 50-day moving average is $8.05 and its 200 day moving average is $11.79. Oasis Petroleum Inc. has a 52-week low of $6.56 and a 52-week high of $17.08. The firm’s market cap is $1.90 billion. 





Oasis Petroleum (NYSE:OAS) last announced its quarterly earnings data on Monday, May 8th. The energy producer reported ($0.05) EPS for the quarter, topping the Zacks’ consensus estimate of ($0.07) by $0.02. The company had revenue of $285.10 million during the quarter, compared to the consensus estimate of $252.72 million. Oasis Petroleum had a negative net margin of 18.00% and a negative return on equity of 2.88%. Oasis Petroleum’s quarterly revenue was up 119.3% on a year-over-year basis. During the same quarter in the prior year, the firm earned ($0.18) EPS.  On average, analysts expect that  Oasis Petroleum Inc. will post ($0.15) earnings per share for the current fiscal year. 
TRADEMARK VIOLATION NOTICE: This news story was first  reported by Chaffey Breeze and is the property of of Chaffey Breeze. If you are accessing this news story on another publication, it was copied illegally and reposted in violation of U.S. and international trademark and copyright laws. The legal version of this news story can be read at https://www.chaffeybreeze.com/2017/07/28/600000-shares-in-oasis-petroleum-inc-oas-acquired-by-guinness-asset-management-ltd-updated-updated.html. 
Several brokerages have commented on OAS. Williams Capital  restated a “hold” rating and issued a $15.00 price objective on shares of Oasis Petroleum in a report on Monday, May 15th. Cowen and Company  set a $14.00 price objective on shares of Oasis Petroleum and gave the stock a “buy” rating in a report on Monday, July 10th. Bank of America Corporation lowered shares of Oasis Petroleum from a “buy” rating to a “neutral” rating and lowered their target price for the company from $20.00 to $16.00 in a report on Thursday, May 11th. SunTrust Banks, Inc. upgraded shares of Oasis Petroleum from a “hold” rating to a “buy” rating and lifted their target price for the company from $16.00 to $17.00 in a report on Wednesday, May 3rd. Finally, UBS AG upgraded shares of Oasis Petroleum from a “neutral” rating to a “buy” rating and lowered their target price for the company from $14.00 to $13.00 in a report on Thursday, June 8th. Three research analysts have rated the stock with a sell rating, twelve have assigned  a hold rating, twenty have issued  a buy rating and two have assigned  a strong buy rating to the stock. The company currently has an average rating of “Buy” and an average target price of $14.42.
In other news, Chairman Thomas B. Nusz sold 187,236 shares of the company’s stock in a transaction on Thursday, June 8th. The shares were sold at an average price of $9.50, for a total transaction of $1,778,742.00. Following the transaction, the chairman now directly owns 1,469,546 shares of the company’s stock, valued at approximately $13,960,687. The transaction was disclosed in a filing with the SEC, which is accessible through the SEC website. 1.90% of the stock is currently owned by corporate insiders. 
Oasis Petroleum Company Profile
Oasis Petroleum Inc is an independent exploration and production company. The Company is focused on the acquisition and development of unconventional oil and natural gas resources in the North Dakota and Montana regions of the Williston Basin. Its segments include Exploration and Production, Well Services, and Midstream Services.







Receive News & Ratings for Oasis Petroleum Inc. Daily - Enter your email address below to receive a concise daily summary of the latest news and analysts' ratings for Oasis Petroleum Inc. and related companies with MarketBeat.com's FREE daily email newsletter.








 






















Latest News





Leave a Reply

Click here to cancel reply.




Name  (Required) 



Mail (will not be published)  (Required) 



Website












 

 













































﻿






























Guinness Asset Management Ltd Has $3.23 Million Stake in Verifone Systems, Inc. (PAY) - Chaffey Breeze













































 
















 



  
 
 
























Daily Ratings & News for Verifone Systems Inc.

        
	Complete the form below to receive the latest headlines and analysts' recommendationsfor Verifone Systems Inc. with our free daily email newsletter:










Follow @chaffeybreeze












Recent Posts

Stock Yards Bank & Trust Co. Has $325,000 Position in Stanley Black & Decker, Inc. (SWK)
Chemical Financial Corporation (CHFC) Now Covered by Piper Jaffray Companies
Mizuho Financial Group, Inc. (MFG) Lifted to “Sell” at BidaskClub
Northern Trust Corporation (NTRS) Upgraded to “Strong-Buy” by BidaskClub
Kinder Morgan, Inc. (KMI) Upgraded at BidaskClub
Check Point Software Technologies Ltd. (NASDAQ:CHKP) Stock Rating Lowered by BidaskClub
Monogram Residential Trust, Inc. (MORE) PT Set at $11.00 by Canaccord Genuity
Progenics Pharmaceuticals (PGNX) Getting Positive Press Coverage, Report Shows
Financial Comparison: Century Communities (CCS) versus Lyon William Homes (WLH)
American States Water Company (NYSE:AWR) Director Sells $28,698.00 in Stock
Reviewing Woori Bank (WF) & First NBC Bank Holding (FNBC)
Reviewing Main Street Capital Corporation (NYSE:MAIN) & On Deck Capital (ONDK)
Somewhat Positive News Coverage Somewhat Unlikely to Impact Swiss Helvetia Fund, Inc. (The) (SWZ) Share Price
Viveve Medical (VIVE) Receives Daily Media Impact Rating of 0.21
Discover Financial Services (NYSE:DFS) CEO Sells $1,875,600.00 in Stock
Positive Press Coverage Very Unlikely to Affect Trustmark Corporation (NASDAQ:TRMK) Stock Price
WageWorks (NYSE:WAGE) Receiving Favorable News Coverage, Report Shows
Guinness Asset Management Ltd Has $3.23 Million Stake in Verifone Systems, Inc. (PAY)
Guinness Asset Management Ltd Takes Position in Oasis Petroleum Inc. (OAS)
Plains Group Holdings, L.P. (PAGP) Given Coverage Optimism Rating of 0.46







Guinness Asset Management Ltd Has $3.23 Million Stake in Verifone Systems, Inc. (PAY)


					Posted by Charlotte Bryant on Jul 28th, 2017 // No Comments




Guinness Asset Management Ltd boosted its stake in shares of  Verifone Systems, Inc. (NYSE:PAY) by 21.5% during the second quarter, according to its most recent filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC). The fund owned 178,150 shares of the business services provider’s stock after buying an additional 31,540 shares during the period. Guinness Asset Management Ltd owned 0.16% of Verifone Systems worth $3,225,000 as of its most recent SEC filing. 
Other hedge funds have also recently added to or reduced their stakes in the company. Capital Investment Services of America Inc. raised its stake in  Verifone Systems by 1.7% in the second quarter. Capital Investment Services of America Inc. now owns 336,939 shares of the business services provider’s stock valued at $6,099,000 after buying an additional 5,660 shares in the last quarter.  Causeway Capital Management LLC raised its stake in  Verifone Systems by 11.5% in the first quarter. Causeway Capital Management LLC now owns 7,981,839 shares of the business services provider’s stock valued at $171,223,000 after buying an additional 823,780 shares in the last quarter.  Public Employees Retirement System of Ohio raised its stake in  Verifone Systems by 1.2% in the first quarter. Public Employees Retirement System of Ohio now owns 66,354 shares of the business services provider’s stock valued at $1,243,000 after buying an additional 815 shares in the last quarter.  Point72 Asset Management L.P. purchased a new stake in  Verifone Systems during the first quarter valued at approximately $2,786,000.  Finally, FNY Managed Accounts LLC purchased a new stake in  Verifone Systems during the first quarter valued at approximately $131,000. 


 Get Verifone Systems Inc. alerts:



Verifone Systems, Inc. (NYSE:PAY) opened at 19.85 on Friday. Verifone Systems, Inc. has a 1-year low of $14.94 and a 1-year high of $20.98. The firm’s market capitalization is $2.22 billion. The stock’s 50 day moving average is $18.46 and its 200-day moving average is $18.62. 





Verifone Systems (NYSE:PAY) last issued its quarterly earnings data on Thursday, June 8th. The business services provider reported $0.30 earnings per share for the quarter, meeting analysts’ consensus estimates of $0.30. Verifone Systems had a negative net margin of 7.53% and a positive return on equity of 11.55%. The business had revenue of $474 million for the quarter, compared to analysts’ expectations of $472.80 million. During the same period in the previous year, the business earned $0.47 earnings per share. The company’s revenue was down 9.9% on a year-over-year basis.  Equities research analysts forecast that  Verifone Systems, Inc. will post $1.33 EPS for the current year. 
COPYRIGHT VIOLATION NOTICE: “Guinness Asset Management Ltd Has $3.23 Million Stake in Verifone Systems, Inc. (PAY)” was first  published by Chaffey Breeze and is owned by of Chaffey Breeze. If you are reading this news story on another domain, it was copied illegally and republished in violation of US and international copyright law. The legal version of this news story can be accessed at https://www.chaffeybreeze.com/2017/07/28/verifone-systems-inc-pay-shares-bought-by-guinness-asset-management-ltd-updated-updated.html. 
Several analysts recently commented on the stock. BidaskClub upgraded shares of Verifone Systems from a “hold” rating to a “buy” rating in a research report on Wednesday, July 19th. BMO Capital Markets dropped their target price on shares of Verifone Systems from $21.00 to $20.00 and set a “market perform” rating on the stock in a research report on Friday, June 16th. Imperial Capital dropped their target price on shares of Verifone Systems from $20.00 to $19.00 and set an “in-line” rating on the stock in a research report on Tuesday, June 13th. BTIG Research  reiterated a “neutral” rating on shares of Verifone Systems in a research report on Monday, June 12th. Finally, Barclays PLC  reiterated an “equal weight” rating and issued a $20.00 target price (down previously from $22.00) on shares of Verifone Systems in a research report on Sunday, June 11th. Two analysts have rated the stock with a sell rating, fourteen have given a hold rating and three have given a buy rating to the company’s stock. The company presently has an average rating of “Hold” and an average price target of $18.73.
Verifone Systems Company Profile
VeriFone Systems, Inc offers payments and commerce solutions. The Company is engaged in designing, manufacturing, marketing and supplying a range of payment solutions and complementary services. It provides solutions and services for the retail point-of-sale (POS) that enable various forms of commerce.







Receive News & Ratings for Verifone Systems Inc. Daily - Enter your email address below to receive a concise daily summary of the latest news and analysts' ratings for Verifone Systems Inc. and related companies with MarketBeat.com's FREE daily email newsletter.








 






















Latest News





Leave a Reply

Click here to cancel reply.




Name  (Required) 



Mail (will not be published)  (Required) 



Website












 

 













































﻿




























Guinness Asset Management Ltd Has $13.47 Million Position in Aflac Incorporated (AFL) - Week Herald














































 















 



  
 
  





















Daily Ratings and News for Aflac Incorporated
        	Complete the form below to receive the latest headlines and analysts' recommendationsfor Aflac Incorporated with our free daily email newsletter:



 






Follow @WeekHerald









Recent Posts

Basic Energy Services, Inc. (BAS) Lifted to Buy at Zacks Investment Research
Provident Financial plc’s (PFG) “Hold” Rating Reiterated at Beaufort Securities
Alimera Sciences, Inc. (NASDAQ:ALIM) Given a $5.00 Price Target by HC Wainwright Analysts
MidSouth Bancorp to Post Q3 2017 Earnings of $0.09 Per Share, FIG Partners Forecasts (MSL)
Royal Caribbean Cruises Ltd. (RCL) Expected to Post Q3 2017 Earnings of $3.33 Per Share
Polaris Industries Inc. (NYSE:PII) Shares Sold by Oregon Public Employees Retirement Fund
Oregon Public Employees Retirement Fund Maintains Stake in Acuity Brands Inc (AYI)
Oregon Public Employees Retirement Fund Sells 129,426 Shares of Fifth Third Bancorp (NASDAQ:FITB)
First Bancorp (FBNC) Shares Bought by California Public Employees Retirement System
MaxLinear, Inc (NYSE:MXL) Shares Bought by Credit Suisse AG
Ecolab Inc. (NYSE:ECL) Position Increased by HighTower Advisors LLC
Ecolab Inc. (ECL) Position Held by Fayerweather Charles
Tyler Technologies, Inc. (NYSE:TYL) Stake Boosted by Oregon Public Employees Retirement Fund
Boyd Watterson Asset Management LLC OH Has $702,000 Stake in Zimmer Biomet Holdings, Inc. (ZBH)
Eqis Capital Management Inc. Buys 778 Shares of Wendy’s Company (The) (NASDAQ:WEN)
Hospitality Properties Trust (HPT) Shares Bought by Eqis Capital Management Inc.
Green Plains, Inc. (NASDAQ:GPRE) Stock Rating Reaffirmed by Piper Jaffray Companies
Staffline Group Plc (STAF) Upgraded by Liberum Capital to “Buy”
CoBiz Financial Inc. (COBZ) Receives Hold Rating from Piper Jaffray Companies
Raymond James Financial, Inc. Downgrades The Spectranetics Corporation (NASDAQ:SPNC) to Market Perform



 


Guinness Asset Management Ltd Has $13.47 Million Position in Aflac Incorporated (AFL)

					Posted by Samantha Guadardo on Jul 28th, 2017 // No Comments 


Tweet












Guinness Asset Management Ltd raised its position in shares of  Aflac Incorporated (NYSE:AFL) by 12.5% during the second quarter, according to its most recent Form 13F filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC). The fund owned 173,440 shares of the financial services provider’s stock after buying an additional 19,320 shares during the period. Aflac accounts for  2.9% of Guinness Asset Management Ltd’s holdings, making the stock its 2nd largest position. Guinness Asset Management Ltd’s holdings in Aflac were worth $13,473,000 as of its most recent filing with the SEC. 
Several other hedge funds have also made changes to their positions in the stock. Private Trust Co. NA raised its stake in shares of  Aflac by 0.8% in the first quarter. Private Trust Co. NA now owns 5,051 shares of the financial services provider’s stock worth $365,000 after buying an additional 42 shares during the period.  TNB Financial acquired a new stake in shares of  Aflac during the first quarter worth $3,138,000.  Regentatlantic Capital LLC raised its stake in shares of  Aflac by 16.3% in the first quarter. Regentatlantic Capital LLC now owns 23,685 shares of the financial services provider’s stock worth $1,715,000 after buying an additional 3,320 shares during the period.  Quadrant Capital Group LLC raised its stake in shares of  Aflac by 0.3% in the first quarter. Quadrant Capital Group LLC now owns 2,391 shares of the financial services provider’s stock worth $166,000 after buying an additional 7 shares during the period.  Finally, Gulf International Bank UK Ltd raised its stake in shares of  Aflac by 1.2% in the first quarter. Gulf International Bank UK Ltd now owns 127,539 shares of the financial services provider’s stock worth $9,236,000 after buying an additional 1,500 shares during the period. Institutional investors own  64.34% of the company’s stock. 


 Get Aflac Incorporated alerts:



Aflac Incorporated (AFL) opened at 77.12 on Friday. Aflac Incorporated has a 12-month low of $66.50 and a 12-month high of $79.86. The company has a market cap of $30.60 billion, a PE ratio of 12.54 and a beta of 0.99. The stock’s 50 day moving average price is $77.79 and its 200 day moving average price is $73.72. 




Aflac (NYSE:AFL) last released its earnings results on Thursday, July 27th. The financial services provider reported $1.83 EPS for the quarter, topping the consensus estimate of $1.63 by $0.20. Aflac had a return on equity of 12.82% and a net margin of 11.24%. The business had revenue of $5.43 billion during the quarter, compared to analysts’ expectations of $5.48 billion. During the same quarter last year, the firm posted $1.65 earnings per share. The firm’s revenue was down .2% on a year-over-year basis.  Equities research analysts anticipate that  Aflac Incorporated will post $6.51 EPS for the current year. 
The firm also recently announced a quarterly dividend, which will be paid on Friday, September 1st. Investors of record on Wednesday, August 23rd will be paid a dividend of $0.43 per share. This represents a $1.72 annualized dividend and a yield of 2.23%. Aflac’s dividend payout ratio  is currently 27.92%. 
COPYRIGHT VIOLATION NOTICE: “Guinness Asset Management Ltd Has $13.47 Million Position in Aflac Incorporated (AFL)” was  posted by Week Herald and is owned by of Week Herald. If you are reading this article on another website, it was illegally copied and republished in violation of international trademark and copyright laws. The original version of this article can be read at https://weekherald.com/2017/07/28/guinness-asset-management-ltd-has-13-47-million-position-in-aflac-incorporated-afl.html. 
A number of analysts have recently weighed in on the company. Bank of America Corporation upgraded Aflac from an “underperform” rating to a “neutral” rating and raised their target price for the company from $75.00 to $78.00 in a research note on Tuesday, July 4th. BidaskClub lowered Aflac from a “hold” rating to a “sell” rating in a research report on Wednesday, July 19th. Barclays PLC lifted their price objective on Aflac from $71.00 to $73.00 and gave the stock an “equal weight” rating in a research report on Monday, July 3rd. Royal Bank Of Canada  reiterated a “sell” rating and issued a $66.00 price objective on shares of Aflac in a research report on Wednesday, July 12th. Finally, FBR & Co  reiterated a “market perform” rating and issued a $80.00 price objective (up from $68.00) on shares of Aflac in a research report on Wednesday, July 12th. Three analysts have rated the stock with a sell rating, nine have given a hold rating and three have assigned  a buy rating to the stock. Aflac presently has a consensus rating of “Hold” and an average price target of $75.54.
In other Aflac news, insider Teresa L. White sold 11,314 shares of the stock in a transaction that occurred on Tuesday, June 27th. The stock was sold at an average price of $78.01, for a total value of $882,605.14. Following the transaction, the insider now owns 26,847 shares in the company, valued at $2,094,334.47. The sale was disclosed in a filing with the SEC, which can be accessed through this hyperlink. Also, Director Karole Lloyd purchased 1,000 shares of the business’s stock in a transaction on Monday, June 12th. The stock was purchased at an average price of $77.01 per share, for a total transaction of $77,010.00. Following the acquisition, the director now owns 7,253 shares of the company’s stock, valued at approximately $558,553.53. The disclosure for this purchase can be found here. Insiders have sold 236,703 shares of company stock valued at $18,328,514 in the last ninety days. 3.00% of the stock is currently owned by insiders. 
About Aflac
Aflac Incorporated is a business holding company. The Company is involved in supplemental health and life insurance, which is marketed and administered through its subsidiary, American Family Life Assurance Company of Columbus (Aflac). The Company’s insurance business consists of two segments: Aflac Japan and Aflac U.S.







Receive News & Ratings for Aflac Incorporated Daily - Enter your email address below to receive a concise daily summary of the latest news and analysts' ratings for Aflac Incorporated and related companies with MarketBeat.com's FREE daily email newsletter.



 



 























Latest News




Alimera Sciences, Inc.  Given a $5.00 Price Target by HC Wainwright Analysts





Provident Financial plc’s  “Hold” Rating Reiterated at Beaufort Securities





Basic Energy Services, Inc.  Lifted to Buy at Zacks Investment Research





Royal Caribbean Cruises Ltd.  Expected to Post Q3 2017 Earnings of $3.33 Per Share





MidSouth Bancorp to Post Q3 2017 Earnings of $0.09 Per Share, FIG Partners Forecasts 





Polaris Industries Inc.  Shares Sold by Oregon Public Employees Retirement Fund






Leave a Reply

Click here to cancel reply.




Name  (Required) 



Mail (will not be published)  (Required) 



Website








 


 

 








































Global Energy Fund - Guinness Funds















































































Terms & Conditions of this website
This website is issued in the UK by Guinness Asset Management Ltd, authorised and regulated by the Financial Conduct Authority (FCA registered company number 223077).
Guinness Asset Management provides investment products for professional and private investors, which include:

A range of long-only open-ended funds (sub-funds within an OEIC that is incorporated in Ireland and authorised and supervised by the Central Bank of Ireland, which operates under EU legislation). The Funds are approved by the Financial Conduct Authority for sale in the UK.
A discretionary-managed Enterprise Investment Scheme (EIS Service) investing in EIS-qualifying companies. The Service comprises a range of investment themes which can be accessed by investors via a sequence of dated “offerings”.

While considerable care has been taken to ensure that the information contained within this website is accurate and up to date, no warranty is given as to its accuracy or completeness, and no liability is accepted for any errors or omissions. All products referred to on this website are subject to change without notice, and we do not undertake to advise you of any changes to our views. This website should not be regarded as an invitation to buy or sell.
This Website
Please read the information on this page. It contains the legal and regulatory restrictions which apply to the use of this website and any investment in our products referred to in this website.
The information in this website has been issued and approved by Guinness Asset Management Ltd and does not in any way constitute investment, tax, legal, or other advice. If you are in any doubt about any of the information on this website, please consult your investment or other professional adviser.
Use of this website indicates your acceptance of the Terms and Conditions of this website.
This website and these Terms and Conditions may be altered and amended at any time without prior notice. Therefore, your continued use of this website indicates your acceptance of and acknowledgement of these Terms and Conditions as amended.
These Terms and Conditions were last revised in December 2013.
The information contained within this website does not constitute an offer of or an invitation to apply for securities:

In any jurisdiction where such offer or invitation is unlawful or
In which the person making such offer is not qualified to do so or
To whom it is unlawful to make such offer or solicitation.

Disclaimer and Limitation of Liability
The information contained in this site has been compiled with considerable care to ensure its accuracy at the date of publication. But no representation or warranty, express or implied, is made to its accuracy or completeness. Any research or analysis contained in this website has been procured by Guinness Asset Management Limited for its own use. It is provided to you only incidentally, and any opinions expressed are subject to change without notice.
We make no representations, warranties or undertakings about the information contained within the website. In addition, we make no such representations, warranties or undertaking about any website to which ours is linked and therefore you leave our website at your own risk.
You should note that there may be occasions during which our website becomes unavailable, through no fault of our own. There may indeed be occasions where we take our website offline in order to enhance and update it.
Due to the nature of the internet itself, we make no representations, warranties or undertakings as to the accuracy of the content of our website or as to whether any information you download is virus or error free.
We cannot accept any liability for any damages whatsoever arising to you as a result of your use of our website.
The information has been issued and approved by Guinness Asset Management Ltd and does not in any way constitute investment, tax, legal or other advice. If you are in any doubt about any of the information on this website, please consult your investment or other professional adviser.
Guinness Asset Management Funds PLC
An umbrella-type OEIC containing the Guinness range of long-only, open ended equity funds
Guinness Asset Management Funds PLC (the “Company”) is an umbrella-type open-ended investment company (OEIC), incorporated in Ireland and authorised and supervised by the Central Bank of Ireland, which operates under EU legislation. The Company’s sub-funds comprise the Guinness range of long-only, open ended equity funds (the “Funds”) as follows:

Guinness Alternative Energy Fund
Guinness China & Hong Kong Fund
Guinness Global Energy Fund
Guinness Global Equity Income Fund
Guinness Global Money Managers Fund

The Funds are approved by the Financial Conduct Authority for sale in the UK. The Company and the Funds have been recognised in the UK by the FCA pursuant to section 264 of the Financial Services and Markets Act 2000. Guinness Asset Management Ltd is authorised and regulated by the Financial Conduct Authority (FCA registered company number 223077).
The Funds are not offered for sale to Retail Clients in countries where the Funds are not registered for sale, or in any country or jurisdiction in which an offer is not permitted under applicable law. THESE INVESTMENTS ARE NOT FOR SALE TO U.S. PERSONS.
The Funds’ full documentation contains more complete and detailed information of risk, fees, charges and expenses that are to be borne by an investor. The documentation should be read carefully before investing. The full documentation needed to make an investment, including the Prospectus, the KIID and the Application Form are available, free of charge, from:



 


The Manager
Capita Financial Managers (Ireland) Limited
2 Grand Canal Square, Grand Canal Harbour, Dublin 2, Ireland



The Promoter and
Investment Manager
 Guinness Asset Management Ltd
14 Queen Anne’s Gate, London SW1H 9AA



Documentation is also available from this website, guinnessfunds.com. The content and documents on this website should not be distributed to Retail Clients who are resident in countries where the Funds are not registered for sale or in any other circumstances where their distribution is not authorised or is unlawful.
The prospectus for Switzerland, the KIID for Switzerland, the articles of association, the annual and semi-annual reports, as well as the list of the buying and selling transactions can be obtained free of charge from the representative in Switzerland:
Carnegie Fund Services S.A.
11, rue du Général-Dufour, 1204 Geneva, Switzerland
Tel. +41 22 705 11 77, Fax: + 41 22 705 11 79, www.carnegie-fund-services.ch
The paying agent is Banque Cantonale de Genève, 17 Quai de l’Ile, 1204 Geneva, Switzerland.
Fund risk factors
All the Guinness Funds are open ended, long-only equity funds. Investors should be willing and able to assume the risks of equity investing. Investment in the Funds carries with it a degree of risk and investors should read the risk factors section in the prospectus before investing. The value of the Funds’ portfolios changes daily in accordance with the movement of underlying capital markets and the specific share price movements of the companies in whose shares each Fund invests.
Past performance is not a guide to future performance.
Performance risks
We identify the following performance risks in our Funds:



 

Market risk
The value of investments and the income from them may go down as well as up and are not guaranteed. An investor may not get back the amount originally invested. The value of an investment can be affected by changes in general market conditions, other political, social and economic developments, as well as specific matters relating to the companies in whose securities each Fund invests.


Currency risk
 Changes in the rates of exchange may cause the value of investments to go up or down.
While the Funds have share classes priced in various currencies, the base currency of all the Funds is US Dollars, and the Fund valuations for all share classes are initially calculated each dealing day in US Dollars. Non-US Dollar share classes are then converted into their respective currencies from the US Dollar valuation.
The Funds invest internationally and hold all investments in local currency. Guinness Asset Management does not conduct any hedging of currency exposure on the Funds’ capital value or income. The Funds aim to be fully invested most of the time, but any cash balances are normally held in US dollars. This means that the exposure of the Funds to any one currency is mainly limited to the value of its holdings in stocks priced in that currency. Therefore, as well as the impact of share price movements in the securities each Fund holds, the capital value of an investment in a Fund will be affected by changes in exchange rates between the stocks’ local currency, the Fund’s base currency (USD) and the currency of the Fund share class you own.


Emerging market risk
The risk inherent in a Fund is higher when it is invested in markets which may be considered ’emerging’. These Funds are only suitable for those investors who are prepared to accept the above average volatility inherent in emerging market investment.




There are other risks of investing in our funds, such as credit and counterparty risks, which are detailed in the Prospectus.
Shareholders in Guinness Global Equity Income Fund and Guinness Global Money Managers Fund should note that all or part of the fees and expenses can be charged to the capital of the Funds. Charging fees and expenses to capital has the effect of lowering the capital value of your investment.
Fund specific risks
In addition some funds carry their own specific risks:






Sector risk
Some funds invest only in companies involved in a single industry or a single sector of the market. These funds are very susceptible to the performance of that one industry or sector, and can be volatile. Examples in the Guinness fund range include:

Guinness Alternative Energy Fund
Guinness Global Energy Fund
Guinness Global Money Managers Fund




Geographic risk
Some funds invest only in stocks listed in or exposed to one single country or region. These funds are very susceptible to the performance of that one country or region, and can be volatile. Examples in the Guinness fund range include:

Guinness China & Hong Kong Fund





For more detail on the risks relating to specific products, please refer to the relevant documentation for that product.
Guinness EIS Service
An Enterprise Investment Scheme (EIS) is a government initiative to encourage investment in smaller, higher-risk companies by offering a range of tax reliefs to investors. EIS-qualifying companies can be unlisted smaller companies (companies whose shares are not quoted on any recognised stock exchange), or companies listed on the Alternative Investment Market (AIM).
The Guinness EIS Service is a discretionary managed service investing in EIS qualifying companies and managed by Guinness Asset Management Ltd, the Investment Manager. The Service comprises a range of investment themes which can be accessed by investors via a sequence of dated “offerings”. Each offering has a finite subscription period, with an opening and closing date for subscriptions. To qualify for the full range of tax benefits of an EIS investment, investors should be prepared to hold their investment for a minimum of three years. Each offering has its own Information Memorandum detailing the terms and conditions, specific risks and tax implications of investment.
The range of investment themes in the Guinness EIS Service include AIM-listed companies and Sustainable Energy companies.
An investment in the Guinness EIS Service is subject to a number of risks, both general and specific to each offering within the Service. Before making any decision to invest, prospective investors need to understand that investing in EIS-qualifying companies can be highly speculative and carries high risk. The Information Memorandum for each offering contains details of the risks involved. Investors should consider carefully whether a subscription is suitable for them in the light of the information in the Information Memorandum and their personal circumstances. Before investing, investors are strongly recommended to consult an authorised financial adviser. We recommend you seek appropriate independent advice before investing.
Past performance of the Investment Manager is no guarantee of future performance. The value of an investment in any investee company may go down as well as up and investors may not get back the full amount invested. The Investment Manager will rely on achieving an exit for the investments made in each offering in order to generate a capital gain for investors. There is no guarantee that exits will be available at the prices anticipated by the Investment Manager.
General EIS investment risks
1. Concentration risk
The Investment Manager may be unable to make sufficient investments in suitable investee companies. If sufficient investments are not made, the returns achieved by the Service could be materially impacted.
The Investment Manager intends to invest across a portfolio of investee companies to diversify exposure to any one company. However, there is a risk that the investments are concentrated or there is a weighting towards one or more sectors. In these circumstances returns to investors may be adversely affected by the underperformance of a particular company or sector.
2. Size and liquidity risk
The Guinness EIS Service invests in companies that are relatively small. Smaller investee companies can be vulnerable to government actions and changes in statute. In particular, there may be changes to the EIS legislation which may affect investors’ tax positions.
Investee companies may be reliant on the skills or knowledge of a small number of individuals, and should a key individual leave performance may be adversely affected.
Some companies’ shares in which the Investment Manager invests will be listed on AIM, other companies will be unlisted.
Listed shares
Although some companies’ shares in which the Guinness EIS Service can invest are listed on AIM, not all shares are readily realisable at all times.
Investment in shares traded on AIM involves a higher degree of risk, and such shares may be less liquid, than shares in companies which are listed on the main market of the London Stock Exchange. The rules governing AIM companies are less demanding than those of companies listed on the main market of the London Stock Exchange.
The market price of AIM-listed shares may not necessarily reflect their underlying value.
The share price of AIM-listed companies can be highly volatile and shareholdings can be illiquid. The price at which AIM-listed shares are quoted and the price at which such shares may realise will be influenced by a large number of factors, some specific to the relevant investee company and its operations, and others which may affect AIM-listed companies generally, such as legislative changes, and general economic, political, regulatory or social conditions.
Some AIM-listed companies are majority owned by connected parties who may be in a position to exert influence on the relevant investee company and their interests may differ from other shareholders.
Unlisted shares
Some offerings in the Guinness EIS Service can invest in companies which are not expected to have a listing or quotation. Therefore, there may not be a recognised or active market for the shares of investee companies and it may be difficult to sell or realise the investment or obtain reliable information about their value. Investors should not consider investing money in an offering which can hold shares in unlisted companies if their investment may be required during the life of the offering, which is normally at least three years.
Investors should not consider subscribing unless they can afford a total loss of their subscription.
Minority holdings in unquoted investments may be difficult to protect and difficult to realise. The timing of realisations of investments by the Service cannot therefore be predicted.
3. Tax risks
The tax reliefs referred to in the Information Memorandum for each offering in the Guinness EIS Service are those currently applicable. However, investors should be aware that tax reliefs can change. Their applicability and value will depend upon the individual circumstances of a given investor, and investors should seek their own independent professional advice on their particular tax situation and the application of such tax reliefs prior to making a subscription in the Service.
It is the intention of the Investment Manager to invest in companies which qualify under the EIS legislation, but there is no guarantee that EIS status can be maintained throughout the life of the Investment. Both investee companies and investors need to comply with the requirements of the EIS legislation in order to maintain EIS Income Tax Relief, CGT free disposal and CGT Deferral Relief, and non-compliance may result in the loss or partial claw-back of EIS Income Tax Relief and CGT Deferral Relief, and potential interest penalties. Subscription funds will not be returned in these instances; investments will be exited as deemed appropriate by the Investment Manager.
Shares in companies which qualify under the EIS legislation will normally qualify for Business Property Relief for Inheritance Tax purposes. In order to secure this relief investors must retain their shareholding in an investee company for a minimum of two years. The Investment Manager intends to invest in companies which qualify for EIS Relief, CGT Deferral Relief and Business Property Relief, although there is a possibility that investments will not qualify for one or more of these.
To qualify for the full range of tax benefits of an EIS investment, it is the intention of the Investment Manager that investments in qualifying companies will be held for three years. However, the Investment Manager reserves the right to realise individual investments before three years if it believes it is in the best interests of investors.
Specific EIS risks
Additional risks and uncertainties apply to each offering in the Service and the companies in which it invests. These specific risks may have an adverse effect on the business of the investee companies. Investors should consider carefully whether a subscription to the Service is suitable for them in the light of the information in the relevant Information Memorandum, and their personal circumstances.
Data Protection Notice
Any information with which you provide us will be used by Guinness Asset Management Limited and its subsidiaries. We may collect personal information from you during your use of our website.
In order to advise you of our products and services, we may collect personal data from you and we may process that data. You have the right to get a copy of the information we hold about you by sending a written request to Guinness Asset Management Ltd; you may be required to supply a valid means of identification as a security precaution to assist us in preventing the unauthorised disclosure of your personal information. You are also entitled to have Guinness Asset Management modify or delete any information that you believe is incorrect or out of date.
Guinness Asset Management Ltd is registered under the Data Protection Act 1998 and complies with the Act in all our dealing with your personal data.
Copyright
This website and the information contained within it is protected by copyright. Reproduction of all or any part of this website, or any information contained within it, is prohibited unless this is required for personal use
Cookies Policy
Below is our policy for use of cookies on this website.
Cookies Introduction
This website uses cookies (as almost all websites do) to help provide you with the best experience we can. Cookies are small text files that are placed on your computer or mobile when you browse websites.
Our cookies help:

make our website work as you’d expect;
remember your settings during and between visits;
improve the security/speed of the site;

We do not use cookies to:

collect any personal identifiable information (without your express permission);
collect any sensitive information (without your express permission);
pass personally identifiable data to third parties;
pay sales commissions.

You can learn more about all the cookies we use below.
Allowing us to use cookies
Users are notified of the use of cookies when they enter our site, along with instructions on how to disable cookies in their web browser. If the settings on your software that you are using to view this website (your browser) are adjusted to accept cookies, we take this, and your continued use of our website, to mean that this is acceptable to you.
Turning cookies off
Most modern browsers allow you to control your cookie settings. You can disable them completely by editing your browser settings. However, in doing this you may be limiting the functionality that is displayed on our website and also a large population of websites on the Internet that use cookies to serve their content.
To learn how to disable cookies on browsers please click here.
Our use of cookies
Our website stores an anonymous cookie for a period of 30 days to remember that a user, when revisiting the site, has accepted these Terms and Conditions, including notice of our use of cookies.
We use traffic log cookies to identify which pages are being used. This helps us analyse data about web page traffic and improve our website in order to tailor it to customer needs. We only use this information for statistical analysis purposes; the data is then removed from the system.
Website function cookies

Our own cookies
We use cookies to help make our website work by tracking anonymous visits to the website for statistical purposes.

Anonymous visitor statistics cookies
We use cookies to compile anonymous visitor statistics such as how many people have visited our website, what type of technology they are using (e.g Mac or Windows, which help to identify when our site isn’t working as it should for particular technologies), how long they spend on the site, what page they look at etc. This helps us to continuously improve our website.


We also use analytic programmes that tell us, for example, and on an anonymous basis, how people reached this site (e.g. from a search engine). 
To learn how to disable Google Analytics, click here.
Google Maps
We use Google Maps to give users the opportunity of visiting our business location. Google Maps only uses cookies to enable you to use the functionality of their map software. No personal information is stored on our website through the use of Google Maps.
If you are concerned about cookies tracking your movements on the Internet then you may be concerned about spyware. Spyware is the name given to a particular band of cookies that track personal information about you. There are many anti-spyware programmes that you can use to prevent this from happening. To learn more about anti-spyware software, click here.
Guinness Asset Management
Guinness Asset Management Ltd is authorised and regulated by the Financial Conduct Authority.
Registered address: 14 Queen Anne’s Gate, London SW1H 9AA
Company registration: 4647882
FCA company registration number: 223077
If you would like further information on the Financial Conduct Authority, our regulator, you can access their website here: www.fca.org.uk
Telephone calls
For your protection, telephone calls to Guinness Asset Management may be recorded.


This site uses cookies. By continuing to the site you agree to the use of cookies. You can disable cookies in your browser. To find out more click here.
By continuing to this website you accept the Terms & Conditions of the use of this site. 







Home
About us
News & Views
Literature
Funds

Global Equity Income Fund
European Equity Income Fund
Asian Equity Income Fund
Global Innovators Fund
Global Energy Fund
Alternative Energy Fund
Global Money Managers Fund
Sustainable Infrastructure EIS – Introduction
Guinness AIM EIS – Introduction


Careers
Events
 









 



















 









 



  



 


 



HomeAbout usNews & ViewsLiteratureFunds Global Equity Income Fund European Equity Income Fund Asian Equity Income Fund Global Innovators Fund Global Energy Fund Alternative Energy Fund Global Money Managers Fund Sustainable Infrastructure EIS – Introduction Guinness AIM EIS – IntroductionCareersEvents




  

 


 




 





 


Equity Income funds
Global Equity Income Fund
European Equity Income Fund
Asian Equity Income Fund

Global Growth funds
Global Innovators Fund

Specialist funds
Global Energy Fund
Alternative Energy Fund
Global Money Managers Fund

EIS & IHT Service
Guinness EIS
Guinness AIM EIS
Sustainable Infrastructure IHT

How to invest
Fund Prices
Fund Prospectus
Fund Report & Accounts
Contact Us
Register for Updates 
Follow Us on Twitter 
Follow Us on LinkedIn 

 

  



 





Guinness Global Energy Fund

Overview
Investment case
Performance
Literature
Fund facts

 




 







The Guinness Global Energy Fund gives investors exposure to global energy markets. The Fund is managed for capital growth and invests in companies in the oil, natural gas, coal, alternative energy, nuclear and utilities sectors.
We believe that over the next twenty years the combined effects of population growth, developing world industrialisation and diminishing fossil fuel supplies will force energy prices higher. The Fund aims to benefit from this environment by investing in companies with energy resources, and in their service providers and distributors.


The Guinness energy team has been managing energy portfolios since 1998. They invest long-only and run a portfolio that comprises 30 equally weighted positions. Normally 90% of the Fund is invested in companies with a market capitalisation of over $1 billion.
 White paper: How to invest in energy Request your copy 



Awards


  
 BEST FUND OVER 3 YEARSEquity Sector Natural Resources Guinness Global Energy Fund


  
BEST COMMODITY FUNDGuinness Global Energy Fund


 


Managers






Tim Guinness


 Chief Investment Officer, and founder of Guinness Asset Management in 2003.



 








Will Riley


 An energy specialist at Guinness Asset Management since 2007.Managing Guinness Global Money Managers Fund since launch in 2010.



 








Jonathan Waghorn


 Specialising in energy research and investment since 2000. 



 




Video

 Introducing Guinness Global Energy Fund

Quick links

Factsheet


Update | Jul '17
Reviewing the first half and considering the potential for the rest of 2017


Webcast | Jul '17
Performance and Portfolio review (Q3, 2017)


Insight | Apr '17
Energy equities as a good inflation hedge 


Press | Jul '17 | Interactive Investor
Seven fund alternatives to equities and bonds







 In brief: why invest in energy?
 Energy investment case
 Fund managers
 Investment process
 Portfolio construction & risk controls

In brief: why invest in energy?
Energy demandPopulation growth and rising global wealth are driving relentless growth in the consumption of energy.Energy supplyDespite improvements in alternative energy supplies, fossil fuels will remain the predominant world energy source for decades to come. However, the era of easily accessible, low-cost oil is over.Energy company profitsRising demand and depletion of low-cost energy supplies will push energy prices higher. This will create a favourable environment for companies with resource reserves, as well as their service providers and distributors.Energy & inflationEnergy prices are a significant driver of inflation, which makes energy companies a useful long-term inflation hedge. If we see dollar inflation of 30-50% over the next decade (that’s just 2.7-4.3% per year), it will be surprising if oil and gas prices do not rise by a comparable percentage.
 White paper: How to invest in energy Request your copy 
Energy investment case
“More motor vehicles will be sold over the next 20 years than have been sold in the entire history of the automobile industry.”
Surging demand for energy from developing countries
The world's population is growing at a rate of 1% per year, and is projected by the UN to rise by a further 20% (1.5 billion people) by 2030. Over 90% of this growth will come from developing countries. The implications for energy consumption are profound.
More motor vehicles will be sold over the next 20 years than have been sold throughout the entire history of the automobile industry. The surge of demand for electricity, cars and consumer goods in emerging markets will have a significant impact on the world's energy balance. China’s demand for oil per capita has not yet reached that of the OECD in 1950. There are 20 years of unrelenting oil demand growth to come as China’s vehicle fleet moves from 100 million now to 400 million by 2030, with numerous other countries following behind.
The rise in global energy demand is projected to continue long into the future. It is likely that the majority of this demand will be met by mainstream energy sources like oil, natural gas and coal.
The world’s oil consumption currently stands at around 94 million barrels per day, and continues to reach new highs each year. Even in the global recession of 2008/09, demand for oil from emerging markets continued to grow. We think that, over the next 10 years, global oil demand growth of 10-15 million barrels per day is highly plausible.
Supply is struggling to keep pace
High oil and natural gas prices between 2006 and 2014 incentivised energy companies to invest in new technologies, resulting in strong natural gas and oil production from unconventional shale resources in North America. This growth caused a change of production strategy from OPEC at the end of 2014, and this has led to sharply lower oil prices as OPEC grows production and defends market share while North American production starts to slow.  We believe that OPEC is now producing near maximum capacity, while non-OPEC production will decline in the future as a result of lower investment levels. The industry still faces a big challenge in delivering reasonable oil supply growth at reasonable prices.
Favourable environment for investing in energy
The combination of growing demand and inadequate future supply signals that oil and other energy prices will move up over time. This would create a very favourable environment for companies with energy resources and for their service providers and distributors.
The Guinness Global Energy Fund seeks to capitalise on this energy price environment. We keep coming back to one key proposition: easily extractable oil and gas assets remain scarce, and it seems reasonable to believe that, as they get scarcer, they will trade at higher prices than we have yet seen. We believe shareholders in energy companies that are part of that world will be duly rewarded.
Fund managers


Tim Guinness

Tim Guinness is the founder and Chief Investment Officer of Guinness Asset Management and Guinness Atkinson Asset Management, our sister US business. He has over 35 years’ investment experience. 
He founded Guinness Flight Global Asset Management Ltd in 1987 and was CEO (or joint CEO) from 1987 to 1999 and a portfolio manager of the Global Equity Fund. After Investec acquired Guinness Flight in 1998, he was Chairman of the company during the transition into Investec, as well as lead manager of the Investec Global Energy Fund.
In 2003 he left Investec to set up Guinness Asset Management, which was appointed the outsource manager of Investec Global Energy Fund. 
Tim graduated from Cambridge University with a degree in engineering. He then completed a Master’s Degree in Management Science at the Sloan School M.I.T. in the United States.
Tim is co-manager of the Guinness Global Energy Fund and the Guinness Global Money Managers Fund.  
 


Will Riley

Will joined Guinness Asset Management in May 2007, and is co-manager of Guinness Global Energy Fund and the Guinness Global Money Managers Fund.
Prior to joining Guinness, Will was employed by PricewaterhouseCoopers for six years, first in the London Middle Market Assurance Team, then as a valuation specialist in the Valuation & Strategy division. Will qualified as a Chartered Accountant in 2003 and graduated from the University of Cambridge with a Master’s Degree in Geography.
 


Jonathan Waghorn

Jonathan joined Guinness Asset Management in September 2013 and is co-manager of Guinness Global Energy Fund. 
Jonathan has 17 years’ experience in the energy sector. He was a Shell drilling engineer in the Dutch North Sea and worked as an energy consultant with Wood Mackenzie before becoming co-head of Goldman Sachs energy equity research in 2000.  He joined Investec as co-manager on the Investec Global Energy Fund in 2008 where he helped grow the energy franchise at Investec to a peak of nearly $3.5bn in 2011. Jonathan then joined Mercuria in 2012 to build an equities and fund management business based around the provision of external funds before joining Guinness Asset Management in 2013.
 

Investment process
Our stock selection is driven 50% by our top-down (macro) views and 50% by bottom-up stock analysis. The top-down views shape our energy sub-sector allocation, whilst bottom-up analysis is designed to identify the best stocks to populate our sub-sector allocation. The investment team applies a mixture of value and growth investing, with a bias towards value.



Key energy equity sub-sectors


Integrateds
Exploration & production


Oil Services
Canadian oil sands


Refiners
Emerging market energy


Coal producers
Nuclear



Top-down views
Rigorous independent analysis of the fundamental drivers of energy markets (e.g. oil supply and demand; OPEC behaviour; natural gas supply and demand; global LNG market; thermal and met coal markets). This allows us to forecast energy commodity prices and creates our top-down view, which in turn informs our energy sub-sector allocation.



Guinness stock screening


Quality
Return on investment


Valuation
HOLT relative valuation


Earnings
Analysts’ earnings forecast revisions


Momentum
Price movements versus peers



Bottom-up stock screening
The team operates a disciplined stock screening process. We review a universe of around 370 energy stocks each week to identify companies which look attractive on valuation, return on investment, earnings sentiment, and price momentum. Other screens specific to certain sub-sectors are also employed to generate ideas.
Stock due diligence
Stock ideas are taken from our screens and due diligence is performed to establish whether we have conviction to include the stock in our portfolio. The due diligence centres around detailed financial modelling.
Portfolio construction
Equally-weighted portfolio
The portfolio comprises 30 equally-weighted positions. Most of the positions comprise a single stock but a few are split across more than one stock, giving the portfolio 40-45 stocks in total. Our equally-weighted portfolio construction is designed create the best balance between maintaining fund concentration and managing stock-specific risk. It also imposes a structural sell discipline: an existing position must be sold to purchase a new holding.
Sector weights
The Fund does not follow any benchmark in its sub-sector weights. In particular, there are no underweight restrictions; the “super-major” oil and gas sector weighting may be zero.
Portfolio risk controls
Stock specific risk
Stock specific risk in the energy sector tends to be higher than the broader market. By constructing the Fund of 30 equally-weighted positions, we avoid significant exposure to any one individual stock.
Emerging market exposure
Normal practice is that emerging market exposure (considered by listing and by underlying asset exposure) is limited to 20% of the Fund.
Liquidity
The portfolio is liquid, with 90% of the Fund normally invested in companies with a market capitalisation over US $1 billion.
Currency
The Fund is not hedged from a currency perspective. However, because the underlying investments have an exposure to energy commodity prices, this tends to act as a natural hedge against currency movement.









Fund
Global Energy Fund
Date (period end)
30.06.2017


Index
MSCI World Energy Index
Fund Launch
31.3.2008


Basis
Total return, in USD





Please remember that past performance is not a guide to future performance. The value of an investment and the income from it can fall as well as rise as a result of market and currency movement, and you may not get back the amount originally invested.




Cumulative performance (USD, %)
				


E class 
(OCF: 1.24%)
Year-to-date
1 
year
3 
years
5 
years
Team history 
(31.12.98) (1)


Fund
-15.66
-6.87
-47.33
-14.02
446.97


Index
-9.28
-0.84
-29.73
2.00
231.67







Annualised performance (USD, %)


E class 
(OCF: 1.24%)
1 
year
3 
years
5 
years
10 
years (1)
Team history 
(31.12.98) (1)


Fund
-6.87
-19.22
-2.97
-2.59
9.61


Index
-0.84
-11.09
0.40
-0.24
6.69







Calendar year performance (USD, %)
				


E class 
(OCF: 1.24%)
2012
2013
2014
2015
2016


Fund
24.38
-19.05
-27.57
27.87
-15.66


Index
18.93
-10.95
-22.10
27.63
-9.28







Discrete year performance to date (USD, %)
				


E class (OCF: 1.24%)
12 months ending:
Jun-13
Jun-14
Jun-15
Jun-16
Jun-17


Fund
12.00
45.74
-35.04
-12.93
-6.87


Index
10.36
31.53
-25.74
-4.57
-0.84



Source: Bloomberg & Guinness Asset Management Ltd, bid to bid basis, total return.
Notes
(1) Simulated (composite) past performance prior to 31.3.08, the launch date of this Fund. The Guinness Global Energy investment team has been running global energy funds in accordance with the same methodology continuously since November 1998. These returns are calculated using a composite of the Investec GSF Global Energy Fund class A from 31 December 1998 to 29 February 2008 (managed by the Guinness team until this date); the Guinness Atkinson Global Energy Fund (sister US mutual fund) from March 1 2008 to March 31 2008 (launch date of this Fund) and the Guinness Global Energy Fund class B since launch. Calculations by Guinness Asset Management Limited. All returns for periods starting after 02.09.08 are based on the Fund's E Class.

 White paper: How to invest in energy Request your copy 

Guinness Global Energy Report

Jul '17
Reviewing the first half and considering the potential for the rest of 2017


Jun '17
June update


May '17
Oil price weakens: why?


Apr '17
April update


Mar '17
March update


Feb '17
February update


Jan '17
2017 Outlook for energy


Dec '16
Implications of the OPEC production cut


Nov '16
OPEC & Trump


Sep '16
Efficiency gains coming into play


 Sign up for our monthly Global Energy Report by email   Archive


Webcasts

Jul '17
Performance and Portfolio review (Q3, 2017)
 Archive

Insights

Apr '17
Energy equities as a good inflation hedge
The Guinness Global Energy team explains the case for energy equities as an inflation hedge


Feb '17
It’s about return on capital as much as it is about the oil priceThe Guinness Global Energy Team take a closer look at ROCE


Dec '16
OPEC announces first production cut in 8 yearsThe Guinness Global Energy Team assess OPEC’s recent agreement to cut production levels


Sep '16
Has OPEC just blinked?The Guinness Global Energy Team assess OPEC’s recent agreement to cut production levels


Dec '15
OPEC maintains market share strategy
The Guinness Global Energy Team assess the impact of OPEC’s decision to maintain their market share strategy at their December 2015 meeting.


Nov '15
Outlook for US oil production
The Guinness Global Energy Team provide a detailed update on how US oil production is being affected by lower oil prices and a few thoughts on how it could look at the end of 2015 and into 2016.


Oct '15
If it’s darkest before dawn, what time is it now?
Jonathan Waghorn puts a brutal summer for energy markets in its historical context, and analyses the future of the supply-demand mix.


Oct '15
 VIDEO: Tim Guinness on the battered oil price
Tim Guinness reveals what is happening to the battered oil price, how long it will remain low and whether income investors should sell BP and Shell.


Jan '15
2015 Outlook for Energy
The Guinness Global Energy team give their thoughts on the prospects for the energy sector amid falling oil prices.


Dec '14
OPEC’s Thanksgiving
The Guinness Global Energy team give their assessment of OPEC’s decision not to cut production, and what it means for oil prices and energy equities.

 Archive


Press

Interactive Investor | Jul '17
Seven fund alternatives to equities and bonds
Dzmitry Lipski looks at the options available to investors as an alternative to equities and bonds


FE Trustnet | Mar '16
 Prospects for oil
Oil has rallied recently and Jonathan Waghorn and Will Riley, managers of the Guinness Global Energy fund, argue it could recover further from here.


Investment Week | Feb '16
Iranian oil and oil price volatility
Jonathan Waghorn, Guinness Global Energy co-manager, warns that Iran’s entry to the oil market could delay the rebalancing of global oversupply, but rebalancing is coming nonetheless.


Investment Week | Oct '15
 When will oil prices rebound?
In a Q&A with Investment Week, Guinness Global Energy co-manager Jonathan Waghorn explains why a supply/demand convergence is on the horizon.


Morningstar | Jan '15
Fund in focus: “An outstanding team”
“A highly experienced management team and prudent portfolio construction continue to make the Guinness Global Energy fund a strong choice for investors seeking exposure to the energy sector.”


Citywire | Dec '14
 Stock picks amid oil price slump
Jonathan Waghorn picks out the stocks he is backing as oil prices fall to their lowest level in five years.


Investment Week | Sep '14
How ‘cheap and struggling’ oil majors can bounce back
Investment Week question manager Will Riley on the rally in energy equities.


Investment Week | Aug '14
Investment Week – What’s behind the turnaround in energy
Jonathan Waghorn says energy equities have underperformed for three years, and now could be an interesting entry point.


TRUSTNET | Jun '14
Funds to access the value in Energy
Trustnet’s John MacMahon identifies Guinness Global Energy as a top fund for accessing the value in Energy equities.


CNBC | Jun '14
 Video: Is crude oil heading to $150?
Jonathan Waghorn discusses crude oil markets and portfolio holdings on CNBC.


The Daily Telegraph | Dec '13
  VIDEO: “Oil stocks will outperform the FTSE 100”
Talking with The Daily Telegraph, Tim Guinness says stock prices are lagging the oil spot price – but they will catch up.


Investment Compass | Jun '13
 VIDEO: Is now the time for Energy?
Tim Guinness talks with Investment Compass and considers why now might be a good time to consider investing in energy stocks.


Fund Strategy | Apr '13
 Energy offers solid inflation hedge
Will Riley in Fund Strategy says the future for energy equities looks exciting as many are cheap and overlooked

 Archive


Key documents

Factsheet
English | French
German | Italian


 KIIDs


Report & Accounts


Prospectus
Global Energy Fund Supplement
UK Country Supplement


Application form


Redemption form


Key documents for overseas investors on fundinfo.com
 For German investors
 For Swiss investors






Fact sheets


For information on the Fund’s current investments, please see the latest fact sheet:
English
French
German
Italian






Key facts


Launch date
31/03/2008


Fund managers
(start date)
Tim Guinness (31/03/2008) 
Will Riley (01/01/2010) Jonathan Waghorn (09/09/2013)


Benchmark
MSCI World Energy Index


IA sector
IA Global


Structure
OEIC (UCITS)


Domicile
Ireland


Redemption fee
2% within 30 days of purchase






 


Underlying currency
US Dollar


Pricing
Daily, forwards


Valuation
2300 Dublin time


Deal cut off time
1500 Dublin time


Year end
31 December


Administrator
Capita Financial Administrators (Ireland) Ltd


Custodian
JP Morgan Bank (Ireland) plc


UK Reporting Fund status
Yes


ISA Eligible
Yes






Share classes



1.24% OCF
1.49% OCF
1.99% OCF


Currency
USD
GBP
USD
EUR
USD
GBP
EUR


Accumulation or Distribution
Acc
Acc
Acc
Acc
Acc
Acc
Acc


Name
E
X
A
D
B
C
C EUR Acc


Initial charge
0%
0%
0%
0%
2%
5%
5%


OCF* (total ongoing charges p.a.)
1.24%
1.24%
1.49%
1.49%
1.99%
1.99%
1.99%


Minimum direct investment
$10,000,000
£5,000,000
$200,000
€ 100,000
$1,000
£1,000
€ 1,000


Minimum platform investment Guinness Asset Management minimums do not apply. Platforms apply their own minimum investment levels. 


ISIN Code
IE00B3CCJC95
IE00B6XV0016
IE00B2Q91T05
IE00B3CCJB88
IE00B2Q91V27
IE00B3CCJ963
IE00BGHQF524


SEDOL
B3CCJC9
B6XV001
B2Q91T0
B3CCJB8
B2Q91V2
B3CCJ96
BGHQF52


Bloomberg ticker
GUINGEE ID
GUINGEX ID
GUINGEA ID
GUINGED ID
GUINGEB ID
GUINGEC ID
GUINCEU ID


Country registrations
UK, CH, FIN, FR, LUX, SGP (all classes); GER (A, B, D & E classes).



*OCF = Ongoing Charges Figure, which includes the annual management charge.


Country codes

UK United Kingdom
CH Switzerland
LUX Luxembourg
FIN Finland
SGP Singapore (professional only)
GER Germany
FR France




  

 


 


































Global Equity Income Fund - Guinness Funds















































































Terms & Conditions of this website
This website is issued in the UK by Guinness Asset Management Ltd, authorised and regulated by the Financial Conduct Authority (FCA registered company number 223077).
Guinness Asset Management provides investment products for professional and private investors, which include:

A range of long-only open-ended funds (sub-funds within an OEIC that is incorporated in Ireland and authorised and supervised by the Central Bank of Ireland, which operates under EU legislation). The Funds are approved by the Financial Conduct Authority for sale in the UK.
A discretionary-managed Enterprise Investment Scheme (EIS Service) investing in EIS-qualifying companies. The Service comprises a range of investment themes which can be accessed by investors via a sequence of dated “offerings”.

While considerable care has been taken to ensure that the information contained within this website is accurate and up to date, no warranty is given as to its accuracy or completeness, and no liability is accepted for any errors or omissions. All products referred to on this website are subject to change without notice, and we do not undertake to advise you of any changes to our views. This website should not be regarded as an invitation to buy or sell.
This Website
Please read the information on this page. It contains the legal and regulatory restrictions which apply to the use of this website and any investment in our products referred to in this website.
The information in this website has been issued and approved by Guinness Asset Management Ltd and does not in any way constitute investment, tax, legal, or other advice. If you are in any doubt about any of the information on this website, please consult your investment or other professional adviser.
Use of this website indicates your acceptance of the Terms and Conditions of this website.
This website and these Terms and Conditions may be altered and amended at any time without prior notice. Therefore, your continued use of this website indicates your acceptance of and acknowledgement of these Terms and Conditions as amended.
These Terms and Conditions were last revised in December 2013.
The information contained within this website does not constitute an offer of or an invitation to apply for securities:

In any jurisdiction where such offer or invitation is unlawful or
In which the person making such offer is not qualified to do so or
To whom it is unlawful to make such offer or solicitation.

Disclaimer and Limitation of Liability
The information contained in this site has been compiled with considerable care to ensure its accuracy at the date of publication. But no representation or warranty, express or implied, is made to its accuracy or completeness. Any research or analysis contained in this website has been procured by Guinness Asset Management Limited for its own use. It is provided to you only incidentally, and any opinions expressed are subject to change without notice.
We make no representations, warranties or undertakings about the information contained within the website. In addition, we make no such representations, warranties or undertaking about any website to which ours is linked and therefore you leave our website at your own risk.
You should note that there may be occasions during which our website becomes unavailable, through no fault of our own. There may indeed be occasions where we take our website offline in order to enhance and update it.
Due to the nature of the internet itself, we make no representations, warranties or undertakings as to the accuracy of the content of our website or as to whether any information you download is virus or error free.
We cannot accept any liability for any damages whatsoever arising to you as a result of your use of our website.
The information has been issued and approved by Guinness Asset Management Ltd and does not in any way constitute investment, tax, legal or other advice. If you are in any doubt about any of the information on this website, please consult your investment or other professional adviser.
Guinness Asset Management Funds PLC
An umbrella-type OEIC containing the Guinness range of long-only, open ended equity funds
Guinness Asset Management Funds PLC (the “Company”) is an umbrella-type open-ended investment company (OEIC), incorporated in Ireland and authorised and supervised by the Central Bank of Ireland, which operates under EU legislation. The Company’s sub-funds comprise the Guinness range of long-only, open ended equity funds (the “Funds”) as follows:

Guinness Alternative Energy Fund
Guinness China & Hong Kong Fund
Guinness Global Energy Fund
Guinness Global Equity Income Fund
Guinness Global Money Managers Fund

The Funds are approved by the Financial Conduct Authority for sale in the UK. The Company and the Funds have been recognised in the UK by the FCA pursuant to section 264 of the Financial Services and Markets Act 2000. Guinness Asset Management Ltd is authorised and regulated by the Financial Conduct Authority (FCA registered company number 223077).
The Funds are not offered for sale to Retail Clients in countries where the Funds are not registered for sale, or in any country or jurisdiction in which an offer is not permitted under applicable law. THESE INVESTMENTS ARE NOT FOR SALE TO U.S. PERSONS.
The Funds’ full documentation contains more complete and detailed information of risk, fees, charges and expenses that are to be borne by an investor. The documentation should be read carefully before investing. The full documentation needed to make an investment, including the Prospectus, the KIID and the Application Form are available, free of charge, from:



 


The Manager
Capita Financial Managers (Ireland) Limited
2 Grand Canal Square, Grand Canal Harbour, Dublin 2, Ireland



The Promoter and
Investment Manager
 Guinness Asset Management Ltd
14 Queen Anne’s Gate, London SW1H 9AA



Documentation is also available from this website, guinnessfunds.com. The content and documents on this website should not be distributed to Retail Clients who are resident in countries where the Funds are not registered for sale or in any other circumstances where their distribution is not authorised or is unlawful.
The prospectus for Switzerland, the KIID for Switzerland, the articles of association, the annual and semi-annual reports, as well as the list of the buying and selling transactions can be obtained free of charge from the representative in Switzerland:
Carnegie Fund Services S.A.
11, rue du Général-Dufour, 1204 Geneva, Switzerland
Tel. +41 22 705 11 77, Fax: + 41 22 705 11 79, www.carnegie-fund-services.ch
The paying agent is Banque Cantonale de Genève, 17 Quai de l’Ile, 1204 Geneva, Switzerland.
Fund risk factors
All the Guinness Funds are open ended, long-only equity funds. Investors should be willing and able to assume the risks of equity investing. Investment in the Funds carries with it a degree of risk and investors should read the risk factors section in the prospectus before investing. The value of the Funds’ portfolios changes daily in accordance with the movement of underlying capital markets and the specific share price movements of the companies in whose shares each Fund invests.
Past performance is not a guide to future performance.
Performance risks
We identify the following performance risks in our Funds:



 

Market risk
The value of investments and the income from them may go down as well as up and are not guaranteed. An investor may not get back the amount originally invested. The value of an investment can be affected by changes in general market conditions, other political, social and economic developments, as well as specific matters relating to the companies in whose securities each Fund invests.


Currency risk
 Changes in the rates of exchange may cause the value of investments to go up or down.
While the Funds have share classes priced in various currencies, the base currency of all the Funds is US Dollars, and the Fund valuations for all share classes are initially calculated each dealing day in US Dollars. Non-US Dollar share classes are then converted into their respective currencies from the US Dollar valuation.
The Funds invest internationally and hold all investments in local currency. Guinness Asset Management does not conduct any hedging of currency exposure on the Funds’ capital value or income. The Funds aim to be fully invested most of the time, but any cash balances are normally held in US dollars. This means that the exposure of the Funds to any one currency is mainly limited to the value of its holdings in stocks priced in that currency. Therefore, as well as the impact of share price movements in the securities each Fund holds, the capital value of an investment in a Fund will be affected by changes in exchange rates between the stocks’ local currency, the Fund’s base currency (USD) and the currency of the Fund share class you own.


Emerging market risk
The risk inherent in a Fund is higher when it is invested in markets which may be considered ’emerging’. These Funds are only suitable for those investors who are prepared to accept the above average volatility inherent in emerging market investment.




There are other risks of investing in our funds, such as credit and counterparty risks, which are detailed in the Prospectus.
Shareholders in Guinness Global Equity Income Fund and Guinness Global Money Managers Fund should note that all or part of the fees and expenses can be charged to the capital of the Funds. Charging fees and expenses to capital has the effect of lowering the capital value of your investment.
Fund specific risks
In addition some funds carry their own specific risks:






Sector risk
Some funds invest only in companies involved in a single industry or a single sector of the market. These funds are very susceptible to the performance of that one industry or sector, and can be volatile. Examples in the Guinness fund range include:

Guinness Alternative Energy Fund
Guinness Global Energy Fund
Guinness Global Money Managers Fund




Geographic risk
Some funds invest only in stocks listed in or exposed to one single country or region. These funds are very susceptible to the performance of that one country or region, and can be volatile. Examples in the Guinness fund range include:

Guinness China & Hong Kong Fund





For more detail on the risks relating to specific products, please refer to the relevant documentation for that product.
Guinness EIS Service
An Enterprise Investment Scheme (EIS) is a government initiative to encourage investment in smaller, higher-risk companies by offering a range of tax reliefs to investors. EIS-qualifying companies can be unlisted smaller companies (companies whose shares are not quoted on any recognised stock exchange), or companies listed on the Alternative Investment Market (AIM).
The Guinness EIS Service is a discretionary managed service investing in EIS qualifying companies and managed by Guinness Asset Management Ltd, the Investment Manager. The Service comprises a range of investment themes which can be accessed by investors via a sequence of dated “offerings”. Each offering has a finite subscription period, with an opening and closing date for subscriptions. To qualify for the full range of tax benefits of an EIS investment, investors should be prepared to hold their investment for a minimum of three years. Each offering has its own Information Memorandum detailing the terms and conditions, specific risks and tax implications of investment.
The range of investment themes in the Guinness EIS Service include AIM-listed companies and Sustainable Energy companies.
An investment in the Guinness EIS Service is subject to a number of risks, both general and specific to each offering within the Service. Before making any decision to invest, prospective investors need to understand that investing in EIS-qualifying companies can be highly speculative and carries high risk. The Information Memorandum for each offering contains details of the risks involved. Investors should consider carefully whether a subscription is suitable for them in the light of the information in the Information Memorandum and their personal circumstances. Before investing, investors are strongly recommended to consult an authorised financial adviser. We recommend you seek appropriate independent advice before investing.
Past performance of the Investment Manager is no guarantee of future performance. The value of an investment in any investee company may go down as well as up and investors may not get back the full amount invested. The Investment Manager will rely on achieving an exit for the investments made in each offering in order to generate a capital gain for investors. There is no guarantee that exits will be available at the prices anticipated by the Investment Manager.
General EIS investment risks
1. Concentration risk
The Investment Manager may be unable to make sufficient investments in suitable investee companies. If sufficient investments are not made, the returns achieved by the Service could be materially impacted.
The Investment Manager intends to invest across a portfolio of investee companies to diversify exposure to any one company. However, there is a risk that the investments are concentrated or there is a weighting towards one or more sectors. In these circumstances returns to investors may be adversely affected by the underperformance of a particular company or sector.
2. Size and liquidity risk
The Guinness EIS Service invests in companies that are relatively small. Smaller investee companies can be vulnerable to government actions and changes in statute. In particular, there may be changes to the EIS legislation which may affect investors’ tax positions.
Investee companies may be reliant on the skills or knowledge of a small number of individuals, and should a key individual leave performance may be adversely affected.
Some companies’ shares in which the Investment Manager invests will be listed on AIM, other companies will be unlisted.
Listed shares
Although some companies’ shares in which the Guinness EIS Service can invest are listed on AIM, not all shares are readily realisable at all times.
Investment in shares traded on AIM involves a higher degree of risk, and such shares may be less liquid, than shares in companies which are listed on the main market of the London Stock Exchange. The rules governing AIM companies are less demanding than those of companies listed on the main market of the London Stock Exchange.
The market price of AIM-listed shares may not necessarily reflect their underlying value.
The share price of AIM-listed companies can be highly volatile and shareholdings can be illiquid. The price at which AIM-listed shares are quoted and the price at which such shares may realise will be influenced by a large number of factors, some specific to the relevant investee company and its operations, and others which may affect AIM-listed companies generally, such as legislative changes, and general economic, political, regulatory or social conditions.
Some AIM-listed companies are majority owned by connected parties who may be in a position to exert influence on the relevant investee company and their interests may differ from other shareholders.
Unlisted shares
Some offerings in the Guinness EIS Service can invest in companies which are not expected to have a listing or quotation. Therefore, there may not be a recognised or active market for the shares of investee companies and it may be difficult to sell or realise the investment or obtain reliable information about their value. Investors should not consider investing money in an offering which can hold shares in unlisted companies if their investment may be required during the life of the offering, which is normally at least three years.
Investors should not consider subscribing unless they can afford a total loss of their subscription.
Minority holdings in unquoted investments may be difficult to protect and difficult to realise. The timing of realisations of investments by the Service cannot therefore be predicted.
3. Tax risks
The tax reliefs referred to in the Information Memorandum for each offering in the Guinness EIS Service are those currently applicable. However, investors should be aware that tax reliefs can change. Their applicability and value will depend upon the individual circumstances of a given investor, and investors should seek their own independent professional advice on their particular tax situation and the application of such tax reliefs prior to making a subscription in the Service.
It is the intention of the Investment Manager to invest in companies which qualify under the EIS legislation, but there is no guarantee that EIS status can be maintained throughout the life of the Investment. Both investee companies and investors need to comply with the requirements of the EIS legislation in order to maintain EIS Income Tax Relief, CGT free disposal and CGT Deferral Relief, and non-compliance may result in the loss or partial claw-back of EIS Income Tax Relief and CGT Deferral Relief, and potential interest penalties. Subscription funds will not be returned in these instances; investments will be exited as deemed appropriate by the Investment Manager.
Shares in companies which qualify under the EIS legislation will normally qualify for Business Property Relief for Inheritance Tax purposes. In order to secure this relief investors must retain their shareholding in an investee company for a minimum of two years. The Investment Manager intends to invest in companies which qualify for EIS Relief, CGT Deferral Relief and Business Property Relief, although there is a possibility that investments will not qualify for one or more of these.
To qualify for the full range of tax benefits of an EIS investment, it is the intention of the Investment Manager that investments in qualifying companies will be held for three years. However, the Investment Manager reserves the right to realise individual investments before three years if it believes it is in the best interests of investors.
Specific EIS risks
Additional risks and uncertainties apply to each offering in the Service and the companies in which it invests. These specific risks may have an adverse effect on the business of the investee companies. Investors should consider carefully whether a subscription to the Service is suitable for them in the light of the information in the relevant Information Memorandum, and their personal circumstances.
Data Protection Notice
Any information with which you provide us will be used by Guinness Asset Management Limited and its subsidiaries. We may collect personal information from you during your use of our website.
In order to advise you of our products and services, we may collect personal data from you and we may process that data. You have the right to get a copy of the information we hold about you by sending a written request to Guinness Asset Management Ltd; you may be required to supply a valid means of identification as a security precaution to assist us in preventing the unauthorised disclosure of your personal information. You are also entitled to have Guinness Asset Management modify or delete any information that you believe is incorrect or out of date.
Guinness Asset Management Ltd is registered under the Data Protection Act 1998 and complies with the Act in all our dealing with your personal data.
Copyright
This website and the information contained within it is protected by copyright. Reproduction of all or any part of this website, or any information contained within it, is prohibited unless this is required for personal use
Cookies Policy
Below is our policy for use of cookies on this website.
Cookies Introduction
This website uses cookies (as almost all websites do) to help provide you with the best experience we can. Cookies are small text files that are placed on your computer or mobile when you browse websites.
Our cookies help:

make our website work as you’d expect;
remember your settings during and between visits;
improve the security/speed of the site;

We do not use cookies to:

collect any personal identifiable information (without your express permission);
collect any sensitive information (without your express permission);
pass personally identifiable data to third parties;
pay sales commissions.

You can learn more about all the cookies we use below.
Allowing us to use cookies
Users are notified of the use of cookies when they enter our site, along with instructions on how to disable cookies in their web browser. If the settings on your software that you are using to view this website (your browser) are adjusted to accept cookies, we take this, and your continued use of our website, to mean that this is acceptable to you.
Turning cookies off
Most modern browsers allow you to control your cookie settings. You can disable them completely by editing your browser settings. However, in doing this you may be limiting the functionality that is displayed on our website and also a large population of websites on the Internet that use cookies to serve their content.
To learn how to disable cookies on browsers please click here.
Our use of cookies
Our website stores an anonymous cookie for a period of 30 days to remember that a user, when revisiting the site, has accepted these Terms and Conditions, including notice of our use of cookies.
We use traffic log cookies to identify which pages are being used. This helps us analyse data about web page traffic and improve our website in order to tailor it to customer needs. We only use this information for statistical analysis purposes; the data is then removed from the system.
Website function cookies

Our own cookies
We use cookies to help make our website work by tracking anonymous visits to the website for statistical purposes.

Anonymous visitor statistics cookies
We use cookies to compile anonymous visitor statistics such as how many people have visited our website, what type of technology they are using (e.g Mac or Windows, which help to identify when our site isn’t working as it should for particular technologies), how long they spend on the site, what page they look at etc. This helps us to continuously improve our website.


We also use analytic programmes that tell us, for example, and on an anonymous basis, how people reached this site (e.g. from a search engine). 
To learn how to disable Google Analytics, click here.
Google Maps
We use Google Maps to give users the opportunity of visiting our business location. Google Maps only uses cookies to enable you to use the functionality of their map software. No personal information is stored on our website through the use of Google Maps.
If you are concerned about cookies tracking your movements on the Internet then you may be concerned about spyware. Spyware is the name given to a particular band of cookies that track personal information about you. There are many anti-spyware programmes that you can use to prevent this from happening. To learn more about anti-spyware software, click here.
Guinness Asset Management
Guinness Asset Management Ltd is authorised and regulated by the Financial Conduct Authority.
Registered address: 14 Queen Anne’s Gate, London SW1H 9AA
Company registration: 4647882
FCA company registration number: 223077
If you would like further information on the Financial Conduct Authority, our regulator, you can access their website here: www.fca.org.uk
Telephone calls
For your protection, telephone calls to Guinness Asset Management may be recorded.


This site uses cookies. By continuing to the site you agree to the use of cookies. You can disable cookies in your browser. To find out more click here.
By continuing to this website you accept the Terms & Conditions of the use of this site. 







Home
About us
News & Views
Literature
Funds

Global Equity Income Fund
European Equity Income Fund
Asian Equity Income Fund
Global Innovators Fund
Global Energy Fund
Alternative Energy Fund
Global Money Managers Fund
Sustainable Infrastructure EIS – Introduction
Guinness AIM EIS – Introduction


Careers
Events
 









 



















 









 



  



 


 



HomeAbout usNews & ViewsLiteratureFunds Global Equity Income Fund European Equity Income Fund Asian Equity Income Fund Global Innovators Fund Global Energy Fund Alternative Energy Fund Global Money Managers Fund Sustainable Infrastructure EIS – Introduction Guinness AIM EIS – IntroductionCareersEvents




  

 


 




 





 


Equity Income funds
Global Equity Income Fund
European Equity Income Fund
Asian Equity Income Fund

Global Growth funds
Global Innovators Fund

Specialist funds
Global Energy Fund
Alternative Energy Fund
Global Money Managers Fund

EIS & IHT Service
Guinness EIS
Guinness AIM EIS
Sustainable Infrastructure IHT

How to invest
Fund Prices
Fund Prospectus
Fund Report & Accounts
Contact Us
Register for Updates 
Follow Us on Twitter 
Follow Us on LinkedIn 

 

  



 





Guinness Global Equity Income Fund

Overview
Investment case
Performance
Literature
Fund facts





 







The Guinness Global Equity Income Fund is designed to provide investors with global exposure to dividend paying companies. The Fund is managed for income and capital growth and invests in companies that are well placed to be able to pay a sustainable dividend into the future. 
We focus on profitable companies that have generated persistently high return on capital over the last decade. With these criteria as our starting point we identify many well-known blue-chip companies, but we also find a broad spectrum of smaller companies that are outside of the traditional dividend-paying regions and sectors. It is a rare achievement for a company to meet our investment criteria and we think it shows a mark of genuine quality.
We maintain a high conviction portfolio of around 35 equally-weighted stocks, with low turnover and no benchmark-driven constraints on sector and regional weightings.



Awards & Ratings


 

 Guinness Global Equity Income Fund  BEST FUND OVER 3 YEARSEquity Sector Global Income

 

 Guinness Global Equity Income Fund  Elite RatedFund Calibre

 


Investment Team






Dr Ian Mortimer, CFA


 Managing Guinness Global Equity Income Fund since launch in 2010.Managing the Guinness Global Innovators strategy since 2011.Managing the Guinness European Equity Income strategy since launch in 2013.



 








Matthew Page, CFA


 Managing Guinness Global Equity Income Fund since launch in 2010.Managing the Guinness Global Innovators strategy since 2010.Managing the Guinness European Equity Income strategy since launch in 2013.



 








Sagar Thanki


 Sagar joined Guinness Asset Management as an investment analyst in January 2017.



 








Joshua Cole


 Joshua joined Guinness Asset Management as an investment analyst in January 2017.



 




Quick links

Factsheet


Investment Process


Update | Jul '17
Quarterly update


Webcast | Jul '17
Update on performance and the portfolio (Q3, 2017)


Insight | Nov '16
Implications of the US election result


Press | Sep '16 | Wealth Manager
 Fund buy list radar: wealth managers toast Guinness







 Why invest in the Guinness Global Equity Income Fund?
 The case for a global equity income fund 
 Fund managers
 How do we run the Fund 
 How do we construct the portfolio 

Why invest in the Guinness Global Equity Income Fund?
The Fund is designed to provide investors with exposure to global equities through a high conviction, low turnover portfolio of consistently profitable dividend-paying companies.

Focus on consistent high return on capital
Consistent high return on capital is a good indication of a company’s ability to pay healthy dividends. The Fund invests in companies that are unusually consistent in generating returns on capital above their cost of capital.
Growth and income
Our approach to dividend investing is to focus on companies that can sustainably grow their dividend into the future, rather than simply looking for companies with a high dividend yield.
High conviction
The Fund typically invests in just 35 companies, with each company having an equal weighting. This provides a good balance between the benefits of diversification while also allowing each company to add meaningfully to performance. We don’t have a long tail of small positions and by definition we can never just ‘hug’ the benchmark index.
Fundamentally driven
We focus on ‘bottom-up’ stock selection rather than trying to make decisions based on an expected outlook for the world economy. We like to invest in good companies that have, in the short term, fallen out of favour, but that have previously shown an ability to weather most economic environments over time.
Low turnover
We prefer to invest over the long term. We also recognise the increased costs of trading in and out of companies unnecessarily. Typically we will hold a company in the portfolio for between 3 and 4 years.
Repeatable and independent
Ian Mortimer and Matthew Page have managed the Fund since launch. They have developed an investment process that is clear, robust, transparent, and scalable. Their approach filters out much of the noise and hype that surrounds companies to focus on the true signals that drive company valuations. By performing their own company research and analysis, using their own proprietary modelling systems, the managers try to avoid some of the behavioural biases associated with being unduly influenced by market sentiment.

The case for a global equity income fund
"Dividends make a gradual but potent contribution to long-term returns."
Dividend growers have outperformed for 30 years
Efficient use of cash is paramount in creating a well-run, profitable company that will thrive. Management discipline is required to maintain dividend growth and can be a signal of a well-run company. Using the example of the US stock market, the evidence for this is clear in the returns of dividend paying and non-dividend paying companies over the last forty years. It is also informative to note that companies that cut their dividend were the worst performing group over this period –illustrating that not all dividend-paying companies are created equal.
Power of compounding
For investors, reinvesting dividends delivers a significant proportion of your total return. And in periods of low growth this can be even more striking. The 1940s and 1970s, for example, were periods defined by some combination of sluggish economic growth, rising inflation, and high unemployment. During these decades dividends accounted for over 75% of the total returns of the S&P500.

Dividends can protect against inflation
Looking again at the US as an example, dividends in the US stock market have grown at an average 6% per year since the 1940s, while inflation grew at 4%. Investing in dividend-paying companies can protect against inflation over long periods: the income received in dividend payments has grown in line or at a higher rate than inflation.
Global diversity
The array of stocks around the world paying dividends has increased significantly in the last decade. We can now invest in a basket of dividend-paying companies that gives you genuine global diversity and exposure to a healthy range of industries in your portfolio. In contrast, just six companies now account for over 40% of all dividend payments in the UK.
Fund managers


Dr Ian Mortimer, CFA

Ian joined Guinness Asset Management in 2006, and is portfolio manager on the Guinness Global Equity Income Fund, Guinness Global Innovators Fund and the Guinness European Equity Income Fund.
Prior to joining Guinness, Ian completed a D.Phil. in experimental physics at Christ Church, University of Oxford, and graduated in 2006. Ian graduated from University College London with a First Class Honours Master’s degree in Physics in 2003. He is a CFA Charterholder.
 


Matthew Page, CFA

Matthew joined Guinness Asset Management in 2005, and is portfolio manager on the Guinness Global Equity Income Fund, Guinness Global Innovators Fund and the Guinness European Equity Income Fund.
Prior to joining Guinness, Matthew joined Goldman Sachs on the graduate scheme in 2004 working in Foreign Exchange and Fixed Income. Matthew graduated from New College, University of Oxford, with a Master’s Degree in Physics. He is a CFA Charterholder.
 

How do we run the Fund? 
“We don’t chase yield, we want capital and dividend growth.”
Although the Fund is designed to invest in dividend-paying companies, our starting point in selecting our investment universe is to identify companies with consistently high return on capital. Specifically we look at companies that have a return on capital of greater than 10% in each of the previous ten years.
Our analysis shows that companies with persistently high return on capital are highly likely to continue to do so in the future – meaning they will continue to create shareholder value. 



 Why 10% and why ten years?


10% return on capital…
 10% is well above the average real cost of capital of 6%. This means companies who achieve this level are truly creating value for their shareholders. 


…every year…
Consistency each year excludes highly cyclical companies or those with high but declining or volatile earnings.


…for ten years
Because business cycles tend to last less than ten years, the companies in our investible universe have shown they can weather most economic environments.



“It's a rare achievement for a company to meet our investment criteria and we think it shows a mark of genuine quality.  And this is where our portfolio starts – consistent high return on capital.”
On average, only 3% of global listed companies achieve our threshold. We then exclude those less than $1 billion in size or with a debt to equity ratio greater than 1. This gives us a pool of around 400 companies from which to build our portfolio.
What about yield?
Companies that earn a consistent high return on capital often distribute a proportion of cash they create in the form of a dividend. In the Fund, however, we focus on those companies that can sustainably grow their dividend into the future.
From this pool we then select candidates for extended research on the basis of value and sentiment.  In depth proprietary modelling of a company’s cash flow, capital budgeting and potential for dividend growth is combined with a subjective analysis of its business model to identify candidates for inclusion in the final portfolio.
By selecting companies from a broad range of industries, countries, and market capitalisation we aim to create a well-diversified portfolio which can provide a reasonable dividend yield and growing income stream at an attractive valuation relative to the broad market. 
Sell discipline
It is often easier to find companies to buy that look cheap than it is to identify those companies you own which should be sold. We consider sell discipline as important as selecting companies for purchase and continuously monitor the companies we hold in the Fund. The six core reasons we may sell a company are outlined below.

The company fails to continue to meet our return on capital criteria
The valuation becomes too rich
The balance sheet becomes stretched
The dividend outlook or management policy to dividends changes unfavourably
The original investment thesis no longer holds
Yield contribution to the portfolio is insufficient

How do we construct the portfolio
The Guinness Global Equity Income Fund is a concentrated portfolio of around 35 equally weighted stocks. This provides a number of useful attributes: 

It reduces stock-specific risk, as we will not be overweight in a small number of favourite companies.
We will not have a long tail of small holdings in the portfolio, which can be a distraction and a potential drag on performance.
It instills a strong sell discipline as we must typically sell a position in order to make way for a new one; and we must constantly assess the companies we own in the portfolio in comparison to the rest of the universe available to us.
We are truly index independent. All companies held are weighted equally without regard to their weighting in the benchmark index leading the portfolio to have a high active weight.










Fund
Global Equity Income Fund
Date (period end)
30.06.2017


Index
MSCI World Index
Fund Launch
31.12.2010


Sector
IMA Global Equity Income
Basis
Total return, in GBP



Please remember that past performance is not a guide to future performance. The value of an investment and the income from it can fall as well as rise as a result of market and currency movement, and you may not get back the amount originally invested.




Cumulative performance (%)
				


X class (1)
(OCF: 1.24%)
Year-to-date
1 
year
3 
years
5 
years
From 
launch


Fund
5.63
26.33
44.92
100.23
103.94


Index
5.81
32.01
56.18
120.11
114.99


Sector (2)
6.38
26.84
36.76
87.64
83.75







Annualised performance (%)


X class (1)
(OCF: 1.24%)
1 
year
3 
years
5 
years
10 
years
From 
launch


Fund
26.33
13.15
14.89
0.00
11.74


Index
32.01
16.01
17.08
8.98
12.67


Sector (2)
26.84
10.99
13.41
6.90
9.94







Calendar year performance (%)
				


X class (1)
(OCF: 1.24%)
2012
2013
2014
2015
2016


Fund
5.46
26.34
10.10
1.99
26.57


Index
11.42
25.00
12.07
5.45
29.01


Sector (2)
9.74
20.40
6.69
1.53
23.21







Discrete year performance to date (%)
				


12 months ending:
Jun-13
Jun-14
Jun-15
Jun-16
Jun-17


X Class (OCF: 1.24%) (1)
29.49
6.70
11.96
2.46
26.33


C Class (OCF: 1.99%)
28.49
5.90
11.13
1.69
25.39


Index
30.48
8.01
16.81
1.28
32.01


Sector (2)
28.77
6.55
10.26
-2.21
26.84




Source: Financial Express, bid to bid basis, total return.
Notes
(1) The performance numbers displayed here are calculated in GBP (Sterling). Please note: The Fund's X class was launched on 15/02/2012. The performance shown is a simulation for X class performance being based on the actual performance of the Fund's E class, which has the same annual management charge as the X class, and has existed since the Fund's launch. The Fund's E class is denominated in USD but for the purposes of this performance data its performance is calculated in GBP. Hence the Fund's E Share class is used here to illustrate the performance of a GBP-based clean-fee (RDR-compliant) share class since the Fund's launch on 31.12.10. 
(2) The performance of the IA Global Equity Income sector is based on the average of the highest fee share class of each constituent fund, e.g. C class for the Guinness Global Equity Income Fund, with an annual management fee of 1.5%.


Latest Guinness Global Equity Income Report

Jul '17
Quarterly update


Jun '17
Strong earnings, strong economies 


May '17
Politics, Politics, Politics 


Apr '17
Quarterly update


Mar '17
Rallying equity markets


Feb '17
Is President Trump the same as Candidate Trump?


Jan '17
2016 performance & portfolio review


Dec '16
Changes in the Portfolio


Nov '16
Post-election fund analysis


Oct '16
Quarterly review

 Sign up for our monthly Global Equity Income Report by email   Archive

Investment Process 
 How we manage the Fund 

Webcasts

Jul '17
Update on performance and the portfolio (Q3, 2017)

Apr '17
Update on performance and the portfolio (Q2, 2017)

Jan '17
Update on performance and the portfolio (Q1, 2017)

Oct '16
Update on performance and the portfolio (Q3, 2016)

Jul '16
Update on performance and the portfolio (Q2, 2016)

Apr '16
Update on performance and the portfolio

Jan '16
Update on performance and the portfolio

Oct '15
Update on performance and the portfolio
 Archive

Insights

Nov '16
Implications of the US election result Ian Mortimer and Matthew Page discuss the consequence of the US election results.


Feb '16
Five year history of the Fund
As the Fund passes its fifth anniversary, managers Ian Mortimer and Matthew Page analyse its performance so far and how their portfolio has evolved.


Jun '14
Some thoughts on equally-weighted portfolios
Matthew Page explores the reasons behind running a concentrated, equally-weighted portfolio.


Mar '14
Physics envy
Matthew Page investigates the “science” of economic modelling


Dec '12
Some thoughts on equities and bonds
Ian Mortimer discusses the benefits of bonds and equities and the hunt for safety in an inflationary environment


Nov '12
To meet or not to meet
Matthew Page discusses the merits of meeting company management


Mar '12
Why dividends matter
Ian Mortimer and Matthew Page investigate the importance of dividends in the pursuit of returns

 Archive

Press

Sep '16
 Fund buy list radar: wealth managers toast Guinness
Citywire look at the funds that are building sufficient assets and have the track record to be coming onto buy list radars


Sep '16
 How important are face-to-face company meetings?
Guinness AM’s Matthew Page, co-manager of the Global Equity Income & Global Innovators funds, gives his take on the value and limitations of meeting company management.


Apr '16
 Funds to Watch
Against a backdrop of the ongoing debate about the Investment Association’s yield criteria for the UK Equity Income sector, Ian Mortimer and Matthew Page, co-managers of the $147m Guinness Global Equity Income fund, have highlighted the benefits of a broader approach in this area.


Apr '16
 Fund of the week: Guinness Global Equity Income
Matthew Page, co-manager of the Guinness Global Equity Income fund, explains the test each share must pass to win a place in his 35-stock portfolio


Nov '15
Page & Mortimer in “Rising stars of the industry”


May '15
EM exposure pays off for Guinness duo
FT Adviser discuss the Fund’s emerging market exposure with co-manager Ian Mortimer


Apr '15
Guinness Global Equity Income Fund passes £100m


Feb '15
Press release – Global Equity Income early investor share class closing
Guinness are closing the early investor (“Z”) share class on its Global Equity Income Fund on 30th April 2015.


Aug '14
Physics envy – economists’ hunt for natural laws of markets 
Matthew Page discusses economists’ failure to identify deterministic “natural laws” of markets.


Jun '14
Fund update from Charles Stanley Direct: Guinness Global Equity Income
Charles Stanley’s Rob Morgan gives his verdict on Guinness Global Equity Income Fund and its up and coming managers.


May '14
Cheap Asian stocks – Matthew Page
Asian stocks are good value versus their history, and scoring well on our stock screening.


Aug '13
 Prospects for Global Equities
Ian Mortimer discusses the state of the markets amid potential Fed relief tapering with Business News Network.

 Archive


Key documents

Factsheet
English | French
German | Italian


 KIIDs


Report & Accounts


Prospectus
Global Equity Income Fund Supplement
UK Country Supplement


Application form


Redemption form


Key documents for overseas investors on fundinfo.com
 For German investors
 For Swiss investors






Fact sheets


For information on the Fund’s current investments, please see the latest fact sheet:
English
French
German
Italian






Key facts


Launch date
31/12/2010


Fund managers
(start date)
Ian Mortimer (31/12/2010)
Matthew Page (31/12/2010)



Benchmark
MSCI World Index


IA sector
IA Global Equity Income


Structure
OEIC (UCITS)


Domicile
Ireland


Redemption fee
2% within 30 days of purchase






 


Underlying currency
US Dollar


Pricing
Daily, forwards


Valuation
2300 Dublin time


Deal cut off time
1500 Dublin time


Administrator
Capita Financial Administrators (Ireland) Ltd


Custodian
JP Morgan Bank (Ireland) plc


UK Reporting Fund status
Yes


ISA Eligible
Yes






Share classes



0.99% OCF
0.74% OCF For charities
1.24% OCF
1.49% OCF
1.99% OCF


Currency
GBP / USD / EUR
GBP 
GBP / USD
USD / EUR
 GBP / USD / EUR


Initial charge
0%
0% 
0% 
0% 
5% 


OCF* (Total ongoing charges p.a.)
0.99% 
0.74%
1.24%
1.49%
1.99% 


Accumulation or Distribution
Accumulation 
Distribution 
Distribution 
Distribution 
Distribution 
Accumulation 
Distribution 


Country registrations
UK, SGP 
UK, SGP 
UK, CH, LUX, FIN, SGP, GER
UK, CH, LUX, FIN, SGP, USD class: AT, GER, IT 
UK, CH, LUX, FIN, SGP, AT, IT EUR class: GER
UK, SGP EUR class: AT, CH, GER, IT, LUX, FIN 
UK, CH, LUX, FIN, SGP USD class: AT, GER, IT 


Share class name
Y Acc 
Y Dist 
Z 
GBP: “X”  USD: “E”
USD: “A”  EUR: “D”
C Acc
USD: “B”  GBP: “C”


ISIN codes
GBP: IE00BVYPNY24
USD: IE00BVYPNX17
EUR: IE00BVYPNZ31
GBP: IE00BVYPP131
USD: IE00BVYPP248
EUR: IE00BVYPP024
GBP: IE00B754QH41
GBP: IE00B7LM5753 
USD: IE00B67PB391
USD: IE00B3QG6N78
EUR: IE00B66B5L40
GBP: IE00BVYPNV92
USD: IE00BVYPNW00
EUR: IE00BGHQF631
GBP: IE00B3PB1722
 USD: IE00B42XCP33


Bloomberg tickers
GBP: GUGYGBA ID
USD: GUGYUSA ID
EUR: GUGYEUA ID
GBP: GUGYGBD ID
USD: GUGYUSD ID
EUR: GUGYEUD ID
GBP: GUGLEIZ ID
GBP: GUGLEIX ID 
USD: GUGLEIE ID
USD: GUGLEIA ID
EUR: GUGLEID ID
GBP: GUGCGBA ID
USD: GUGCUSA ID
EUR: GUGLECE ID
GBP: GUGLEIC ID
USD: GUGLEIB ID



*OCF = Ongoing Charges Figure, which includes the annual management charge.							


Country codes

UK United Kingdom
CH Switzerland
LUX Luxembourg
FIN Finland
SGP Singapore (professional only)
GER Germany
FR France
IT Italy (professional only)




  

 


 


































Global Energy Fund - Guinness Funds















































































Terms & Conditions of this website
This website is issued in the UK by Guinness Asset Management Ltd, authorised and regulated by the Financial Conduct Authority (FCA registered company number 223077).
Guinness Asset Management provides investment products for professional and private investors, which include:

A range of long-only open-ended funds (sub-funds within an OEIC that is incorporated in Ireland and authorised and supervised by the Central Bank of Ireland, which operates under EU legislation). The Funds are approved by the Financial Conduct Authority for sale in the UK.
A discretionary-managed Enterprise Investment Scheme (EIS Service) investing in EIS-qualifying companies. The Service comprises a range of investment themes which can be accessed by investors via a sequence of dated “offerings”.

While considerable care has been taken to ensure that the information contained within this website is accurate and up to date, no warranty is given as to its accuracy or completeness, and no liability is accepted for any errors or omissions. All products referred to on this website are subject to change without notice, and we do not undertake to advise you of any changes to our views. This website should not be regarded as an invitation to buy or sell.
This Website
Please read the information on this page. It contains the legal and regulatory restrictions which apply to the use of this website and any investment in our products referred to in this website.
The information in this website has been issued and approved by Guinness Asset Management Ltd and does not in any way constitute investment, tax, legal, or other advice. If you are in any doubt about any of the information on this website, please consult your investment or other professional adviser.
Use of this website indicates your acceptance of the Terms and Conditions of this website.
This website and these Terms and Conditions may be altered and amended at any time without prior notice. Therefore, your continued use of this website indicates your acceptance of and acknowledgement of these Terms and Conditions as amended.
These Terms and Conditions were last revised in December 2013.
The information contained within this website does not constitute an offer of or an invitation to apply for securities:

In any jurisdiction where such offer or invitation is unlawful or
In which the person making such offer is not qualified to do so or
To whom it is unlawful to make such offer or solicitation.

Disclaimer and Limitation of Liability
The information contained in this site has been compiled with considerable care to ensure its accuracy at the date of publication. But no representation or warranty, express or implied, is made to its accuracy or completeness. Any research or analysis contained in this website has been procured by Guinness Asset Management Limited for its own use. It is provided to you only incidentally, and any opinions expressed are subject to change without notice.
We make no representations, warranties or undertakings about the information contained within the website. In addition, we make no such representations, warranties or undertaking about any website to which ours is linked and therefore you leave our website at your own risk.
You should note that there may be occasions during which our website becomes unavailable, through no fault of our own. There may indeed be occasions where we take our website offline in order to enhance and update it.
Due to the nature of the internet itself, we make no representations, warranties or undertakings as to the accuracy of the content of our website or as to whether any information you download is virus or error free.
We cannot accept any liability for any damages whatsoever arising to you as a result of your use of our website.
The information has been issued and approved by Guinness Asset Management Ltd and does not in any way constitute investment, tax, legal or other advice. If you are in any doubt about any of the information on this website, please consult your investment or other professional adviser.
Guinness Asset Management Funds PLC
An umbrella-type OEIC containing the Guinness range of long-only, open ended equity funds
Guinness Asset Management Funds PLC (the “Company”) is an umbrella-type open-ended investment company (OEIC), incorporated in Ireland and authorised and supervised by the Central Bank of Ireland, which operates under EU legislation. The Company’s sub-funds comprise the Guinness range of long-only, open ended equity funds (the “Funds”) as follows:

Guinness Alternative Energy Fund
Guinness China & Hong Kong Fund
Guinness Global Energy Fund
Guinness Global Equity Income Fund
Guinness Global Money Managers Fund

The Funds are approved by the Financial Conduct Authority for sale in the UK. The Company and the Funds have been recognised in the UK by the FCA pursuant to section 264 of the Financial Services and Markets Act 2000. Guinness Asset Management Ltd is authorised and regulated by the Financial Conduct Authority (FCA registered company number 223077).
The Funds are not offered for sale to Retail Clients in countries where the Funds are not registered for sale, or in any country or jurisdiction in which an offer is not permitted under applicable law. THESE INVESTMENTS ARE NOT FOR SALE TO U.S. PERSONS.
The Funds’ full documentation contains more complete and detailed information of risk, fees, charges and expenses that are to be borne by an investor. The documentation should be read carefully before investing. The full documentation needed to make an investment, including the Prospectus, the KIID and the Application Form are available, free of charge, from:



 


The Manager
Capita Financial Managers (Ireland) Limited
2 Grand Canal Square, Grand Canal Harbour, Dublin 2, Ireland



The Promoter and
Investment Manager
 Guinness Asset Management Ltd
14 Queen Anne’s Gate, London SW1H 9AA



Documentation is also available from this website, guinnessfunds.com. The content and documents on this website should not be distributed to Retail Clients who are resident in countries where the Funds are not registered for sale or in any other circumstances where their distribution is not authorised or is unlawful.
The prospectus for Switzerland, the KIID for Switzerland, the articles of association, the annual and semi-annual reports, as well as the list of the buying and selling transactions can be obtained free of charge from the representative in Switzerland:
Carnegie Fund Services S.A.
11, rue du Général-Dufour, 1204 Geneva, Switzerland
Tel. +41 22 705 11 77, Fax: + 41 22 705 11 79, www.carnegie-fund-services.ch
The paying agent is Banque Cantonale de Genève, 17 Quai de l’Ile, 1204 Geneva, Switzerland.
Fund risk factors
All the Guinness Funds are open ended, long-only equity funds. Investors should be willing and able to assume the risks of equity investing. Investment in the Funds carries with it a degree of risk and investors should read the risk factors section in the prospectus before investing. The value of the Funds’ portfolios changes daily in accordance with the movement of underlying capital markets and the specific share price movements of the companies in whose shares each Fund invests.
Past performance is not a guide to future performance.
Performance risks
We identify the following performance risks in our Funds:



 

Market risk
The value of investments and the income from them may go down as well as up and are not guaranteed. An investor may not get back the amount originally invested. The value of an investment can be affected by changes in general market conditions, other political, social and economic developments, as well as specific matters relating to the companies in whose securities each Fund invests.


Currency risk
 Changes in the rates of exchange may cause the value of investments to go up or down.
While the Funds have share classes priced in various currencies, the base currency of all the Funds is US Dollars, and the Fund valuations for all share classes are initially calculated each dealing day in US Dollars. Non-US Dollar share classes are then converted into their respective currencies from the US Dollar valuation.
The Funds invest internationally and hold all investments in local currency. Guinness Asset Management does not conduct any hedging of currency exposure on the Funds’ capital value or income. The Funds aim to be fully invested most of the time, but any cash balances are normally held in US dollars. This means that the exposure of the Funds to any one currency is mainly limited to the value of its holdings in stocks priced in that currency. Therefore, as well as the impact of share price movements in the securities each Fund holds, the capital value of an investment in a Fund will be affected by changes in exchange rates between the stocks’ local currency, the Fund’s base currency (USD) and the currency of the Fund share class you own.


Emerging market risk
The risk inherent in a Fund is higher when it is invested in markets which may be considered ’emerging’. These Funds are only suitable for those investors who are prepared to accept the above average volatility inherent in emerging market investment.




There are other risks of investing in our funds, such as credit and counterparty risks, which are detailed in the Prospectus.
Shareholders in Guinness Global Equity Income Fund and Guinness Global Money Managers Fund should note that all or part of the fees and expenses can be charged to the capital of the Funds. Charging fees and expenses to capital has the effect of lowering the capital value of your investment.
Fund specific risks
In addition some funds carry their own specific risks:






Sector risk
Some funds invest only in companies involved in a single industry or a single sector of the market. These funds are very susceptible to the performance of that one industry or sector, and can be volatile. Examples in the Guinness fund range include:

Guinness Alternative Energy Fund
Guinness Global Energy Fund
Guinness Global Money Managers Fund




Geographic risk
Some funds invest only in stocks listed in or exposed to one single country or region. These funds are very susceptible to the performance of that one country or region, and can be volatile. Examples in the Guinness fund range include:

Guinness China & Hong Kong Fund





For more detail on the risks relating to specific products, please refer to the relevant documentation for that product.
Guinness EIS Service
An Enterprise Investment Scheme (EIS) is a government initiative to encourage investment in smaller, higher-risk companies by offering a range of tax reliefs to investors. EIS-qualifying companies can be unlisted smaller companies (companies whose shares are not quoted on any recognised stock exchange), or companies listed on the Alternative Investment Market (AIM).
The Guinness EIS Service is a discretionary managed service investing in EIS qualifying companies and managed by Guinness Asset Management Ltd, the Investment Manager. The Service comprises a range of investment themes which can be accessed by investors via a sequence of dated “offerings”. Each offering has a finite subscription period, with an opening and closing date for subscriptions. To qualify for the full range of tax benefits of an EIS investment, investors should be prepared to hold their investment for a minimum of three years. Each offering has its own Information Memorandum detailing the terms and conditions, specific risks and tax implications of investment.
The range of investment themes in the Guinness EIS Service include AIM-listed companies and Sustainable Energy companies.
An investment in the Guinness EIS Service is subject to a number of risks, both general and specific to each offering within the Service. Before making any decision to invest, prospective investors need to understand that investing in EIS-qualifying companies can be highly speculative and carries high risk. The Information Memorandum for each offering contains details of the risks involved. Investors should consider carefully whether a subscription is suitable for them in the light of the information in the Information Memorandum and their personal circumstances. Before investing, investors are strongly recommended to consult an authorised financial adviser. We recommend you seek appropriate independent advice before investing.
Past performance of the Investment Manager is no guarantee of future performance. The value of an investment in any investee company may go down as well as up and investors may not get back the full amount invested. The Investment Manager will rely on achieving an exit for the investments made in each offering in order to generate a capital gain for investors. There is no guarantee that exits will be available at the prices anticipated by the Investment Manager.
General EIS investment risks
1. Concentration risk
The Investment Manager may be unable to make sufficient investments in suitable investee companies. If sufficient investments are not made, the returns achieved by the Service could be materially impacted.
The Investment Manager intends to invest across a portfolio of investee companies to diversify exposure to any one company. However, there is a risk that the investments are concentrated or there is a weighting towards one or more sectors. In these circumstances returns to investors may be adversely affected by the underperformance of a particular company or sector.
2. Size and liquidity risk
The Guinness EIS Service invests in companies that are relatively small. Smaller investee companies can be vulnerable to government actions and changes in statute. In particular, there may be changes to the EIS legislation which may affect investors’ tax positions.
Investee companies may be reliant on the skills or knowledge of a small number of individuals, and should a key individual leave performance may be adversely affected.
Some companies’ shares in which the Investment Manager invests will be listed on AIM, other companies will be unlisted.
Listed shares
Although some companies’ shares in which the Guinness EIS Service can invest are listed on AIM, not all shares are readily realisable at all times.
Investment in shares traded on AIM involves a higher degree of risk, and such shares may be less liquid, than shares in companies which are listed on the main market of the London Stock Exchange. The rules governing AIM companies are less demanding than those of companies listed on the main market of the London Stock Exchange.
The market price of AIM-listed shares may not necessarily reflect their underlying value.
The share price of AIM-listed companies can be highly volatile and shareholdings can be illiquid. The price at which AIM-listed shares are quoted and the price at which such shares may realise will be influenced by a large number of factors, some specific to the relevant investee company and its operations, and others which may affect AIM-listed companies generally, such as legislative changes, and general economic, political, regulatory or social conditions.
Some AIM-listed companies are majority owned by connected parties who may be in a position to exert influence on the relevant investee company and their interests may differ from other shareholders.
Unlisted shares
Some offerings in the Guinness EIS Service can invest in companies which are not expected to have a listing or quotation. Therefore, there may not be a recognised or active market for the shares of investee companies and it may be difficult to sell or realise the investment or obtain reliable information about their value. Investors should not consider investing money in an offering which can hold shares in unlisted companies if their investment may be required during the life of the offering, which is normally at least three years.
Investors should not consider subscribing unless they can afford a total loss of their subscription.
Minority holdings in unquoted investments may be difficult to protect and difficult to realise. The timing of realisations of investments by the Service cannot therefore be predicted.
3. Tax risks
The tax reliefs referred to in the Information Memorandum for each offering in the Guinness EIS Service are those currently applicable. However, investors should be aware that tax reliefs can change. Their applicability and value will depend upon the individual circumstances of a given investor, and investors should seek their own independent professional advice on their particular tax situation and the application of such tax reliefs prior to making a subscription in the Service.
It is the intention of the Investment Manager to invest in companies which qualify under the EIS legislation, but there is no guarantee that EIS status can be maintained throughout the life of the Investment. Both investee companies and investors need to comply with the requirements of the EIS legislation in order to maintain EIS Income Tax Relief, CGT free disposal and CGT Deferral Relief, and non-compliance may result in the loss or partial claw-back of EIS Income Tax Relief and CGT Deferral Relief, and potential interest penalties. Subscription funds will not be returned in these instances; investments will be exited as deemed appropriate by the Investment Manager.
Shares in companies which qualify under the EIS legislation will normally qualify for Business Property Relief for Inheritance Tax purposes. In order to secure this relief investors must retain their shareholding in an investee company for a minimum of two years. The Investment Manager intends to invest in companies which qualify for EIS Relief, CGT Deferral Relief and Business Property Relief, although there is a possibility that investments will not qualify for one or more of these.
To qualify for the full range of tax benefits of an EIS investment, it is the intention of the Investment Manager that investments in qualifying companies will be held for three years. However, the Investment Manager reserves the right to realise individual investments before three years if it believes it is in the best interests of investors.
Specific EIS risks
Additional risks and uncertainties apply to each offering in the Service and the companies in which it invests. These specific risks may have an adverse effect on the business of the investee companies. Investors should consider carefully whether a subscription to the Service is suitable for them in the light of the information in the relevant Information Memorandum, and their personal circumstances.
Data Protection Notice
Any information with which you provide us will be used by Guinness Asset Management Limited and its subsidiaries. We may collect personal information from you during your use of our website.
In order to advise you of our products and services, we may collect personal data from you and we may process that data. You have the right to get a copy of the information we hold about you by sending a written request to Guinness Asset Management Ltd; you may be required to supply a valid means of identification as a security precaution to assist us in preventing the unauthorised disclosure of your personal information. You are also entitled to have Guinness Asset Management modify or delete any information that you believe is incorrect or out of date.
Guinness Asset Management Ltd is registered under the Data Protection Act 1998 and complies with the Act in all our dealing with your personal data.
Copyright
This website and the information contained within it is protected by copyright. Reproduction of all or any part of this website, or any information contained within it, is prohibited unless this is required for personal use
Cookies Policy
Below is our policy for use of cookies on this website.
Cookies Introduction
This website uses cookies (as almost all websites do) to help provide you with the best experience we can. Cookies are small text files that are placed on your computer or mobile when you browse websites.
Our cookies help:

make our website work as you’d expect;
remember your settings during and between visits;
improve the security/speed of the site;

We do not use cookies to:

collect any personal identifiable information (without your express permission);
collect any sensitive information (without your express permission);
pass personally identifiable data to third parties;
pay sales commissions.

You can learn more about all the cookies we use below.
Allowing us to use cookies
Users are notified of the use of cookies when they enter our site, along with instructions on how to disable cookies in their web browser. If the settings on your software that you are using to view this website (your browser) are adjusted to accept cookies, we take this, and your continued use of our website, to mean that this is acceptable to you.
Turning cookies off
Most modern browsers allow you to control your cookie settings. You can disable them completely by editing your browser settings. However, in doing this you may be limiting the functionality that is displayed on our website and also a large population of websites on the Internet that use cookies to serve their content.
To learn how to disable cookies on browsers please click here.
Our use of cookies
Our website stores an anonymous cookie for a period of 30 days to remember that a user, when revisiting the site, has accepted these Terms and Conditions, including notice of our use of cookies.
We use traffic log cookies to identify which pages are being used. This helps us analyse data about web page traffic and improve our website in order to tailor it to customer needs. We only use this information for statistical analysis purposes; the data is then removed from the system.
Website function cookies

Our own cookies
We use cookies to help make our website work by tracking anonymous visits to the website for statistical purposes.

Anonymous visitor statistics cookies
We use cookies to compile anonymous visitor statistics such as how many people have visited our website, what type of technology they are using (e.g Mac or Windows, which help to identify when our site isn’t working as it should for particular technologies), how long they spend on the site, what page they look at etc. This helps us to continuously improve our website.


We also use analytic programmes that tell us, for example, and on an anonymous basis, how people reached this site (e.g. from a search engine). 
To learn how to disable Google Analytics, click here.
Google Maps
We use Google Maps to give users the opportunity of visiting our business location. Google Maps only uses cookies to enable you to use the functionality of their map software. No personal information is stored on our website through the use of Google Maps.
If you are concerned about cookies tracking your movements on the Internet then you may be concerned about spyware. Spyware is the name given to a particular band of cookies that track personal information about you. There are many anti-spyware programmes that you can use to prevent this from happening. To learn more about anti-spyware software, click here.
Guinness Asset Management
Guinness Asset Management Ltd is authorised and regulated by the Financial Conduct Authority.
Registered address: 14 Queen Anne’s Gate, London SW1H 9AA
Company registration: 4647882
FCA company registration number: 223077
If you would like further information on the Financial Conduct Authority, our regulator, you can access their website here: www.fca.org.uk
Telephone calls
For your protection, telephone calls to Guinness Asset Management may be recorded.


This site uses cookies. By continuing to the site you agree to the use of cookies. You can disable cookies in your browser. To find out more click here.
By continuing to this website you accept the Terms & Conditions of the use of this site. 







Home
About us
News & Views
Literature
Funds

Global Equity Income Fund
European Equity Income Fund
Asian Equity Income Fund
Global Innovators Fund
Global Energy Fund
Alternative Energy Fund
Global Money Managers Fund
Sustainable Infrastructure EIS – Introduction
Guinness AIM EIS – Introduction


Careers
Events
 









 



















 









 



  



 


 



HomeAbout usNews & ViewsLiteratureFunds Global Equity Income Fund European Equity Income Fund Asian Equity Income Fund Global Innovators Fund Global Energy Fund Alternative Energy Fund Global Money Managers Fund Sustainable Infrastructure EIS – Introduction Guinness AIM EIS – IntroductionCareersEvents




  

 


 




 





 


Equity Income funds
Global Equity Income Fund
European Equity Income Fund
Asian Equity Income Fund

Global Growth funds
Global Innovators Fund

Specialist funds
Global Energy Fund
Alternative Energy Fund
Global Money Managers Fund

EIS & IHT Service
Guinness EIS
Guinness AIM EIS
Sustainable Infrastructure IHT

How to invest
Fund Prices
Fund Prospectus
Fund Report & Accounts
Contact Us
Register for Updates 
Follow Us on Twitter 
Follow Us on LinkedIn 

 

  



 





Guinness Global Energy Fund

Overview
Investment case
Performance
Literature
Fund facts

 




 







The Guinness Global Energy Fund gives investors exposure to global energy markets. The Fund is managed for capital growth and invests in companies in the oil, natural gas, coal, alternative energy, nuclear and utilities sectors.
We believe that over the next twenty years the combined effects of population growth, developing world industrialisation and diminishing fossil fuel supplies will force energy prices higher. The Fund aims to benefit from this environment by investing in companies with energy resources, and in their service providers and distributors.


The Guinness energy team has been managing energy portfolios since 1998. They invest long-only and run a portfolio that comprises 30 equally weighted positions. Normally 90% of the Fund is invested in companies with a market capitalisation of over $1 billion.
 White paper: How to invest in energy Request your copy 



Awards


  
 BEST FUND OVER 3 YEARSEquity Sector Natural Resources Guinness Global Energy Fund


  
BEST COMMODITY FUNDGuinness Global Energy Fund


 


Managers






Tim Guinness


 Chief Investment Officer, and founder of Guinness Asset Management in 2003.



 








Will Riley


 An energy specialist at Guinness Asset Management since 2007.Managing Guinness Global Money Managers Fund since launch in 2010.



 








Jonathan Waghorn


 Specialising in energy research and investment since 2000. 



 




Video

 Introducing Guinness Global Energy Fund

Quick links

Factsheet


Update | Jul '17
Reviewing the first half and considering the potential for the rest of 2017


Webcast | Jul '17
Performance and Portfolio review (Q3, 2017)


Insight | Apr '17
Energy equities as a good inflation hedge 


Press | Jul '17 | Interactive Investor
Seven fund alternatives to equities and bonds







 In brief: why invest in energy?
 Energy investment case
 Fund managers
 Investment process
 Portfolio construction & risk controls

In brief: why invest in energy?
Energy demandPopulation growth and rising global wealth are driving relentless growth in the consumption of energy.Energy supplyDespite improvements in alternative energy supplies, fossil fuels will remain the predominant world energy source for decades to come. However, the era of easily accessible, low-cost oil is over.Energy company profitsRising demand and depletion of low-cost energy supplies will push energy prices higher. This will create a favourable environment for companies with resource reserves, as well as their service providers and distributors.Energy & inflationEnergy prices are a significant driver of inflation, which makes energy companies a useful long-term inflation hedge. If we see dollar inflation of 30-50% over the next decade (that’s just 2.7-4.3% per year), it will be surprising if oil and gas prices do not rise by a comparable percentage.
 White paper: How to invest in energy Request your copy 
Energy investment case
“More motor vehicles will be sold over the next 20 years than have been sold in the entire history of the automobile industry.”
Surging demand for energy from developing countries
The world's population is growing at a rate of 1% per year, and is projected by the UN to rise by a further 20% (1.5 billion people) by 2030. Over 90% of this growth will come from developing countries. The implications for energy consumption are profound.
More motor vehicles will be sold over the next 20 years than have been sold throughout the entire history of the automobile industry. The surge of demand for electricity, cars and consumer goods in emerging markets will have a significant impact on the world's energy balance. China’s demand for oil per capita has not yet reached that of the OECD in 1950. There are 20 years of unrelenting oil demand growth to come as China’s vehicle fleet moves from 100 million now to 400 million by 2030, with numerous other countries following behind.
The rise in global energy demand is projected to continue long into the future. It is likely that the majority of this demand will be met by mainstream energy sources like oil, natural gas and coal.
The world’s oil consumption currently stands at around 94 million barrels per day, and continues to reach new highs each year. Even in the global recession of 2008/09, demand for oil from emerging markets continued to grow. We think that, over the next 10 years, global oil demand growth of 10-15 million barrels per day is highly plausible.
Supply is struggling to keep pace
High oil and natural gas prices between 2006 and 2014 incentivised energy companies to invest in new technologies, resulting in strong natural gas and oil production from unconventional shale resources in North America. This growth caused a change of production strategy from OPEC at the end of 2014, and this has led to sharply lower oil prices as OPEC grows production and defends market share while North American production starts to slow.  We believe that OPEC is now producing near maximum capacity, while non-OPEC production will decline in the future as a result of lower investment levels. The industry still faces a big challenge in delivering reasonable oil supply growth at reasonable prices.
Favourable environment for investing in energy
The combination of growing demand and inadequate future supply signals that oil and other energy prices will move up over time. This would create a very favourable environment for companies with energy resources and for their service providers and distributors.
The Guinness Global Energy Fund seeks to capitalise on this energy price environment. We keep coming back to one key proposition: easily extractable oil and gas assets remain scarce, and it seems reasonable to believe that, as they get scarcer, they will trade at higher prices than we have yet seen. We believe shareholders in energy companies that are part of that world will be duly rewarded.
Fund managers


Tim Guinness

Tim Guinness is the founder and Chief Investment Officer of Guinness Asset Management and Guinness Atkinson Asset Management, our sister US business. He has over 35 years’ investment experience. 
He founded Guinness Flight Global Asset Management Ltd in 1987 and was CEO (or joint CEO) from 1987 to 1999 and a portfolio manager of the Global Equity Fund. After Investec acquired Guinness Flight in 1998, he was Chairman of the company during the transition into Investec, as well as lead manager of the Investec Global Energy Fund.
In 2003 he left Investec to set up Guinness Asset Management, which was appointed the outsource manager of Investec Global Energy Fund. 
Tim graduated from Cambridge University with a degree in engineering. He then completed a Master’s Degree in Management Science at the Sloan School M.I.T. in the United States.
Tim is co-manager of the Guinness Global Energy Fund and the Guinness Global Money Managers Fund.  
 


Will Riley

Will joined Guinness Asset Management in May 2007, and is co-manager of Guinness Global Energy Fund and the Guinness Global Money Managers Fund.
Prior to joining Guinness, Will was employed by PricewaterhouseCoopers for six years, first in the London Middle Market Assurance Team, then as a valuation specialist in the Valuation & Strategy division. Will qualified as a Chartered Accountant in 2003 and graduated from the University of Cambridge with a Master’s Degree in Geography.
 


Jonathan Waghorn

Jonathan joined Guinness Asset Management in September 2013 and is co-manager of Guinness Global Energy Fund. 
Jonathan has 17 years’ experience in the energy sector. He was a Shell drilling engineer in the Dutch North Sea and worked as an energy consultant with Wood Mackenzie before becoming co-head of Goldman Sachs energy equity research in 2000.  He joined Investec as co-manager on the Investec Global Energy Fund in 2008 where he helped grow the energy franchise at Investec to a peak of nearly $3.5bn in 2011. Jonathan then joined Mercuria in 2012 to build an equities and fund management business based around the provision of external funds before joining Guinness Asset Management in 2013.
 

Investment process
Our stock selection is driven 50% by our top-down (macro) views and 50% by bottom-up stock analysis. The top-down views shape our energy sub-sector allocation, whilst bottom-up analysis is designed to identify the best stocks to populate our sub-sector allocation. The investment team applies a mixture of value and growth investing, with a bias towards value.



Key energy equity sub-sectors


Integrateds
Exploration & production


Oil Services
Canadian oil sands


Refiners
Emerging market energy


Coal producers
Nuclear



Top-down views
Rigorous independent analysis of the fundamental drivers of energy markets (e.g. oil supply and demand; OPEC behaviour; natural gas supply and demand; global LNG market; thermal and met coal markets). This allows us to forecast energy commodity prices and creates our top-down view, which in turn informs our energy sub-sector allocation.



Guinness stock screening


Quality
Return on investment


Valuation
HOLT relative valuation


Earnings
Analysts’ earnings forecast revisions


Momentum
Price movements versus peers



Bottom-up stock screening
The team operates a disciplined stock screening process. We review a universe of around 370 energy stocks each week to identify companies which look attractive on valuation, return on investment, earnings sentiment, and price momentum. Other screens specific to certain sub-sectors are also employed to generate ideas.
Stock due diligence
Stock ideas are taken from our screens and due diligence is performed to establish whether we have conviction to include the stock in our portfolio. The due diligence centres around detailed financial modelling.
Portfolio construction
Equally-weighted portfolio
The portfolio comprises 30 equally-weighted positions. Most of the positions comprise a single stock but a few are split across more than one stock, giving the portfolio 40-45 stocks in total. Our equally-weighted portfolio construction is designed create the best balance between maintaining fund concentration and managing stock-specific risk. It also imposes a structural sell discipline: an existing position must be sold to purchase a new holding.
Sector weights
The Fund does not follow any benchmark in its sub-sector weights. In particular, there are no underweight restrictions; the “super-major” oil and gas sector weighting may be zero.
Portfolio risk controls
Stock specific risk
Stock specific risk in the energy sector tends to be higher than the broader market. By constructing the Fund of 30 equally-weighted positions, we avoid significant exposure to any one individual stock.
Emerging market exposure
Normal practice is that emerging market exposure (considered by listing and by underlying asset exposure) is limited to 20% of the Fund.
Liquidity
The portfolio is liquid, with 90% of the Fund normally invested in companies with a market capitalisation over US $1 billion.
Currency
The Fund is not hedged from a currency perspective. However, because the underlying investments have an exposure to energy commodity prices, this tends to act as a natural hedge against currency movement.









Fund
Global Energy Fund
Date (period end)
30.06.2017


Index
MSCI World Energy Index
Fund Launch
31.3.2008


Basis
Total return, in USD





Please remember that past performance is not a guide to future performance. The value of an investment and the income from it can fall as well as rise as a result of market and currency movement, and you may not get back the amount originally invested.




Cumulative performance (USD, %)
				


E class 
(OCF: 1.24%)
Year-to-date
1 
year
3 
years
5 
years
Team history 
(31.12.98) (1)


Fund
-15.66
-6.87
-47.33
-14.02
446.97


Index
-9.28
-0.84
-29.73
2.00
231.67







Annualised performance (USD, %)


E class 
(OCF: 1.24%)
1 
year
3 
years
5 
years
10 
years (1)
Team history 
(31.12.98) (1)


Fund
-6.87
-19.22
-2.97
-2.59
9.61


Index
-0.84
-11.09
0.40
-0.24
6.69







Calendar year performance (USD, %)
				


E class 
(OCF: 1.24%)
2012
2013
2014
2015
2016


Fund
24.38
-19.05
-27.57
27.87
-15.66


Index
18.93
-10.95
-22.10
27.63
-9.28







Discrete year performance to date (USD, %)
				


E class (OCF: 1.24%)
12 months ending:
Jun-13
Jun-14
Jun-15
Jun-16
Jun-17


Fund
12.00
45.74
-35.04
-12.93
-6.87


Index
10.36
31.53
-25.74
-4.57
-0.84



Source: Bloomberg & Guinness Asset Management Ltd, bid to bid basis, total return.
Notes
(1) Simulated (composite) past performance prior to 31.3.08, the launch date of this Fund. The Guinness Global Energy investment team has been running global energy funds in accordance with the same methodology continuously since November 1998. These returns are calculated using a composite of the Investec GSF Global Energy Fund class A from 31 December 1998 to 29 February 2008 (managed by the Guinness team until this date); the Guinness Atkinson Global Energy Fund (sister US mutual fund) from March 1 2008 to March 31 2008 (launch date of this Fund) and the Guinness Global Energy Fund class B since launch. Calculations by Guinness Asset Management Limited. All returns for periods starting after 02.09.08 are based on the Fund's E Class.

 White paper: How to invest in energy Request your copy 

Guinness Global Energy Report

Jul '17
Reviewing the first half and considering the potential for the rest of 2017


Jun '17
June update


May '17
Oil price weakens: why?


Apr '17
April update


Mar '17
March update


Feb '17
February update


Jan '17
2017 Outlook for energy


Dec '16
Implications of the OPEC production cut


Nov '16
OPEC & Trump


Sep '16
Efficiency gains coming into play


 Sign up for our monthly Global Energy Report by email   Archive


Webcasts

Jul '17
Performance and Portfolio review (Q3, 2017)
 Archive

Insights

Apr '17
Energy equities as a good inflation hedge
The Guinness Global Energy team explains the case for energy equities as an inflation hedge


Feb '17
It’s about return on capital as much as it is about the oil priceThe Guinness Global Energy Team take a closer look at ROCE


Dec '16
OPEC announces first production cut in 8 yearsThe Guinness Global Energy Team assess OPEC’s recent agreement to cut production levels


Sep '16
Has OPEC just blinked?The Guinness Global Energy Team assess OPEC’s recent agreement to cut production levels


Dec '15
OPEC maintains market share strategy
The Guinness Global Energy Team assess the impact of OPEC’s decision to maintain their market share strategy at their December 2015 meeting.


Nov '15
Outlook for US oil production
The Guinness Global Energy Team provide a detailed update on how US oil production is being affected by lower oil prices and a few thoughts on how it could look at the end of 2015 and into 2016.


Oct '15
If it’s darkest before dawn, what time is it now?
Jonathan Waghorn puts a brutal summer for energy markets in its historical context, and analyses the future of the supply-demand mix.


Oct '15
 VIDEO: Tim Guinness on the battered oil price
Tim Guinness reveals what is happening to the battered oil price, how long it will remain low and whether income investors should sell BP and Shell.


Jan '15
2015 Outlook for Energy
The Guinness Global Energy team give their thoughts on the prospects for the energy sector amid falling oil prices.


Dec '14
OPEC’s Thanksgiving
The Guinness Global Energy team give their assessment of OPEC’s decision not to cut production, and what it means for oil prices and energy equities.

 Archive


Press

Interactive Investor | Jul '17
Seven fund alternatives to equities and bonds
Dzmitry Lipski looks at the options available to investors as an alternative to equities and bonds


FE Trustnet | Mar '16
 Prospects for oil
Oil has rallied recently and Jonathan Waghorn and Will Riley, managers of the Guinness Global Energy fund, argue it could recover further from here.


Investment Week | Feb '16
Iranian oil and oil price volatility
Jonathan Waghorn, Guinness Global Energy co-manager, warns that Iran’s entry to the oil market could delay the rebalancing of global oversupply, but rebalancing is coming nonetheless.


Investment Week | Oct '15
 When will oil prices rebound?
In a Q&A with Investment Week, Guinness Global Energy co-manager Jonathan Waghorn explains why a supply/demand convergence is on the horizon.


Morningstar | Jan '15
Fund in focus: “An outstanding team”
“A highly experienced management team and prudent portfolio construction continue to make the Guinness Global Energy fund a strong choice for investors seeking exposure to the energy sector.”


Citywire | Dec '14
 Stock picks amid oil price slump
Jonathan Waghorn picks out the stocks he is backing as oil prices fall to their lowest level in five years.


Investment Week | Sep '14
How ‘cheap and struggling’ oil majors can bounce back
Investment Week question manager Will Riley on the rally in energy equities.


Investment Week | Aug '14
Investment Week – What’s behind the turnaround in energy
Jonathan Waghorn says energy equities have underperformed for three years, and now could be an interesting entry point.


TRUSTNET | Jun '14
Funds to access the value in Energy
Trustnet’s John MacMahon identifies Guinness Global Energy as a top fund for accessing the value in Energy equities.


CNBC | Jun '14
 Video: Is crude oil heading to $150?
Jonathan Waghorn discusses crude oil markets and portfolio holdings on CNBC.


The Daily Telegraph | Dec '13
  VIDEO: “Oil stocks will outperform the FTSE 100”
Talking with The Daily Telegraph, Tim Guinness says stock prices are lagging the oil spot price – but they will catch up.


Investment Compass | Jun '13
 VIDEO: Is now the time for Energy?
Tim Guinness talks with Investment Compass and considers why now might be a good time to consider investing in energy stocks.


Fund Strategy | Apr '13
 Energy offers solid inflation hedge
Will Riley in Fund Strategy says the future for energy equities looks exciting as many are cheap and overlooked

 Archive


Key documents

Factsheet
English | French
German | Italian


 KIIDs


Report & Accounts


Prospectus
Global Energy Fund Supplement
UK Country Supplement


Application form


Redemption form


Key documents for overseas investors on fundinfo.com
 For German investors
 For Swiss investors






Fact sheets


For information on the Fund’s current investments, please see the latest fact sheet:
English
French
German
Italian






Key facts


Launch date
31/03/2008


Fund managers
(start date)
Tim Guinness (31/03/2008) 
Will Riley (01/01/2010) Jonathan Waghorn (09/09/2013)


Benchmark
MSCI World Energy Index


IA sector
IA Global


Structure
OEIC (UCITS)


Domicile
Ireland


Redemption fee
2% within 30 days of purchase






 


Underlying currency
US Dollar


Pricing
Daily, forwards


Valuation
2300 Dublin time


Deal cut off time
1500 Dublin time


Year end
31 December


Administrator
Capita Financial Administrators (Ireland) Ltd


Custodian
JP Morgan Bank (Ireland) plc


UK Reporting Fund status
Yes


ISA Eligible
Yes






Share classes



1.24% OCF
1.49% OCF
1.99% OCF


Currency
USD
GBP
USD
EUR
USD
GBP
EUR


Accumulation or Distribution
Acc
Acc
Acc
Acc
Acc
Acc
Acc


Name
E
X
A
D
B
C
C EUR Acc


Initial charge
0%
0%
0%
0%
2%
5%
5%


OCF* (total ongoing charges p.a.)
1.24%
1.24%
1.49%
1.49%
1.99%
1.99%
1.99%


Minimum direct investment
$10,000,000
£5,000,000
$200,000
€ 100,000
$1,000
£1,000
€ 1,000


Minimum platform investment Guinness Asset Management minimums do not apply. Platforms apply their own minimum investment levels. 


ISIN Code
IE00B3CCJC95
IE00B6XV0016
IE00B2Q91T05
IE00B3CCJB88
IE00B2Q91V27
IE00B3CCJ963
IE00BGHQF524


SEDOL
B3CCJC9
B6XV001
B2Q91T0
B3CCJB8
B2Q91V2
B3CCJ96
BGHQF52


Bloomberg ticker
GUINGEE ID
GUINGEX ID
GUINGEA ID
GUINGED ID
GUINGEB ID
GUINGEC ID
GUINCEU ID


Country registrations
UK, CH, FIN, FR, LUX, SGP (all classes); GER (A, B, D & E classes).



*OCF = Ongoing Charges Figure, which includes the annual management charge.


Country codes

UK United Kingdom
CH Switzerland
LUX Luxembourg
FIN Finland
SGP Singapore (professional only)
GER Germany
FR France




  

 


 





























Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft















Guinness Asset Management Limited






























































 
















 



info@kuber.uk.com
+44 (0) 20 7952 6685 











 
Open MenuHome
About Us

Our Team
Administrator
Terms and Conditions
Legal Disclaimer
Anti-Bribery and Corruption


Why Kuber?

How does Kuber work?
Kuber Vision
Testimonials


Investment Managers

Cost of the investment – Manager rebates.
Investment Fund Closure Forecast
Kuber Model Portfolios
Fund in Focus


KuberView+
Document Library
News
Contacts
 






 







Guinness Asset Management Ltd
Manager Overview
Guinness Asset Management is a London-based specialist fund management company. Together with its US sister company, Guinness Atkinson Asset Management, the firm currently manages £600 million.
The Guinness team has a strong investment track record. Since 2010, the Guinness EIS team has raised and invested over £50 million into EIS qualifying companies for a large number of clients invested across renewable energy and AIM-listed companies.
The Investment Committee, which includes Lord Flight, Chairman of the EIS Association and Tim Guinness, CEO of Guinness Asset Management, brings extensive UK investing experience to the Guinness team. As well as its EIS and IHT offerings, Guinness Asset Management provides a range of actively managed, long-only equity portfolios designed to deliver real returns for long term investors.

Further information can be found at www.guinnessfunds.com.

Schemes on the Platform
 Guinness AIM EIS 2016
 Guinness EIS
 Guinness Sustainable Inheritance Planning Service






Investment Funds

Investment Fund Closure Forecast
Cost of the investment – Manager rebates.
Kuber Ventures Investment Governance Process
Kuber Model Portfolios
Fund in Focus


Amersham Investment Management Limited

Amersham Corporate Development Capital EIS (ACDC)
AMIM Marechale Odexia
Start-Up Series SEIS Fund One


Atlantic Screen Scores EIS
Blackfinch

Blackfinch Asset Focused EIS
Blackfinch EIS Media Portfolios
Blackfinch IHT Portfolios


Boundary Capital

Boundary Capital Alternative Investment EIS/SEIS


CHF

CHF Media Fund EIS Portfolio
CHF Media Fund EIS/SEIS Portfolio


Deepbridge

Deepbridge Technology
Deepbridge Life Sciences
Deepbridge IHT Service


Enterprise Investment Partners

The Imbiba Leisure EIS
Epicure SEIS Fund
Hindsight Media EIS Fund


Goldfinch

Goldfinch SEIS
Goldfinch Film EIS 2


Guinness Asset Management

Guinness AIM EIS
Guinness EIS
Guinness Sustainable Inheritance Planning


Jenson Funding Partners LLP

Jenson SEIS and EIS Fund 4


Mariana Capital Markets LLP

Mariana Waste Management EIS
Mariana Estate Planning Solution


Seed Mentors

Seed Mentors SEIS
Seed Advantage EIS Fund


Seneca Partners

Seneca EIS Service
Seneca Managed Storage EIS No 2
Seneca Inheritance


Symvan Capital

Symvan Technology EIS Fund
Symvan Technology SEIS Fund 2


Closed Funds

AMIM OxTech Asteroid Series SEIS
Anaerobic Digestion Renewable Energy EIS Fund (Marechale Capital). Fund raising now completed
Blackfinch SEIS Music Portfolios
Guinness Sustainable Infrastructure EIS
Guinness Sustainable Energy EIS 6
Highgate

Highgate Tech Fund LLP


Mariana Water Turbine EIS
Seneca Managed Storage EIS
Titan Storage EIS


 









 



				IMPORTANT NEWS			

Kuber Ventures is delighted to announce the full launch of KuberView+
Following its successful trial with advisers and fund managers KuberView+ is now available to investors too.
Building on the existing Kuber Portal, KuberView+ is designed to track an investment from its origin, providing a ‘single’ view at both adviser and client level and monitoring investments from the point at which they clear the first level screening to their eventual exit.
The launch of KuberView+ is part of a phased development programme and this release will provide Advisers and Investors alike with a clearer and more user friendly experience, allowing users to examine data relating to investments in detail. Specifically, Advisers and Investors will be able to view:
Expected drawdown of funds into selected portfolios
Development of investments
Progress of individual applications
Provision of EIS/SEIS certificates relating to investments
As of today (1 February 2017) access to the original portal will be switched off. Following the archiving of the original portal and the transition to KuberView+, Kuber will provide support through its Client Services team and additional tutorials as necessary.



Please log on here to KuberView+
You will be prompted to enter your username and click sign in.
In doing so this will generate a log in token which will be sent to your email inbox.
Please click the link provided in the email to access KuberView+.
Please be aware that KuberView+ works best in browsers such as Google Chrome, Mozilla Firefox or Internet Explorer. Users accessing KuberView+ via Microsoft Edge may experience difficulty opening pdf documents due to a known fault in the browser’s design.




			×            



























Guinness Asset Management Ltd. - Relationship Science



























































                      NEWS HOME
                    

Advertising
Board and Executive Moves
Energy
Health Care
Hedge Funds
M & A
Private Equity
Technology








            You have  
            
9 free profiles

              left this month   
			      

                Start Your Free Trial ➤
              








            Hey, we noticed you're a RelSci Pro subscriber! Would you like to view the page there?
            

                View on RelSci Pro ➤
              




























































































































Email







LinkedIn







Facebook







Google+







Tweet







Reddit





Permalink





Guinness Asset Management Ltd.



Overview
In The News Executives & Employees Board of Directors Paths
Holdings & Top Positions



Guinness Asset Management Ltd.



 OVERVIEW



Date Founded


2003




Headquarters


Buckingham Court, 78 Buckingham Gate, Suite 2.4, London, London & South East Sw1e 6pe




Industries


Investment Services & Portfolio Management




Company Description


Guinness AM is an active, value-based manager which combines strategic sector selection with a fundamental screening process to identify specific stock opportunities, aiming to invest in attractively valued energy companies which offer long-term growth.  They focus on Asia, energy, innovation and alternative energy themes.The firm performs macroeconomic analysis to identify attractive sectors to overweight, utilizing quantitative screening to prioritize stock research activity and conducting fundamental due diligence to select individual stocks.Guinness AM uses a screening method that ranks quality, attractive valuation, sentiment and investor demand to select companies, building profit and loss models, balance sheets, cash flow statements and conducting sensitivity analysis. They emphasize quantitative numerical analysis over softer considerations, purchasing stocks when they score well on more valuation criteria than other candidates and when conviction is strong. They aim to keep trading activity and turnover as low as practicable.




Website


http://www.guinnessfunds.com






 In The News
          See more




Investment & Pensions Europe
May 6, 2016





                        Friday people roundup                    





Fund Strategy
May 5, 2016





                        M&G duo join Guinness for energy fund launch                    





CNNMoney
December 21, 2014





                        Meet the world's No. 1 dealer in Guinness art                    





Fund Strategy
October 28, 2014





                        Guinness unveils Irish Global Innovators fund                    





Investment Adviser
April 14, 2014





                        Rayner Spencer Mills adds eight funds to rated list                    







See full news coverage and complete stories with RelSci Professional.

Create Your News Feed








See  More 





 Executives & Employees



Timothy Whitmore Newton Guinness

Founder & Chief Investment Officer




James Joseph Atkinson

Director





Edmund James Harriss

Director & Senior Portfolio Manager




Giles Robinette

Chief Accountant, Finance & Compliance Officer





Mark James Hammonds

Fund Advisor




Andrew Everard Martin-Smith

Adviser





Jonathan Charles Waghorn

Fund Manager




Dayrell Shane Gallwey

Fund Manager





Malcolm King

Investment Manager




Edward Benjamin Newton Guinness

Fund Manager







See our list of current and previous employees when you upgrade.

Start My Free Trial ➤








See  More 


 



                          Board of Directors                        



Timothy Whitmore Newton Guinness

Founder & Chief Investment Officer at Guinness Asset Management Ltd.







See our list of current and previous board members when you upgrade.

Start My Free Trial ➤








See  More 


 


 Paths to Guinness Asset Management Ltd.



                        Guinness Asset Management Ltd.                    




 You



 Connections via Relationship Science



 Guinness Asset Management Ltd.






Sync your contacts to see how you can connect with Guinness Asset Management Ltd..

Start My Free Trial ➤








See  More 


 


 Holdings & Top Positions






Restricted data only for RelSci Professional users.

Start My Free Trial ➤








See  More 


 



You've reached your 10 free profiles limit this month.
Upgrade to RelSci Pro today to enjoy unlimited article views and much more!

Start My Free Trial  ➤

Still not convinced? Check out our full listing of features here.















Are you a RelSci Pro Subscriber?

Login to RelSci Pro 
                        ➤


Not a Pro Subscriber? Log in here to manage your alerts









 Keep me signed in.
        

Login  ➤



        Forgot your Password?
    

























 I have read the LexisNexis terms & conditions




Sign Me Up  ➤









































Guinness Global Equity Income | Guinness Asset Management Ltd | Fund factsheets | FE Trustnet


















 

















Trustnet








Login


















To continue using this website, please tell us a  little about yourself:
 I am a financial adviser
 I am a discretionary fund manager / multimanager
 I am a financial paraplanner
 I work in financial services
 I am a private investor


   This site uses cookies.  Some of the cookies are essential for parts of the site to operate and have already been set.  
   You may delete and block all cookies from this site, but if you do, parts of the site may not work.  To find out more 
   about cookies on the website and how to delete cookies, see our Privacy and Cookie Policy.
   
 I accept the FE Trustnet cookie policy


Continue

For more information Click here






Investments

Unit Trusts & OEICs

Unit Trusts & OEICs Home
Prices & Performance
Multi-manager & Mixed Asset
Special Reports
UT&OEIC Ratings
A-Z Fund Factsheets
A-Z Group Factsheets
A-Z Sectors
Funds Guide
Most viewed funds
Most viewed groups


IA Unit Trusts & OEICs

IA Unit Trusts & OEICs Home
Prices & Performance
Multi-manager & Mixed Asset
Special Reports
IA UT&OEIC Ratings
A-Z Fund Factsheets
A-Z Group Factsheets
A-Z Sectors
Funds Guide
Most viewed funds
Most viewed groups


Equities

Equities Home
Prices & Performance
A-Z Equity Factsheets
Latest announcements


Investment Trusts

Investment Trusts Home
Prices & Performance
Investment Trust Ratings
A-Z Investment Trust Factsheets
A-Z Group Factsheets
A-Z Warrants
A-Z Sectors
Split Capital Analytics
Investment Trust Guide
Most viewed investment trusts
Most viewed groups


Pensions

Pensions Home
Prices & Performance
Pension Fund Ratings
A-Z Pension Fund Factsheets
A-Z Group Factsheets
A-Z Pension Product Factsheets
A-Z Sectors
Most viewed funds
Most viewed groups


Life

Life Home
Prices & Performance
A-Z Life Fund Ratings
A-Z Life Fund Factsheets
A-Z Life Group Factsheets
A-Z Life Product Factsheets
A-Z Sectors
Life insurance glossary
Most viewed funds
Most viewed groups


Offshore Funds

Offshore Funds Home
Prices & Performance
Offshore Fund Ratings
A-Z Offshore Fund Factsheets
A-Z Group Factsheets
A-Z Sectors
Offshore Funds Guide
Most viewed funds
Most viewed groups


ETFs

ETFs Home
ETF Prices & Performance
ETF Fund Ratings
A-Z ETF Factsheets
A-Z Group Factsheets
A-Z Sectors
ETFs Guide
Most viewed funds
Most viewed groups


VCTs

VCTs Home
VCT Prices & Performance
A-Z VCT Factsheets
VCTs Guide
Most viewed funds
Most viewed groups


Structured Products

Structured Products Home
A-Z Structured Product Factsheets
A-Z Group Factsheets
Structured products guide
Structured products glossary




Fund Managers

Fund Managers Home
Alpha managers
League table 
A-Z manager factsheets 


News & Research

News & Research Home
News Archive
Education guides

Education guides home
Emerging Market

ETFs
Unit Trust & OEIC

Investment trust


                                Offshore funds 
ISAs 


FE Trustnet Videos 
Bright-talk Videos 


Learning

Learn about investing
Investment basics

Pensions
Investing in a fund
Investment trusts
Exchange
                                Traded Funds (ETFs)
Passive funds
                                and trackers
What is an ISA?


What to invest in?

Bonds
Equities
Property
Commodities


Where to invest?

UK
US
Europe
Emerging markets
Asia


How to invest?


                                Setting objectives for your portfolio
Asset allocation
                                - the basics
Measuring performance

                                Onshore and offshore - what’s the difference


Fund ratings

About FE Ratings
FE Crown Fund Ratings
FE Passive Fund Ratings
FE Alpha Manager
                                Ratings
FE Risk Scores
The Adviser Fund
                                Index




Portfolio

Portfolio Home
Watchlist
Alerts


Tools

Home
Fundswire

Fundswire Home
Manage my alerts


Charting
Find an IFA
Pension Calculator
IFA tools

IFA tools home
FE AFI
Client Fund Profiler
Structured Products
Whitelabel Factsheets




Passive FundsNew

Passive Funds Homepage
Sectors

UK Equities
North American Equities
European Equities
Japanese Equities
Emerging Market Equities
UK Gilts
Property
Sterling Corporate Bonds
Index-Linked Gilts









Reading List




Clear all list



0


Your Basket


Aberdeen Global Indian Equity D2 GBP 





Open basket


















Login







Select Account..




Login
 Remember Me

Password Reminder
Not Registered? Click Here







Register





*

*

*



*


*

Choose a User Type
I am a financial adviser
I am a discretionary fund manager / multimanager
I am a financial paraplanner
I work in financial services
I am a private investor

*
 I accept your terms of use
 Send me FE Trustnet bulletins
Register





It's look like you're leaving us

            What would you like us to do with the funds you've selected
        
Show me all my options
        Forget them
        Save them 

            Remember my choice











        Customise this table











Home

»


Guinness Asset Management Ltd

»

Guinness Global Equity Income



Guinness Global Equity Income






Change Share Class?


Guinness Global Equity Income Y Acc GBP

Guinness Global Equity Income A USD
Guinness Global Equity Income B USD
Guinness Global Equity Income C Acc GBP
Guinness Global Equity Income C Acc USD
Guinness Global Equity Income C EUR
Guinness Global Equity Income C GBP
Guinness Global Equity Income D EUR
Guinness Global Equity Income E USD
Guinness Global Equity Income X GBP
Guinness Global Equity Income Y Acc EUR
Guinness Global Equity Income Y Acc USD
Guinness Global Equity Income Y Dis EUR
Guinness Global Equity Income Y Dis GBP
Guinness Global Equity Income Y Dis USD
Guinness Global Equity Income Z GBP



Select Performance Currency


Pound Sterling

Fund's Currency









Buy Fund
Add to Basket 
Factsheet PDF 
Group Factsheet
Classic Factsheet





More





 Close
Key Information


What is the Fund’s objective?
How has this fund performed?
Ratios and analysis
Prices and Codes
What does this fund invest in?
News and research about this fund
Contact Details




Options
Show group factsheets
Download factsheet PDF









Next steps
Buy this fund via Trustnet Direct
Add to Basket
Follow this fund on









Fund Centre
Performance
Dividends
Breakdown

                    History












            What is the Fund’s objective?


        The investment objective of the Fund is to provide investors with both income and long-term capital appreciation.
    




How does FE rate this fund?





No FE Alpha managers





3




Not included in the AFI







Learn more about ratings 
Compare funds using ratings







Who manages this fund?









 Ian Mortimer Since 31-Dec-2010

                            Ian joined Guinness Asset Management in December 2006 and is co-manager of the Guinness Global Equity Income Fund, the...

                                    Co-manager








 Matthew Page Since 31-Dec-2010

                            Matthew joined Guinness Asset Management in 2005 and is the co-manager of the Guinness Global Equity Income Fund, the...

                                    Co-manager





Show all

Learn more about fund managers
Compare fund managers







Literature & Downloads




Provider's own Factsheet
Key Investor Information Document
Prospectus
Manager's Report - Final




News and research related to this fund







Close X


                Current Managers:






 Ian Mortimer
Since 31-Dec-2010

                            Ian joined Guinness Asset Management in December 2006 and is co-manager of the Guinness Global Equity Income Fund, the Guinness European Equity Income Fund and the...

                                    Co-manager

View manager factsheet






 Matthew Page
Since 31-Dec-2010

                            Matthew joined Guinness Asset Management in 2005 and is the co-manager of the Guinness Global Equity Income Fund, the Guinness European Equity Income Fund and the...

                                    Co-manager

View manager factsheet



                Previous Managers:

There is no previous managers for this fund











                        How has this fund performed?





Cumulative Performance chart










                                        3 Months

                                        6 Months

                                        1 Year

                                        3 Years

                                        5 Years




View event history 




Cumulative Performance as at 27/07/2017



                                     
                                

                                     
                                

                                    3m
                                

                                    6m
                                

                                    1yr
                                

                                    3yrs
                                

                                    5yrs
                                






Guinness Global Equity Income Y Acc GBP


                                    +2.7
                                

                                   +5.8
                                

                                    +10.5
                                

                                   +45.7
                                

                                   +93.9
                                






Equity - International


                                    +4.1
                                

                                   +6.9
                                

                                    +16.5
                                

                                   +45.3
                                

                                   +87.7
                                






Top performing funds


Create a custom chart of this fund's performance






Discrete Performance chart











View event history 




 



                                     
                                

                                     
                                

                                    0- 12m
                                

                                    12m- 24m
                                

                                    24m- 36m
                                

                                    36m- 48m
                                

                                    48m- 60m
                                






Guinness Global Equity Income Y Acc GBP


                                     +10.5
                                

                                   +24.1
                                

                                     +6.2
                                

                                      +5.2
                                

                                     +26.5
                                






Equity - International


                                     +16.5
                                

                                   +14.8
                                

                                     +8.7
                                

                                      +4.2
                                

                                     +23.9
                                






Check how your portfolios are currently performing


More performance charts













Forensic News Alerts




Forensic News Alerts





Get Fundswire alerts emailed to you











Ratios and Analysis


How does this fund compare against other funds in Equity - International?


Quartile Ranking





                                     
                                

                                     
                                

                                    1y
                                

                                    3y
                                



?


                                    Position
                                

                                    392 / 471
                                

                                    206 / 379
                                



?


                                    Quartile
                                

                                   4
                                

                                     3
                                



Ranking is for the main unit within the sector
View other funds in this sector


Other Rating




Morningstar AnalystRating










                            Ratio Info





                                     
                                

                                     
                                

                                    1y
                                

                                    3y
                                



?


                                    Volatility
                                

                                   7.56
                                

                                    10.19
                                



?


                                    Alpha
                                

                                      -3.50
                                

                                    0.46
                                



?


                                    Beta
                                

                                      0.98
                                

                                     1.02
                                



?


                                    Sharpe
                                

                               1.67
                                

                                   0.98
                                



?


                                    Info Ratio
                                

                                    -1.75
                                

                                     0.13
                                



?


                                    R2


                                    0.91
                                

                                    0.78
                                



?
                                    Quartiles:1
2
3

                                            4








                            Risk Score



                            FE Risk scores allow you to see how risky a fund is in comparison with the FTSE
                            100.




                                This fund:
                            

102




                                FTSE 100:
                            

100




                                Cash:
                            

0





Learn about FE Risk Scores






                            Investment Details





Charges 




                                    Initial
                                

                                    0.00%
                                



                                   Annual
                                

                                    0.50%
                                



?


                                    OCF
                                

                                     0.99%
                                



?


                                    Performance Fee
                                

                                0% 
                                  
                                 





                                    Minimum Investment?




                                    Initial
                                

                                    £ 5,000,000
                                



                                    Additional
                                

                                    £ 1,000
                                















Prices





                                     
                                

                                    Unit type
                                

                                    Currency
                                

                                    Bid
                                

                                    Offer
                                

                                    Date
                                

                                    Yield
                                

                                    Citicode
                                

                                    SEDOL
                                

                                    ISIN
                                



                                    Guinness Global Equity Income Y Acc GBP
                                

                                    ACC
                                

                                    GBP
                                

                                    13.24
                                

                                    27 Jul 2017
                                

                                    n/a
                                

                                    M67M
                                

                                    BVYPNY2
                                

                                    IE00BVYPNY24
                                




Change the share class at the top of the page to see details of other share classes for this fund.









                        What does this fund invest in?




Asset Class Breakdown (30 Jun 2017)  






                                        Rank
                                    



                                        Asset 
                                    

                                        %  
                                    

                                         
                                    



                                        1
                                    




                                        US Equities
                                    

                                        51.00
                                    







                                        2
                                    




                                        UK Equities
                                    

                                        14.00
                                    



                                        3
                                    




                                        Dutch Equities
                                    

                                        5.70
                                    



                                        4
                                    




                                        French Equities
                                    

                                        5.50
                                    



                                        5
                                    




                                        International Equities
                                    

                                        4.40
                                    



                                        6
                                    




                                        Israeli Equities
                                    

                                        3.00
                                    



                                        7
                                    




                                        Danish Equities
                                    

                                        3.00
                                    



                                        8
                                    




                                        Australian Equities
                                    

                                        2.90
                                    



                                        9
                                    




                                        South African Equities
                                    

                                        2.90
                                    



                                        10
                                    




                                        Others
                                    

                                        7.60
                                    




View Region and Sector breakdowns for this fund






Top Holdings (30 Jun 2017)






                                    Rank
                                

                                    Largest Holdings
                                

                                    %  
                                



                                    1
                                

Mattel


                                    3.10
                                



                                    2
                                

Abbvie


                                    3.00
                                



                                    3
                                

CA Inc


                                    3.00
                                



                                    4
                                

CME Group


                                    3.00
                                



                                    5
                                

Novo Nordisk


                                    3.00
                                



                                    6
                                

Teva Pharmaceutical


                                    3.00
                                



                                    7
                                

VF Corp


                                    3.00
                                



                                    8
                                

Eaton


                                    2.90
                                



                                    9
                                

Royal Dutch Shell


                                    2.90
                                



                                    10
                                

Vodacom


                                    2.90
                                




More History













                        Additional Information




Additional Information






Legal Structure:


                                       OEIC
                                    



Own ISA wrapper:


                                        NO
                                          
                                    



Trustee / Depositary:


                                        N/A
                                    



Registrar:


                                        N/A
                                    



Multi-Manager:


                                       NO
                                    







Dividend policy:


N/A




Fund size:


                                        £329.5m / $430.6m (27-Jul-17)
                                    



Unit Launch:


                                        11-Mar-2015
                                    



Fund Launch:


                                        31-Dec-2010
                                    







Savings plan:


                                        NO
                                    



Pricing times:


                                       00:00 DD
                                    



Dealing times:


                                         N/A
                                    



Dealing frequency:


                                       Daily
                                    









Other users also looked at










Related Funds




Funds with the same manager (Ian Mortimer)
Funds with the same manager (Matthew Page)
Funds in this Sector (Equity - International)
Funds in the same Region (Ireland)
Funds in the same Asset Class (Equity)














                        News and Research about this fund




Relevant articles





View all articles





Relevant Guides















Contact Details




 14 Queen Anne's Gate, London, SW1H 9AA
                               


www.guinnessfunds.com

info@guinnessfunds.com















Close X


                Historical FE Risk Score:




  Guinness Global Equity Income Y Acc GBP

  FE
                Risk Score 102.00


Learn more about FE Risk Scores
View all FE Risk Scores







            
      Price total return performance figures are calculated on a bid price to bid price basis (mid to mid where applicable) with gross income (dividends) reinvested. Performance figures are shown in Pound Sterling (GBP). You can switch the fund’s native currency using the currency selector towards the top of this page.
 
        
            





        Your custom layout changed and saved automatically

        Drag and drop the icon to customise your factsheet
        layout


Close X


                Email Friend:



                        Email Address:



                        Comment:



                         

                            Ok

                                Cancel





CLOSE


You are being transferred to Trustnet Direct, which is run by Financial Express Investments Limited (authorised and regulated by the Financial Conduct Authority), where you will be able to complete this transaction. Trustnet Direct is an execution-only service and does not provide advice on the suitability of investments. You should seek independent financial advice if you are unsure.
Proceed to Trustnet Direct








Data provided by FE. Care has been taken to ensure that the information is correct, but FE neither warrants, represents nor guarantees the contents of information, nor does it accept any responsibility for errors, inaccuracies, omissions or any inconsistencies herein. Past performance does not predict future performance, it should not be the main or sole reason for making an investment decision. The value of investments and any income from them can fall as well as rise.



Login
Help
Contact Us









For Equity investors
FE Investegate
For Private investors
Trustnet Direct
For Professional investors
FE Invest
FE Analytics
FE Data feeds
FE Fund listings
For International investors
FE Trustnet Hong Kong
FE Trustnet Offshore
FE Trustnet Middle East


Quick links
Trustnet-Magazine
Investment research
FE Trustnet videos
Top rated funds
Top performing funds
Find a fund
Build a portfolio
The UK’s best fund managers
Performance charting
About us


Fund performance
IA unit trusts & OEICs
Equities
Investment trusts
Pension funds
Life funds
Offshore funds
ETFs
Venture capital trusts


Stay connected with FE Trustnet






Trustnet mobile website















LATEST :
Five reasons to keep hold of your defensive funds
13:00 | Monday, January 20, 2014






You are currently using an old browser which will not be supported by Trustnet after 31/07/2016.  To ensure you benefit from all features on the site, please update your browser.   Close 






















                © Trustnet Limited 2017. All Rights Reserved.
                Please read our Terms of Use / Disclaimer and Privacy and
                    Cookie Policy.
                Data supplied in conjunction with Thomson Financial Limited, London Stock Exchange
                Plc, StructuredRetailProducts.com and ManorPark.com


















Guinness Asset Management Ltd. disclosed in a filing on June 30, 2017 that it increased its stake in Cisco Systems, Inc.


























































                      NEWS HOME
                    

Advertising
Board and Executive Moves
Energy
Health Care
Hedge Funds
M & A
Private Equity
Technology














        Guinness Asset Management Ltd. disclosed in a filing on June 30, 2017 that it increased its stake in Cisco Systems, Inc.    























































































































Email







LinkedIn







Facebook







Google+







Tweet







Reddit





Permalink



 

          Jul 15, 2017                         - RelSci Data Update                

          Institutional Holdings Changes      




Background Information:


Guinness Asset Management Ltd. »
Guinness AM is an active, value-based manager which combines strategic sector selection with a fundamental screening process to identify specific stock opportunities, aiming to invest in attractively valued energy companies which offer long-term growth.  They focus on Asia, energy, innovation and alternative energy themes.The firm performs macroeconomic analysis to identify attractive sectors to overweight, utilizing quantitative screening to prioritize stock research activity and conducting fundamental due diligence to select individual stocks.Guinness AM uses a screening method that ranks quality, attractive valuation, sentiment and investor demand to select companies, building profit and loss models, balance sheets, cash flow statements and conducting sensitivity analysis. They emphasize quantitative numerical analysis over softer considerations, purchasing stocks when they score well on more valuation criteria than other candidates and when conviction is strong. They aim to keep trading activity and turnover as low as practicable.




In The News:




                            Friday people roundup                            


                            May 6, 2016  •  Investment & Pensions Europe                        





                            M&G duo join Guinness for energy fund launch                            


                            May 5, 2016  •  Fund Strategy                        





                            Meet the world's No. 1 dealer in Guinness art                            


                            December 21, 2014  •  CNNMoney                        









Guinness Asset Management Ltd. »
Guinness AM is an active, value-based manager which combines strategic sector selection with a fundamental screening process to identify specific stock opportunities, aiming to invest in attractively valued energy companies which offer long-term growth.  They focus on Asia, energy, innovation and alternative energy themes.The firm performs macroeconomic analysis to identify attractive sectors to overweight, utilizing quantitative screening to prioritize stock research activity and conducting fundamental due diligence to select individual stocks.Guinness AM uses a screening method that ranks quality, attractive valuation, sentiment and investor demand to select companies, building profit and loss models, balance sheets, cash flow statements and conducting sensitivity analysis. They emphasize quantitative numerical analysis over softer considerations, purchasing stocks when they score well on more valuation criteria than other candidates and when conviction is strong. They aim to keep trading activity and turnover as low as practicable.






In The News:




 


                                                    Friday people roundup                                                





                                     May 6, 2016  •  Investment & Pensions Europe                                





 


                                                    M&G duo join Guinness for energy fund launch                                                





                                     May 5, 2016  •  Fund Strategy                                





 


                                                    Meet the world's No. 1 dealer in Guinness art                                                





                                     December 21, 2014  •  CNNMoney                                















You've found a premium RelSci Pro feature!



Connect to Individuals and Organizations In This Story

Upgrade to RelSci Pro to easily sync your contacts and see how you can reach the people and organizations featured in this article.


Start My Free Trial  ➤

Still not convinced? Check out our full listing of features here.



Not Now










Are you a RelSci Pro Subscriber?

Login to RelSci Pro 
                        ➤


Not a Pro Subscriber? Log in here to manage your alerts









 Keep me signed in.
        

Login  ➤



        Forgot your Password?
    

























 I have read the LexisNexis terms & conditions




Sign Me Up  ➤





















Home - Guinness Funds

















































































Terms & Conditions of this website
This website is issued in the UK by Guinness Asset Management Ltd, authorised and regulated by the Financial Conduct Authority (FCA registered company number 223077).
Guinness Asset Management provides investment products for professional and private investors, which include:

A range of long-only open-ended funds (sub-funds within an OEIC that is incorporated in Ireland and authorised and supervised by the Central Bank of Ireland, which operates under EU legislation). The Funds are approved by the Financial Conduct Authority for sale in the UK.
A discretionary-managed Enterprise Investment Scheme (EIS Service) investing in EIS-qualifying companies. The Service comprises a range of investment themes which can be accessed by investors via a sequence of dated “offerings”.

While considerable care has been taken to ensure that the information contained within this website is accurate and up to date, no warranty is given as to its accuracy or completeness, and no liability is accepted for any errors or omissions. All products referred to on this website are subject to change without notice, and we do not undertake to advise you of any changes to our views. This website should not be regarded as an invitation to buy or sell.
This Website
Please read the information on this page. It contains the legal and regulatory restrictions which apply to the use of this website and any investment in our products referred to in this website.
The information in this website has been issued and approved by Guinness Asset Management Ltd and does not in any way constitute investment, tax, legal, or other advice. If you are in any doubt about any of the information on this website, please consult your investment or other professional adviser.
Use of this website indicates your acceptance of the Terms and Conditions of this website.
This website and these Terms and Conditions may be altered and amended at any time without prior notice. Therefore, your continued use of this website indicates your acceptance of and acknowledgement of these Terms and Conditions as amended.
These Terms and Conditions were last revised in December 2013.
The information contained within this website does not constitute an offer of or an invitation to apply for securities:

In any jurisdiction where such offer or invitation is unlawful or
In which the person making such offer is not qualified to do so or
To whom it is unlawful to make such offer or solicitation.

Disclaimer and Limitation of Liability
The information contained in this site has been compiled with considerable care to ensure its accuracy at the date of publication. But no representation or warranty, express or implied, is made to its accuracy or completeness. Any research or analysis contained in this website has been procured by Guinness Asset Management Limited for its own use. It is provided to you only incidentally, and any opinions expressed are subject to change without notice.
We make no representations, warranties or undertakings about the information contained within the website. In addition, we make no such representations, warranties or undertaking about any website to which ours is linked and therefore you leave our website at your own risk.
You should note that there may be occasions during which our website becomes unavailable, through no fault of our own. There may indeed be occasions where we take our website offline in order to enhance and update it.
Due to the nature of the internet itself, we make no representations, warranties or undertakings as to the accuracy of the content of our website or as to whether any information you download is virus or error free.
We cannot accept any liability for any damages whatsoever arising to you as a result of your use of our website.
The information has been issued and approved by Guinness Asset Management Ltd and does not in any way constitute investment, tax, legal or other advice. If you are in any doubt about any of the information on this website, please consult your investment or other professional adviser.
Guinness Asset Management Funds PLC
An umbrella-type OEIC containing the Guinness range of long-only, open ended equity funds
Guinness Asset Management Funds PLC (the “Company”) is an umbrella-type open-ended investment company (OEIC), incorporated in Ireland and authorised and supervised by the Central Bank of Ireland, which operates under EU legislation. The Company’s sub-funds comprise the Guinness range of long-only, open ended equity funds (the “Funds”) as follows:

Guinness Alternative Energy Fund
Guinness China & Hong Kong Fund
Guinness Global Energy Fund
Guinness Global Equity Income Fund
Guinness Global Money Managers Fund

The Funds are approved by the Financial Conduct Authority for sale in the UK. The Company and the Funds have been recognised in the UK by the FCA pursuant to section 264 of the Financial Services and Markets Act 2000. Guinness Asset Management Ltd is authorised and regulated by the Financial Conduct Authority (FCA registered company number 223077).
The Funds are not offered for sale to Retail Clients in countries where the Funds are not registered for sale, or in any country or jurisdiction in which an offer is not permitted under applicable law. THESE INVESTMENTS ARE NOT FOR SALE TO U.S. PERSONS.
The Funds’ full documentation contains more complete and detailed information of risk, fees, charges and expenses that are to be borne by an investor. The documentation should be read carefully before investing. The full documentation needed to make an investment, including the Prospectus, the KIID and the Application Form are available, free of charge, from:



 


The Manager
Capita Financial Managers (Ireland) Limited
2 Grand Canal Square, Grand Canal Harbour, Dublin 2, Ireland



The Promoter and
Investment Manager
 Guinness Asset Management Ltd
14 Queen Anne’s Gate, London SW1H 9AA



Documentation is also available from this website, guinnessfunds.com. The content and documents on this website should not be distributed to Retail Clients who are resident in countries where the Funds are not registered for sale or in any other circumstances where their distribution is not authorised or is unlawful.
The prospectus for Switzerland, the KIID for Switzerland, the articles of association, the annual and semi-annual reports, as well as the list of the buying and selling transactions can be obtained free of charge from the representative in Switzerland:
Carnegie Fund Services S.A.
11, rue du Général-Dufour, 1204 Geneva, Switzerland
Tel. +41 22 705 11 77, Fax: + 41 22 705 11 79, www.carnegie-fund-services.ch
The paying agent is Banque Cantonale de Genève, 17 Quai de l’Ile, 1204 Geneva, Switzerland.
Fund risk factors
All the Guinness Funds are open ended, long-only equity funds. Investors should be willing and able to assume the risks of equity investing. Investment in the Funds carries with it a degree of risk and investors should read the risk factors section in the prospectus before investing. The value of the Funds’ portfolios changes daily in accordance with the movement of underlying capital markets and the specific share price movements of the companies in whose shares each Fund invests.
Past performance is not a guide to future performance.
Performance risks
We identify the following performance risks in our Funds:



 

Market risk
The value of investments and the income from them may go down as well as up and are not guaranteed. An investor may not get back the amount originally invested. The value of an investment can be affected by changes in general market conditions, other political, social and economic developments, as well as specific matters relating to the companies in whose securities each Fund invests.


Currency risk
 Changes in the rates of exchange may cause the value of investments to go up or down.
While the Funds have share classes priced in various currencies, the base currency of all the Funds is US Dollars, and the Fund valuations for all share classes are initially calculated each dealing day in US Dollars. Non-US Dollar share classes are then converted into their respective currencies from the US Dollar valuation.
The Funds invest internationally and hold all investments in local currency. Guinness Asset Management does not conduct any hedging of currency exposure on the Funds’ capital value or income. The Funds aim to be fully invested most of the time, but any cash balances are normally held in US dollars. This means that the exposure of the Funds to any one currency is mainly limited to the value of its holdings in stocks priced in that currency. Therefore, as well as the impact of share price movements in the securities each Fund holds, the capital value of an investment in a Fund will be affected by changes in exchange rates between the stocks’ local currency, the Fund’s base currency (USD) and the currency of the Fund share class you own.


Emerging market risk
The risk inherent in a Fund is higher when it is invested in markets which may be considered ’emerging’. These Funds are only suitable for those investors who are prepared to accept the above average volatility inherent in emerging market investment.




There are other risks of investing in our funds, such as credit and counterparty risks, which are detailed in the Prospectus.
Shareholders in Guinness Global Equity Income Fund and Guinness Global Money Managers Fund should note that all or part of the fees and expenses can be charged to the capital of the Funds. Charging fees and expenses to capital has the effect of lowering the capital value of your investment.
Fund specific risks
In addition some funds carry their own specific risks:






Sector risk
Some funds invest only in companies involved in a single industry or a single sector of the market. These funds are very susceptible to the performance of that one industry or sector, and can be volatile. Examples in the Guinness fund range include:

Guinness Alternative Energy Fund
Guinness Global Energy Fund
Guinness Global Money Managers Fund




Geographic risk
Some funds invest only in stocks listed in or exposed to one single country or region. These funds are very susceptible to the performance of that one country or region, and can be volatile. Examples in the Guinness fund range include:

Guinness China & Hong Kong Fund





For more detail on the risks relating to specific products, please refer to the relevant documentation for that product.
Guinness EIS Service
An Enterprise Investment Scheme (EIS) is a government initiative to encourage investment in smaller, higher-risk companies by offering a range of tax reliefs to investors. EIS-qualifying companies can be unlisted smaller companies (companies whose shares are not quoted on any recognised stock exchange), or companies listed on the Alternative Investment Market (AIM).
The Guinness EIS Service is a discretionary managed service investing in EIS qualifying companies and managed by Guinness Asset Management Ltd, the Investment Manager. The Service comprises a range of investment themes which can be accessed by investors via a sequence of dated “offerings”. Each offering has a finite subscription period, with an opening and closing date for subscriptions. To qualify for the full range of tax benefits of an EIS investment, investors should be prepared to hold their investment for a minimum of three years. Each offering has its own Information Memorandum detailing the terms and conditions, specific risks and tax implications of investment.
The range of investment themes in the Guinness EIS Service include AIM-listed companies and Sustainable Energy companies.
An investment in the Guinness EIS Service is subject to a number of risks, both general and specific to each offering within the Service. Before making any decision to invest, prospective investors need to understand that investing in EIS-qualifying companies can be highly speculative and carries high risk. The Information Memorandum for each offering contains details of the risks involved. Investors should consider carefully whether a subscription is suitable for them in the light of the information in the Information Memorandum and their personal circumstances. Before investing, investors are strongly recommended to consult an authorised financial adviser. We recommend you seek appropriate independent advice before investing.
Past performance of the Investment Manager is no guarantee of future performance. The value of an investment in any investee company may go down as well as up and investors may not get back the full amount invested. The Investment Manager will rely on achieving an exit for the investments made in each offering in order to generate a capital gain for investors. There is no guarantee that exits will be available at the prices anticipated by the Investment Manager.
General EIS investment risks
1. Concentration risk
The Investment Manager may be unable to make sufficient investments in suitable investee companies. If sufficient investments are not made, the returns achieved by the Service could be materially impacted.
The Investment Manager intends to invest across a portfolio of investee companies to diversify exposure to any one company. However, there is a risk that the investments are concentrated or there is a weighting towards one or more sectors. In these circumstances returns to investors may be adversely affected by the underperformance of a particular company or sector.
2. Size and liquidity risk
The Guinness EIS Service invests in companies that are relatively small. Smaller investee companies can be vulnerable to government actions and changes in statute. In particular, there may be changes to the EIS legislation which may affect investors’ tax positions.
Investee companies may be reliant on the skills or knowledge of a small number of individuals, and should a key individual leave performance may be adversely affected.
Some companies’ shares in which the Investment Manager invests will be listed on AIM, other companies will be unlisted.
Listed shares
Although some companies’ shares in which the Guinness EIS Service can invest are listed on AIM, not all shares are readily realisable at all times.
Investment in shares traded on AIM involves a higher degree of risk, and such shares may be less liquid, than shares in companies which are listed on the main market of the London Stock Exchange. The rules governing AIM companies are less demanding than those of companies listed on the main market of the London Stock Exchange.
The market price of AIM-listed shares may not necessarily reflect their underlying value.
The share price of AIM-listed companies can be highly volatile and shareholdings can be illiquid. The price at which AIM-listed shares are quoted and the price at which such shares may realise will be influenced by a large number of factors, some specific to the relevant investee company and its operations, and others which may affect AIM-listed companies generally, such as legislative changes, and general economic, political, regulatory or social conditions.
Some AIM-listed companies are majority owned by connected parties who may be in a position to exert influence on the relevant investee company and their interests may differ from other shareholders.
Unlisted shares
Some offerings in the Guinness EIS Service can invest in companies which are not expected to have a listing or quotation. Therefore, there may not be a recognised or active market for the shares of investee companies and it may be difficult to sell or realise the investment or obtain reliable information about their value. Investors should not consider investing money in an offering which can hold shares in unlisted companies if their investment may be required during the life of the offering, which is normally at least three years.
Investors should not consider subscribing unless they can afford a total loss of their subscription.
Minority holdings in unquoted investments may be difficult to protect and difficult to realise. The timing of realisations of investments by the Service cannot therefore be predicted.
3. Tax risks
The tax reliefs referred to in the Information Memorandum for each offering in the Guinness EIS Service are those currently applicable. However, investors should be aware that tax reliefs can change. Their applicability and value will depend upon the individual circumstances of a given investor, and investors should seek their own independent professional advice on their particular tax situation and the application of such tax reliefs prior to making a subscription in the Service.
It is the intention of the Investment Manager to invest in companies which qualify under the EIS legislation, but there is no guarantee that EIS status can be maintained throughout the life of the Investment. Both investee companies and investors need to comply with the requirements of the EIS legislation in order to maintain EIS Income Tax Relief, CGT free disposal and CGT Deferral Relief, and non-compliance may result in the loss or partial claw-back of EIS Income Tax Relief and CGT Deferral Relief, and potential interest penalties. Subscription funds will not be returned in these instances; investments will be exited as deemed appropriate by the Investment Manager.
Shares in companies which qualify under the EIS legislation will normally qualify for Business Property Relief for Inheritance Tax purposes. In order to secure this relief investors must retain their shareholding in an investee company for a minimum of two years. The Investment Manager intends to invest in companies which qualify for EIS Relief, CGT Deferral Relief and Business Property Relief, although there is a possibility that investments will not qualify for one or more of these.
To qualify for the full range of tax benefits of an EIS investment, it is the intention of the Investment Manager that investments in qualifying companies will be held for three years. However, the Investment Manager reserves the right to realise individual investments before three years if it believes it is in the best interests of investors.
Specific EIS risks
Additional risks and uncertainties apply to each offering in the Service and the companies in which it invests. These specific risks may have an adverse effect on the business of the investee companies. Investors should consider carefully whether a subscription to the Service is suitable for them in the light of the information in the relevant Information Memorandum, and their personal circumstances.
Data Protection Notice
Any information with which you provide us will be used by Guinness Asset Management Limited and its subsidiaries. We may collect personal information from you during your use of our website.
In order to advise you of our products and services, we may collect personal data from you and we may process that data. You have the right to get a copy of the information we hold about you by sending a written request to Guinness Asset Management Ltd; you may be required to supply a valid means of identification as a security precaution to assist us in preventing the unauthorised disclosure of your personal information. You are also entitled to have Guinness Asset Management modify or delete any information that you believe is incorrect or out of date.
Guinness Asset Management Ltd is registered under the Data Protection Act 1998 and complies with the Act in all our dealing with your personal data.
Copyright
This website and the information contained within it is protected by copyright. Reproduction of all or any part of this website, or any information contained within it, is prohibited unless this is required for personal use
Cookies Policy
Below is our policy for use of cookies on this website.
Cookies Introduction
This website uses cookies (as almost all websites do) to help provide you with the best experience we can. Cookies are small text files that are placed on your computer or mobile when you browse websites.
Our cookies help:

make our website work as you’d expect;
remember your settings during and between visits;
improve the security/speed of the site;

We do not use cookies to:

collect any personal identifiable information (without your express permission);
collect any sensitive information (without your express permission);
pass personally identifiable data to third parties;
pay sales commissions.

You can learn more about all the cookies we use below.
Allowing us to use cookies
Users are notified of the use of cookies when they enter our site, along with instructions on how to disable cookies in their web browser. If the settings on your software that you are using to view this website (your browser) are adjusted to accept cookies, we take this, and your continued use of our website, to mean that this is acceptable to you.
Turning cookies off
Most modern browsers allow you to control your cookie settings. You can disable them completely by editing your browser settings. However, in doing this you may be limiting the functionality that is displayed on our website and also a large population of websites on the Internet that use cookies to serve their content.
To learn how to disable cookies on browsers please click here.
Our use of cookies
Our website stores an anonymous cookie for a period of 30 days to remember that a user, when revisiting the site, has accepted these Terms and Conditions, including notice of our use of cookies.
We use traffic log cookies to identify which pages are being used. This helps us analyse data about web page traffic and improve our website in order to tailor it to customer needs. We only use this information for statistical analysis purposes; the data is then removed from the system.
Website function cookies

Our own cookies
We use cookies to help make our website work by tracking anonymous visits to the website for statistical purposes.

Anonymous visitor statistics cookies
We use cookies to compile anonymous visitor statistics such as how many people have visited our website, what type of technology they are using (e.g Mac or Windows, which help to identify when our site isn’t working as it should for particular technologies), how long they spend on the site, what page they look at etc. This helps us to continuously improve our website.


We also use analytic programmes that tell us, for example, and on an anonymous basis, how people reached this site (e.g. from a search engine). 
To learn how to disable Google Analytics, click here.
Google Maps
We use Google Maps to give users the opportunity of visiting our business location. Google Maps only uses cookies to enable you to use the functionality of their map software. No personal information is stored on our website through the use of Google Maps.
If you are concerned about cookies tracking your movements on the Internet then you may be concerned about spyware. Spyware is the name given to a particular band of cookies that track personal information about you. There are many anti-spyware programmes that you can use to prevent this from happening. To learn more about anti-spyware software, click here.
Guinness Asset Management
Guinness Asset Management Ltd is authorised and regulated by the Financial Conduct Authority.
Registered address: 14 Queen Anne’s Gate, London SW1H 9AA
Company registration: 4647882
FCA company registration number: 223077
If you would like further information on the Financial Conduct Authority, our regulator, you can access their website here: www.fca.org.uk
Telephone calls
For your protection, telephone calls to Guinness Asset Management may be recorded.


This site uses cookies. By continuing to the site you agree to the use of cookies. You can disable cookies in your browser. To find out more click here.
By continuing to this website you accept the Terms & Conditions of the use of this site. 







Home
About us
News & Views
Literature
Funds

Global Equity Income Fund
European Equity Income Fund
Asian Equity Income Fund
Global Innovators Fund
Global Energy Fund
Alternative Energy Fund
Global Money Managers Fund
Sustainable Infrastructure EIS – Introduction
Guinness AIM EIS – Introduction


Careers
Events
 









 



















 









 



  



 


 



HomeAbout usNews & ViewsLiteratureFunds Global Equity Income Fund European Equity Income Fund Asian Equity Income Fund Global Innovators Fund Global Energy Fund Alternative Energy Fund Global Money Managers Fund Sustainable Infrastructure EIS – Introduction Guinness AIM EIS – IntroductionCareersEvents




  

 


 




 





 


Equity Income funds
Global Equity Income Fund
European Equity Income Fund
Asian Equity Income Fund

Global Growth funds
Global Innovators Fund

Specialist funds
Global Energy Fund
Alternative Energy Fund
Global Money Managers Fund

EIS & IHT Service
Guinness EIS
Guinness AIM EIS
Sustainable Infrastructure IHT

How to invest
Fund Prices
Fund Prospectus
Fund Report & Accounts
Contact Us
Register for Updates 
Follow Us on Twitter 
Follow Us on LinkedIn 

 

  



 


Guinness Asset Management provides a range of long only actively managed funds to individual and institutional investors. Founded in 2003, Guinness is independent and is wholly owned by its employees.   



 



We believe in in-house research, intelligent screening for prioritisation of research and well-designed investment processes. We manage concentrated, high conviction portfolios, with low turnover and no benchmark constraints.

Since our establishment we have developed a variety of specialisms in global growth and dividend funds, global sector funds and Asian regional and country funds.

The Guinness equity funds sit within an Irish-listed OEIC. They are managed alongside a range of similar SEC-registered funds offered to US investors by our US sister company, Guinness Atkinson Asset Management Inc.

We also offer an Enterprise Investment Scheme (EIS service) investing in Sustainable Infrastructure and an AIM EIS investing in AIM-listed companies.



Awards



Guinness Global Money Managers Fund
BEST FUND OVER 3 YEARS
Equity Sector Banks & Other Financials



Guinness Global Energy Fund
BEST FUND OVER 3 YEARS
Equity Sector Natural Resources



Guinness Global Energy Fund
BEST COMMODITY FUND



Guinness Global Equity Income Fund
BEST FUND OVER 3 YEARS
Equity Sector Global Income




Latest News and Views

Update | Jul '17        
Global Energy Fund
Reviewing the first half and considering the potential for the rest of 2017


Update | Jul '17        
Global Money Managers Fund
What do the last 5 years tell us about the sector?


Press | Jun '17 | FundCalibre        
Global Equity Income Fund
FundCalibre: Guinness Global Equity Income


Update | May '17        
Global Energy Fund
Oil price weakens: why?


Insight | Mar '17        
Asian Equity Income Fund
Three year review


Insight | Feb '17        
Global Equity Income FundGlobal Innovators Fund
 Shares Magazine: Tim Guinness


Update | Jan '17        
Global Equity Income Fund
2016 performance & portfolio review


Update | Jan '17        
Global Energy Fund
2017 Outlook for energy


Press | Sep '16 | Investment Week        
Global Equity Income Fund
 How important are face-to-face company meetings?


Update | Aug '16        
Global Equity Income Fund
Going Global, going granular – where is the value?




  

 


 



















































Guinness Alternative Energy | Guinness Asset Management Ltd | Fund factsheets | FE Trustnet

















 



















Trustnet








Login


















To continue using this website, please tell us a  little about yourself:
 I am a financial adviser
 I am a discretionary fund manager / multimanager
 I am a financial paraplanner
 I work in financial services
 I am a private investor


   This site uses cookies.  Some of the cookies are essential for parts of the site to operate and have already been set.  
   You may delete and block all cookies from this site, but if you do, parts of the site may not work.  To find out more 
   about cookies on the website and how to delete cookies, see our Privacy and Cookie Policy.
   
 I accept the FE Trustnet cookie policy


Continue

For more information Click here






Investments

Unit Trusts & OEICs

Unit Trusts & OEICs Home
Prices & Performance
Multi-manager & Mixed Asset
Special Reports
UT&OEIC Ratings
A-Z Fund Factsheets
A-Z Group Factsheets
A-Z Sectors
Funds Guide
Most viewed funds
Most viewed groups


IA Unit Trusts & OEICs

IA Unit Trusts & OEICs Home
Prices & Performance
Multi-manager & Mixed Asset
Special Reports
IA UT&OEIC Ratings
A-Z Fund Factsheets
A-Z Group Factsheets
A-Z Sectors
Funds Guide
Most viewed funds
Most viewed groups


Equities

Equities Home
Prices & Performance
A-Z Equity Factsheets
Latest announcements


Investment Trusts

Investment Trusts Home
Prices & Performance
Investment Trust Ratings
A-Z Investment Trust Factsheets
A-Z Group Factsheets
A-Z Warrants
A-Z Sectors
Split Capital Analytics
Investment Trust Guide
Most viewed investment trusts
Most viewed groups


Pensions

Pensions Home
Prices & Performance
Pension Fund Ratings
A-Z Pension Fund Factsheets
A-Z Group Factsheets
A-Z Pension Product Factsheets
A-Z Sectors
Most viewed funds
Most viewed groups


Life

Life Home
Prices & Performance
A-Z Life Fund Ratings
A-Z Life Fund Factsheets
A-Z Life Group Factsheets
A-Z Life Product Factsheets
A-Z Sectors
Life insurance glossary
Most viewed funds
Most viewed groups


Offshore Funds

Offshore Funds Home
Prices & Performance
Offshore Fund Ratings
A-Z Offshore Fund Factsheets
A-Z Group Factsheets
A-Z Sectors
Offshore Funds Guide
Most viewed funds
Most viewed groups


ETFs

ETFs Home
ETF Prices & Performance
ETF Fund Ratings
A-Z ETF Factsheets
A-Z Group Factsheets
A-Z Sectors
ETFs Guide
Most viewed funds
Most viewed groups


VCTs

VCTs Home
VCT Prices & Performance
A-Z VCT Factsheets
VCTs Guide
Most viewed funds
Most viewed groups


Structured Products

Structured Products Home
A-Z Structured Product Factsheets
A-Z Group Factsheets
Structured products guide
Structured products glossary




Fund Managers

Fund Managers Home
Alpha managers
League table 
A-Z manager factsheets 


News & Research

News & Research Home
News Archive
Education guides

Education guides home
Emerging Market

ETFs
Unit Trust & OEIC

Investment trust


                                Offshore funds 
ISAs 


FE Trustnet Videos 
Bright-talk Videos 


Learning

Learn about investing
Investment basics

Pensions
Investing in a fund
Investment trusts
Exchange
                                Traded Funds (ETFs)
Passive funds
                                and trackers
What is an ISA?


What to invest in?

Bonds
Equities
Property
Commodities


Where to invest?

UK
US
Europe
Emerging markets
Asia


How to invest?


                                Setting objectives for your portfolio
Asset allocation
                                - the basics
Measuring performance

                                Onshore and offshore - what’s the difference


Fund ratings

About FE Ratings
FE Crown Fund Ratings
FE Passive Fund Ratings
FE Alpha Manager
                                Ratings
FE Risk Scores
The Adviser Fund
                                Index




Portfolio

Portfolio Home
Watchlist
Alerts


Tools

Home
Fundswire

Fundswire Home
Manage my alerts


Charting
Find an IFA
Pension Calculator
IFA tools

IFA tools home
FE AFI
Client Fund Profiler
Structured Products
Whitelabel Factsheets




Passive FundsNew

Passive Funds Homepage
Sectors

UK Equities
North American Equities
European Equities
Japanese Equities
Emerging Market Equities
UK Gilts
Property
Sterling Corporate Bonds
Index-Linked Gilts









Reading List




Clear all list



0


Your Basket


Aberdeen Global Indian Equity D2 GBP 





Open basket


















Login







Select Account..




Login
 Remember Me

Password Reminder
Not Registered? Click Here







Register





*

*

*



*


*

Choose a User Type
I am a financial adviser
I am a discretionary fund manager / multimanager
I am a financial paraplanner
I work in financial services
I am a private investor

*
 I accept your terms of use
 Send me FE Trustnet bulletins
Register





It's look like you're leaving us

            What would you like us to do with the funds you've selected
        
Show me all my options
        Forget them
        Save them 

            Remember my choice











        Customise this table
























 





Fund Performance

IA Unit Trusts & OEICsEquity Price & PerformanceInvestment TrustsPension FundsLife FundsOffshore FundsETFsVenture Capital Trusts
















	                    You are here: 
				        

FE Trustnet


Offshore Funds


Factsheet

















Set performance currency  »      





Pound Sterling

 



Fund's Currency

 












Help - Rebase Performance


						 _ 
					

						 X 
					









						The performance of funds on FE Trustnet is set to GBX by default. You can rebase the fund performance into the funds native currency if you wish.
					













Guinness Alternative Energy
BUY NOW 









Group factsheet



					Portfolio history


					Group performance



 Print







Fund Overview


Performance


Portfolio breakdown


Add to basket














Non-subscribing fund



		This Guinness Asset Management Ltd fund does not subscribe to FE Trustnet.
		Click here if you would like to see more details on this fund on FE Trustnet, including holdings data»
Click here for other funds from Guinness Asset Management Ltd»




Performance





Select time period
1 month
3 months
6 months
1 year
3 years
5 years





ADVERTISEMENT







 
 
1y
3y
5y
12m-24m
24m-36m
36m-48m
48m-60m


 


GUINNESS ALTERNATIVE ENERGY X GBP 

+7.5
-5.8
+64.7
+4.1
-15.8
+6.9
+63.5


 

COMMODITY & ENERGY

+3.1-1.5-3.1+24.5-23.3+0.5-2.2





Price


 Bid OfferCurrency+/-YieldCiticodeSEDOLISINCodeWKNDate


GUINNESS ALTERNATIVE ENERGY X GBP

12.05

GBP
-0.06
-
0VNJ
B7LWDH1
IE00B7LWDH14
n/a
27-Jul-2017

GUINNESS ALTERNATIVE ENERGY A USD

2.51

USD
-0.01
0.00
BAA4
B2PGVJ2
IE00B2PGVJ29
A1C7ZH
27-Jul-2017

GUINNESS ALTERNATIVE ENERGY B USD

2.40

USD
-0.01
0.00
BAA5
B2PGVK3
IE00B2PGVK34
A1JXZT
27-Jul-2017

GUINNESS ALTERNATIVE ENERGY C GBP

4.23

GBP
-0.02
0.00
D6F6
B3CCJ63
IE00B3CCJ633
n/a
27-Jul-2017

GUINNESS ALTERNATIVE ENERGY D EUR

4.03

EUR
-0.02
0.00
D6F7
B3CCJ74
IE00B3CCJ740
n/a
27-Jul-2017

GUINNESS ALTERNATIVE ENERGY E USD

3.32

USD
-0.01
0.00
D6F8
B3CCJ85
IE00B3CCJ856
n/a
27-Jul-2017

GUINNESS ALTERNATIVE ENERGY C EUR

8.33

EUR
-0.05
-
JXMD
BGHQF41
IE00BGHQF417
n/a
27-Jul-2017





Peer groups


Region
Asset Class
Sector




Ireland
Commodity/Energy
Commodity & Energy





	            Price total return performance figures are calculated on a bid price to bid price basis (mid to mid where applicable) with gross income (dividends) reinvested. Performance figures are shown in Pound Sterling (GBP). You can switch the fund’s native currency using the currency selector towards the top of this page.
	        


















Share this page with friends!






											 
										






Sign up for email alerts
											Stay upto date on the latest fund research from FE															
										



											 
										





















Buy this fund here


You can now buy & sell funds and shares at our new sister-site at highly competitive rates
BUY NOW 
ACCOUNT BENEFITS 


Charting



		 Chart this fund's performance vs the benchmark of your choice...»











CLOSE


You are being transferred to Trustnet Direct, which is run by Financial Express Investments Limited (authorised and regulated by the Financial Conduct Authority), where you will be able to complete this transaction. Trustnet Direct is an execution-only service and does not provide advice on the suitability of investments. You should seek independent financial advice if you are unsure.
Proceed to Trustnet Direct









Data provided by FE. Care has been taken to ensure that the information is correct, but FE neither warrants, represents nor guarantees the contents of information, nor does it accept any responsibility for errors, inaccuracies, omissions or any inconsistencies herein. Past performance does not predict future performance, it should not be the main or sole reason for making an investment decision. The value of investments and any income from them can fall as well as rise.



Login
Help
Contact Us









For Equity investors
FE Investegate
For Private investors
Trustnet Direct
For Professional investors
FE Invest
FE Analytics
FE Data feeds
FE Fund listings
For International investors
FE Trustnet Hong Kong
FE Trustnet Offshore
FE Trustnet Middle East


Quick links
Trustnet-Magazine
Investment research
FE Trustnet videos
Top rated funds
Top performing funds
Find a fund
Build a portfolio
The UK’s best fund managers
Performance charting
About us


Fund performance
IA unit trusts & OEICs
Equities
Investment trusts
Pension funds
Life funds
Offshore funds
ETFs
Venture capital trusts


Stay connected with FE Trustnet






Trustnet mobile website















LATEST :
Five reasons to keep hold of your defensive funds
13:00 | Monday, January 20, 2014






You are currently using an old browser which will not be supported by Trustnet after 31/07/2016.  To ensure you benefit from all features on the site, please update your browser.   Close 














                © Trustnet Limited 2017. All Rights Reserved.
                Please read our 
                    Terms of Use / Disclaimer and Privacy and Cookie Policy.
                Data supplied in conjunction with Thomson Financial Limited, London Stock Exchange
                Plc, StructuredRetailProducts.com and ManorPark.com
            
        



























Guinness Asset Management Ltd Profile | FE Trustnet

















 



















Trustnet








Login


















To continue using this website, please tell us a  little about yourself:
 I am a financial adviser
 I am a discretionary fund manager / multimanager
 I am a financial paraplanner
 I work in financial services
 I am a private investor


   This site uses cookies.  Some of the cookies are essential for parts of the site to operate and have already been set.  
   You may delete and block all cookies from this site, but if you do, parts of the site may not work.  To find out more 
   about cookies on the website and how to delete cookies, see our Privacy and Cookie Policy.
   
 I accept the FE Trustnet cookie policy


Continue

For more information Click here






Investments

Unit Trusts & OEICs

Unit Trusts & OEICs Home
Prices & Performance
Multi-manager & Mixed Asset
Special Reports
UT&OEIC Ratings
A-Z Fund Factsheets
A-Z Group Factsheets
A-Z Sectors
Funds Guide
Most viewed funds
Most viewed groups


IA Unit Trusts & OEICs

IA Unit Trusts & OEICs Home
Prices & Performance
Multi-manager & Mixed Asset
Special Reports
IA UT&OEIC Ratings
A-Z Fund Factsheets
A-Z Group Factsheets
A-Z Sectors
Funds Guide
Most viewed funds
Most viewed groups


Equities

Equities Home
Prices & Performance
A-Z Equity Factsheets
Latest announcements


Investment Trusts

Investment Trusts Home
Prices & Performance
Investment Trust Ratings
A-Z Investment Trust Factsheets
A-Z Group Factsheets
A-Z Warrants
A-Z Sectors
Split Capital Analytics
Investment Trust Guide
Most viewed investment trusts
Most viewed groups


Pensions

Pensions Home
Prices & Performance
Pension Fund Ratings
A-Z Pension Fund Factsheets
A-Z Group Factsheets
A-Z Pension Product Factsheets
A-Z Sectors
Most viewed funds
Most viewed groups


Life

Life Home
Prices & Performance
A-Z Life Fund Ratings
A-Z Life Fund Factsheets
A-Z Life Group Factsheets
A-Z Life Product Factsheets
A-Z Sectors
Life insurance glossary
Most viewed funds
Most viewed groups


Offshore Funds

Offshore Funds Home
Prices & Performance
Offshore Fund Ratings
A-Z Offshore Fund Factsheets
A-Z Group Factsheets
A-Z Sectors
Offshore Funds Guide
Most viewed funds
Most viewed groups


ETFs

ETFs Home
ETF Prices & Performance
ETF Fund Ratings
A-Z ETF Factsheets
A-Z Group Factsheets
A-Z Sectors
ETFs Guide
Most viewed funds
Most viewed groups


VCTs

VCTs Home
VCT Prices & Performance
A-Z VCT Factsheets
VCTs Guide
Most viewed funds
Most viewed groups


Structured Products

Structured Products Home
A-Z Structured Product Factsheets
A-Z Group Factsheets
Structured products guide
Structured products glossary




Fund Managers

Fund Managers Home
Alpha managers
League table 
A-Z manager factsheets 


News & Research

News & Research Home
News Archive
Education guides

Education guides home
Emerging Market

ETFs
Unit Trust & OEIC

Investment trust


                                Offshore funds 
ISAs 


FE Trustnet Videos 
Bright-talk Videos 


Learning

Learn about investing
Investment basics

Pensions
Investing in a fund
Investment trusts
Exchange
                                Traded Funds (ETFs)
Passive funds
                                and trackers
What is an ISA?


What to invest in?

Bonds
Equities
Property
Commodities


Where to invest?

UK
US
Europe
Emerging markets
Asia


How to invest?


                                Setting objectives for your portfolio
Asset allocation
                                - the basics
Measuring performance

                                Onshore and offshore - what’s the difference


Fund ratings

About FE Ratings
FE Crown Fund Ratings
FE Passive Fund Ratings
FE Alpha Manager
                                Ratings
FE Risk Scores
The Adviser Fund
                                Index




Portfolio

Portfolio Home
Watchlist
Alerts


Tools

Home
Fundswire

Fundswire Home
Manage my alerts


Charting
Find an IFA
Pension Calculator
IFA tools

IFA tools home
FE AFI
Client Fund Profiler
Structured Products
Whitelabel Factsheets




Passive FundsNew

Passive Funds Homepage
Sectors

UK Equities
North American Equities
European Equities
Japanese Equities
Emerging Market Equities
UK Gilts
Property
Sterling Corporate Bonds
Index-Linked Gilts









Reading List




Clear all list



0


Your Basket


Aberdeen Global Indian Equity D2 GBP 





Open basket


















Login







Select Account..




Login
 Remember Me

Password Reminder
Not Registered? Click Here







Register





*

*

*



*


*

Choose a User Type
I am a financial adviser
I am a discretionary fund manager / multimanager
I am a financial paraplanner
I work in financial services
I am a private investor

*
 I accept your terms of use
 Send me FE Trustnet bulletins
Register





It's look like you're leaving us

            What would you like us to do with the funds you've selected
        
Show me all my options
        Forget them
        Save them 

            Remember my choice











        Customise this table














				Toolset

Portfolio
Multi-plotcharting
Fund ratings 
Top quartiles
Sector  performance
Indices
FE Adviser
					                fund index
WhiteLabel
					                factsheets
KIIDs 
					            download
Exchange
					                rates



















Fund Performance

IA Unit Trusts & OEICsEquity Price & PerformanceInvestment TrustsPension FundsLife FundsOffshore FundsETFsVenture Capital Trusts
















	                    You are here: 
				        

FE Trustnet


IA Unit Trusts & OEICs


Group Factsheet











Investments


Group factsheet / Guinness Asset Management Ltd

Guinness Asset Management Ltd









 RSS Feed





Group overview
Group Performance




























8 Funds Managed


RankFundFocus 

1Guinness Alternative EnergyCommodity/Energy

2Guinness Asian Equity IncomeEquity

3Guinness Best of ChinaEquity

4Guinness European Equity IncomeEquity

5Guinness Global EnergyCommodity/Energy

6Guinness Global Equity IncomeEquity

7Guinness Global InnovatorsEquity

8Guinness Global Money ManagersEquity














 








						Group details
					

						Fund types managed
					


 

						Guinness Asset Management Ltd
						14 Queen Anne's Gate,London, SW1H 9AA

www.guinnessfunds.com
info@guinnessfunds.com





 IA Unit Trusts & OEICs




 Offshore Funds
											

























Data provided by FE. Care has been taken to ensure that the information is correct, but FE neither warrants, represents nor guarantees the contents of information, nor does it accept any responsibility for errors, inaccuracies, omissions or any inconsistencies herein. Past performance does not predict future performance, it should not be the main or sole reason for making an investment decision. The value of investments and any income from them can fall as well as rise.



Login
Help
Contact Us









For Equity investors
FE Investegate
For Private investors
Trustnet Direct
For Professional investors
FE Invest
FE Analytics
FE Data feeds
FE Fund listings
For International investors
FE Trustnet Hong Kong
FE Trustnet Offshore
FE Trustnet Middle East


Quick links
Trustnet-Magazine
Investment research
FE Trustnet videos
Top rated funds
Top performing funds
Find a fund
Build a portfolio
The UK’s best fund managers
Performance charting
About us


Fund performance
IA unit trusts & OEICs
Equities
Investment trusts
Pension funds
Life funds
Offshore funds
ETFs
Venture capital trusts


Stay connected with FE Trustnet






Trustnet mobile website















LATEST :
Five reasons to keep hold of your defensive funds
13:00 | Monday, January 20, 2014






You are currently using an old browser which will not be supported by Trustnet after 31/07/2016.  To ensure you benefit from all features on the site, please update your browser.   Close 














                © Trustnet Limited 2017. All Rights Reserved.
                Please read our 
                    Terms of Use / Disclaimer and Privacy and Cookie Policy.
                Data supplied in conjunction with Thomson Financial Limited, London Stock Exchange
                Plc, StructuredRetailProducts.com and ManorPark.com
            
        



















Alternative Energy Fund - Guinness Funds














































































Terms & Conditions of this website
This website is issued in the UK by Guinness Asset Management Ltd, authorised and regulated by the Financial Conduct Authority (FCA registered company number 223077).
Guinness Asset Management provides investment products for professional and private investors, which include:

A range of long-only open-ended funds (sub-funds within an OEIC that is incorporated in Ireland and authorised and supervised by the Central Bank of Ireland, which operates under EU legislation). The Funds are approved by the Financial Conduct Authority for sale in the UK.
A discretionary-managed Enterprise Investment Scheme (EIS Service) investing in EIS-qualifying companies. The Service comprises a range of investment themes which can be accessed by investors via a sequence of dated “offerings”.

While considerable care has been taken to ensure that the information contained within this website is accurate and up to date, no warranty is given as to its accuracy or completeness, and no liability is accepted for any errors or omissions. All products referred to on this website are subject to change without notice, and we do not undertake to advise you of any changes to our views. This website should not be regarded as an invitation to buy or sell.
This Website
Please read the information on this page. It contains the legal and regulatory restrictions which apply to the use of this website and any investment in our products referred to in this website.
The information in this website has been issued and approved by Guinness Asset Management Ltd and does not in any way constitute investment, tax, legal, or other advice. If you are in any doubt about any of the information on this website, please consult your investment or other professional adviser.
Use of this website indicates your acceptance of the Terms and Conditions of this website.
This website and these Terms and Conditions may be altered and amended at any time without prior notice. Therefore, your continued use of this website indicates your acceptance of and acknowledgement of these Terms and Conditions as amended.
These Terms and Conditions were last revised in December 2013.
The information contained within this website does not constitute an offer of or an invitation to apply for securities:

In any jurisdiction where such offer or invitation is unlawful or
In which the person making such offer is not qualified to do so or
To whom it is unlawful to make such offer or solicitation.

Disclaimer and Limitation of Liability
The information contained in this site has been compiled with considerable care to ensure its accuracy at the date of publication. But no representation or warranty, express or implied, is made to its accuracy or completeness. Any research or analysis contained in this website has been procured by Guinness Asset Management Limited for its own use. It is provided to you only incidentally, and any opinions expressed are subject to change without notice.
We make no representations, warranties or undertakings about the information contained within the website. In addition, we make no such representations, warranties or undertaking about any website to which ours is linked and therefore you leave our website at your own risk.
You should note that there may be occasions during which our website becomes unavailable, through no fault of our own. There may indeed be occasions where we take our website offline in order to enhance and update it.
Due to the nature of the internet itself, we make no representations, warranties or undertakings as to the accuracy of the content of our website or as to whether any information you download is virus or error free.
We cannot accept any liability for any damages whatsoever arising to you as a result of your use of our website.
The information has been issued and approved by Guinness Asset Management Ltd and does not in any way constitute investment, tax, legal or other advice. If you are in any doubt about any of the information on this website, please consult your investment or other professional adviser.
Guinness Asset Management Funds PLC
An umbrella-type OEIC containing the Guinness range of long-only, open ended equity funds
Guinness Asset Management Funds PLC (the “Company”) is an umbrella-type open-ended investment company (OEIC), incorporated in Ireland and authorised and supervised by the Central Bank of Ireland, which operates under EU legislation. The Company’s sub-funds comprise the Guinness range of long-only, open ended equity funds (the “Funds”) as follows:

Guinness Alternative Energy Fund
Guinness China & Hong Kong Fund
Guinness Global Energy Fund
Guinness Global Equity Income Fund
Guinness Global Money Managers Fund

The Funds are approved by the Financial Conduct Authority for sale in the UK. The Company and the Funds have been recognised in the UK by the FCA pursuant to section 264 of the Financial Services and Markets Act 2000. Guinness Asset Management Ltd is authorised and regulated by the Financial Conduct Authority (FCA registered company number 223077).
The Funds are not offered for sale to Retail Clients in countries where the Funds are not registered for sale, or in any country or jurisdiction in which an offer is not permitted under applicable law. THESE INVESTMENTS ARE NOT FOR SALE TO U.S. PERSONS.
The Funds’ full documentation contains more complete and detailed information of risk, fees, charges and expenses that are to be borne by an investor. The documentation should be read carefully before investing. The full documentation needed to make an investment, including the Prospectus, the KIID and the Application Form are available, free of charge, from:



 


The Manager
Capita Financial Managers (Ireland) Limited
2 Grand Canal Square, Grand Canal Harbour, Dublin 2, Ireland



The Promoter and
Investment Manager
 Guinness Asset Management Ltd
14 Queen Anne’s Gate, London SW1H 9AA



Documentation is also available from this website, guinnessfunds.com. The content and documents on this website should not be distributed to Retail Clients who are resident in countries where the Funds are not registered for sale or in any other circumstances where their distribution is not authorised or is unlawful.
The prospectus for Switzerland, the KIID for Switzerland, the articles of association, the annual and semi-annual reports, as well as the list of the buying and selling transactions can be obtained free of charge from the representative in Switzerland:
Carnegie Fund Services S.A.
11, rue du Général-Dufour, 1204 Geneva, Switzerland
Tel. +41 22 705 11 77, Fax: + 41 22 705 11 79, www.carnegie-fund-services.ch
The paying agent is Banque Cantonale de Genève, 17 Quai de l’Ile, 1204 Geneva, Switzerland.
Fund risk factors
All the Guinness Funds are open ended, long-only equity funds. Investors should be willing and able to assume the risks of equity investing. Investment in the Funds carries with it a degree of risk and investors should read the risk factors section in the prospectus before investing. The value of the Funds’ portfolios changes daily in accordance with the movement of underlying capital markets and the specific share price movements of the companies in whose shares each Fund invests.
Past performance is not a guide to future performance.
Performance risks
We identify the following performance risks in our Funds:



 

Market risk
The value of investments and the income from them may go down as well as up and are not guaranteed. An investor may not get back the amount originally invested. The value of an investment can be affected by changes in general market conditions, other political, social and economic developments, as well as specific matters relating to the companies in whose securities each Fund invests.


Currency risk
 Changes in the rates of exchange may cause the value of investments to go up or down.
While the Funds have share classes priced in various currencies, the base currency of all the Funds is US Dollars, and the Fund valuations for all share classes are initially calculated each dealing day in US Dollars. Non-US Dollar share classes are then converted into their respective currencies from the US Dollar valuation.
The Funds invest internationally and hold all investments in local currency. Guinness Asset Management does not conduct any hedging of currency exposure on the Funds’ capital value or income. The Funds aim to be fully invested most of the time, but any cash balances are normally held in US dollars. This means that the exposure of the Funds to any one currency is mainly limited to the value of its holdings in stocks priced in that currency. Therefore, as well as the impact of share price movements in the securities each Fund holds, the capital value of an investment in a Fund will be affected by changes in exchange rates between the stocks’ local currency, the Fund’s base currency (USD) and the currency of the Fund share class you own.


Emerging market risk
The risk inherent in a Fund is higher when it is invested in markets which may be considered ’emerging’. These Funds are only suitable for those investors who are prepared to accept the above average volatility inherent in emerging market investment.




There are other risks of investing in our funds, such as credit and counterparty risks, which are detailed in the Prospectus.
Shareholders in Guinness Global Equity Income Fund and Guinness Global Money Managers Fund should note that all or part of the fees and expenses can be charged to the capital of the Funds. Charging fees and expenses to capital has the effect of lowering the capital value of your investment.
Fund specific risks
In addition some funds carry their own specific risks:






Sector risk
Some funds invest only in companies involved in a single industry or a single sector of the market. These funds are very susceptible to the performance of that one industry or sector, and can be volatile. Examples in the Guinness fund range include:

Guinness Alternative Energy Fund
Guinness Global Energy Fund
Guinness Global Money Managers Fund




Geographic risk
Some funds invest only in stocks listed in or exposed to one single country or region. These funds are very susceptible to the performance of that one country or region, and can be volatile. Examples in the Guinness fund range include:

Guinness China & Hong Kong Fund





For more detail on the risks relating to specific products, please refer to the relevant documentation for that product.
Guinness EIS Service
An Enterprise Investment Scheme (EIS) is a government initiative to encourage investment in smaller, higher-risk companies by offering a range of tax reliefs to investors. EIS-qualifying companies can be unlisted smaller companies (companies whose shares are not quoted on any recognised stock exchange), or companies listed on the Alternative Investment Market (AIM).
The Guinness EIS Service is a discretionary managed service investing in EIS qualifying companies and managed by Guinness Asset Management Ltd, the Investment Manager. The Service comprises a range of investment themes which can be accessed by investors via a sequence of dated “offerings”. Each offering has a finite subscription period, with an opening and closing date for subscriptions. To qualify for the full range of tax benefits of an EIS investment, investors should be prepared to hold their investment for a minimum of three years. Each offering has its own Information Memorandum detailing the terms and conditions, specific risks and tax implications of investment.
The range of investment themes in the Guinness EIS Service include AIM-listed companies and Sustainable Energy companies.
An investment in the Guinness EIS Service is subject to a number of risks, both general and specific to each offering within the Service. Before making any decision to invest, prospective investors need to understand that investing in EIS-qualifying companies can be highly speculative and carries high risk. The Information Memorandum for each offering contains details of the risks involved. Investors should consider carefully whether a subscription is suitable for them in the light of the information in the Information Memorandum and their personal circumstances. Before investing, investors are strongly recommended to consult an authorised financial adviser. We recommend you seek appropriate independent advice before investing.
Past performance of the Investment Manager is no guarantee of future performance. The value of an investment in any investee company may go down as well as up and investors may not get back the full amount invested. The Investment Manager will rely on achieving an exit for the investments made in each offering in order to generate a capital gain for investors. There is no guarantee that exits will be available at the prices anticipated by the Investment Manager.
General EIS investment risks
1. Concentration risk
The Investment Manager may be unable to make sufficient investments in suitable investee companies. If sufficient investments are not made, the returns achieved by the Service could be materially impacted.
The Investment Manager intends to invest across a portfolio of investee companies to diversify exposure to any one company. However, there is a risk that the investments are concentrated or there is a weighting towards one or more sectors. In these circumstances returns to investors may be adversely affected by the underperformance of a particular company or sector.
2. Size and liquidity risk
The Guinness EIS Service invests in companies that are relatively small. Smaller investee companies can be vulnerable to government actions and changes in statute. In particular, there may be changes to the EIS legislation which may affect investors’ tax positions.
Investee companies may be reliant on the skills or knowledge of a small number of individuals, and should a key individual leave performance may be adversely affected.
Some companies’ shares in which the Investment Manager invests will be listed on AIM, other companies will be unlisted.
Listed shares
Although some companies’ shares in which the Guinness EIS Service can invest are listed on AIM, not all shares are readily realisable at all times.
Investment in shares traded on AIM involves a higher degree of risk, and such shares may be less liquid, than shares in companies which are listed on the main market of the London Stock Exchange. The rules governing AIM companies are less demanding than those of companies listed on the main market of the London Stock Exchange.
The market price of AIM-listed shares may not necessarily reflect their underlying value.
The share price of AIM-listed companies can be highly volatile and shareholdings can be illiquid. The price at which AIM-listed shares are quoted and the price at which such shares may realise will be influenced by a large number of factors, some specific to the relevant investee company and its operations, and others which may affect AIM-listed companies generally, such as legislative changes, and general economic, political, regulatory or social conditions.
Some AIM-listed companies are majority owned by connected parties who may be in a position to exert influence on the relevant investee company and their interests may differ from other shareholders.
Unlisted shares
Some offerings in the Guinness EIS Service can invest in companies which are not expected to have a listing or quotation. Therefore, there may not be a recognised or active market for the shares of investee companies and it may be difficult to sell or realise the investment or obtain reliable information about their value. Investors should not consider investing money in an offering which can hold shares in unlisted companies if their investment may be required during the life of the offering, which is normally at least three years.
Investors should not consider subscribing unless they can afford a total loss of their subscription.
Minority holdings in unquoted investments may be difficult to protect and difficult to realise. The timing of realisations of investments by the Service cannot therefore be predicted.
3. Tax risks
The tax reliefs referred to in the Information Memorandum for each offering in the Guinness EIS Service are those currently applicable. However, investors should be aware that tax reliefs can change. Their applicability and value will depend upon the individual circumstances of a given investor, and investors should seek their own independent professional advice on their particular tax situation and the application of such tax reliefs prior to making a subscription in the Service.
It is the intention of the Investment Manager to invest in companies which qualify under the EIS legislation, but there is no guarantee that EIS status can be maintained throughout the life of the Investment. Both investee companies and investors need to comply with the requirements of the EIS legislation in order to maintain EIS Income Tax Relief, CGT free disposal and CGT Deferral Relief, and non-compliance may result in the loss or partial claw-back of EIS Income Tax Relief and CGT Deferral Relief, and potential interest penalties. Subscription funds will not be returned in these instances; investments will be exited as deemed appropriate by the Investment Manager.
Shares in companies which qualify under the EIS legislation will normally qualify for Business Property Relief for Inheritance Tax purposes. In order to secure this relief investors must retain their shareholding in an investee company for a minimum of two years. The Investment Manager intends to invest in companies which qualify for EIS Relief, CGT Deferral Relief and Business Property Relief, although there is a possibility that investments will not qualify for one or more of these.
To qualify for the full range of tax benefits of an EIS investment, it is the intention of the Investment Manager that investments in qualifying companies will be held for three years. However, the Investment Manager reserves the right to realise individual investments before three years if it believes it is in the best interests of investors.
Specific EIS risks
Additional risks and uncertainties apply to each offering in the Service and the companies in which it invests. These specific risks may have an adverse effect on the business of the investee companies. Investors should consider carefully whether a subscription to the Service is suitable for them in the light of the information in the relevant Information Memorandum, and their personal circumstances.
Data Protection Notice
Any information with which you provide us will be used by Guinness Asset Management Limited and its subsidiaries. We may collect personal information from you during your use of our website.
In order to advise you of our products and services, we may collect personal data from you and we may process that data. You have the right to get a copy of the information we hold about you by sending a written request to Guinness Asset Management Ltd; you may be required to supply a valid means of identification as a security precaution to assist us in preventing the unauthorised disclosure of your personal information. You are also entitled to have Guinness Asset Management modify or delete any information that you believe is incorrect or out of date.
Guinness Asset Management Ltd is registered under the Data Protection Act 1998 and complies with the Act in all our dealing with your personal data.
Copyright
This website and the information contained within it is protected by copyright. Reproduction of all or any part of this website, or any information contained within it, is prohibited unless this is required for personal use
Cookies Policy
Below is our policy for use of cookies on this website.
Cookies Introduction
This website uses cookies (as almost all websites do) to help provide you with the best experience we can. Cookies are small text files that are placed on your computer or mobile when you browse websites.
Our cookies help:

make our website work as you’d expect;
remember your settings during and between visits;
improve the security/speed of the site;

We do not use cookies to:

collect any personal identifiable information (without your express permission);
collect any sensitive information (without your express permission);
pass personally identifiable data to third parties;
pay sales commissions.

You can learn more about all the cookies we use below.
Allowing us to use cookies
Users are notified of the use of cookies when they enter our site, along with instructions on how to disable cookies in their web browser. If the settings on your software that you are using to view this website (your browser) are adjusted to accept cookies, we take this, and your continued use of our website, to mean that this is acceptable to you.
Turning cookies off
Most modern browsers allow you to control your cookie settings. You can disable them completely by editing your browser settings. However, in doing this you may be limiting the functionality that is displayed on our website and also a large population of websites on the Internet that use cookies to serve their content.
To learn how to disable cookies on browsers please click here.
Our use of cookies
Our website stores an anonymous cookie for a period of 30 days to remember that a user, when revisiting the site, has accepted these Terms and Conditions, including notice of our use of cookies.
We use traffic log cookies to identify which pages are being used. This helps us analyse data about web page traffic and improve our website in order to tailor it to customer needs. We only use this information for statistical analysis purposes; the data is then removed from the system.
Website function cookies

Our own cookies
We use cookies to help make our website work by tracking anonymous visits to the website for statistical purposes.

Anonymous visitor statistics cookies
We use cookies to compile anonymous visitor statistics such as how many people have visited our website, what type of technology they are using (e.g Mac or Windows, which help to identify when our site isn’t working as it should for particular technologies), how long they spend on the site, what page they look at etc. This helps us to continuously improve our website.


We also use analytic programmes that tell us, for example, and on an anonymous basis, how people reached this site (e.g. from a search engine). 
To learn how to disable Google Analytics, click here.
Google Maps
We use Google Maps to give users the opportunity of visiting our business location. Google Maps only uses cookies to enable you to use the functionality of their map software. No personal information is stored on our website through the use of Google Maps.
If you are concerned about cookies tracking your movements on the Internet then you may be concerned about spyware. Spyware is the name given to a particular band of cookies that track personal information about you. There are many anti-spyware programmes that you can use to prevent this from happening. To learn more about anti-spyware software, click here.
Guinness Asset Management
Guinness Asset Management Ltd is authorised and regulated by the Financial Conduct Authority.
Registered address: 14 Queen Anne’s Gate, London SW1H 9AA
Company registration: 4647882
FCA company registration number: 223077
If you would like further information on the Financial Conduct Authority, our regulator, you can access their website here: www.fca.org.uk
Telephone calls
For your protection, telephone calls to Guinness Asset Management may be recorded.


This site uses cookies. By continuing to the site you agree to the use of cookies. You can disable cookies in your browser. To find out more click here.
By continuing to this website you accept the Terms & Conditions of the use of this site. 







Home
About us
News & Views
Literature
Funds

Global Equity Income Fund
European Equity Income Fund
Asian Equity Income Fund
Global Innovators Fund
Global Energy Fund
Alternative Energy Fund
Global Money Managers Fund
Sustainable Infrastructure EIS – Introduction
Guinness AIM EIS – Introduction


Careers
Events
 









 



















 









 



  



 


 



HomeAbout usNews & ViewsLiteratureFunds Global Equity Income Fund European Equity Income Fund Asian Equity Income Fund Global Innovators Fund Global Energy Fund Alternative Energy Fund Global Money Managers Fund Sustainable Infrastructure EIS – Introduction Guinness AIM EIS – IntroductionCareersEvents




  

 


 




 





 


Equity Income funds
Global Equity Income Fund
European Equity Income Fund
Asian Equity Income Fund

Global Growth funds
Global Innovators Fund

Specialist funds
Global Energy Fund
Alternative Energy Fund
Global Money Managers Fund

EIS & IHT Service
Guinness EIS
Guinness AIM EIS
Sustainable Infrastructure IHT

How to invest
Fund Prices
Fund Prospectus
Fund Report & Accounts
Contact Us
Register for Updates 
Follow Us on Twitter 
Follow Us on LinkedIn 

 

  



 





Guinness Alternative Energy Fund

Overview
Investment case
Performance
Literature
Fund facts





 







The Guinness Alternative Energy Fund gives investors pureplay exposure to global alternative energy markets.

The Fund is managed for capital growth and invests in companies in the solar, wind, hydro, geothermal, biofuels, biomass and energy efficiency sectors.
We believe that over the next twenty years the alternative energy sector will benefit from the combined effects of:

Improved Economics - renewable energy becoming competitive with power from fossil fuels
Valuation - alternative energy equities are undervalued due to poor energy sector sentiment, whilst fundamentals of renewables remain strong due to low cost of installation
Long-term growth – corporate, consumer and government interest due to economics underpins long-term prospects
Solutions - alternative energy offers solutions to climate change, pollution, and energy security

The Guinness Alternative Energy team has been managing alternative energy portfolios since 2006. The Fund is a long-only equity portfolio of 30 equally-weighted positions.

Normally the Fund is invested in companies with a market capitalisation over $100 million.	 	


Manager






Edward Guinness


 Managing Guinness Alternative Energy Fund since launch in 2007. 



 








Samira Rüdig-Sotomayor


 Samira is an investment analyst in the alternative energy team in London.



 




Quick links

Factsheet


Update | May '17
Quarterly update & outlook



Insight | Mar '16
Gas vs Renewables


Press | Oct '16 | Investment Week
Is now the best time to access energy stocks







 In brief: why invest in alternative energy?
 Alternative energy investment case
 Fund managers
 Investment process
 Portfolio construction & risk controls

In brief: why invest in alternative energy?
Alternative energy is competitiveA number of alternative energy technologies are now at a price point where they are already competitive with fossil fuel energy – and alternative energy technologies continue to become cheaper. Value opportunityMany stocks in the alternative energy sector are trading at a discount to broad market multiples. The Guinness Alternative Energy Fund can select from a range of stocks with multiples of today’s assets, earnings and revenues that do not reflect the high growth potential of these companies. 
In addition, companies in the alternative energy sector are often undervalued due to weak energy sector sentiment. The correlation in performance with the conventional energy sector is not always warranted, creating a value opportunity.
Strong growth driversCompetitive economics of renewable energy; corporate, consumer and government interest due to favourable economics; climate change, pollution and energy security.Low current levels of alternative energy useAgainst a backdrop of ever-lower prices renewable electricity, the speed with which renewable energy can be built and increasing electricity demand from emerging economies, the potential upswing in demand from very low historic levels is an exciting prospect for alternative energy companies and their investors.Government supportGovernments continue to support renewable energy, in the form of subsidies, net metering, priority dispatch of their output and allowing renewable energy projects to compete in the same tenders as fossil fuel plants. 
Alternative energy investment case
Value opportunity – unwarranted correlation to fossil fuel pricesA number of alternative energy technologies are now at a price point where they are already competitive with fossil fuel energy – and alternative energy technologies continue to become cheaper. 

Alternative energy is competitiveAlternative energy technologies have reduced significantly in cost since 2010. Solar photovoltaic (PV) panels are now 80% cheaper than they were in 2010, translating into a cheaper electricity source than coal in many parts of the world. Wind power has also decreased in cost, though not as significantly as solar. Nevertheless, wind is one of the cheapest forms of generating electricity and beat coal in tenders for power generation in Chile and Morocco in 2015 and 2016, respectively. Unlike conventional electricity sources, solar PV plants can be built in months, providing an easily-built increase in electricity generation. 
Alternative energy continues to decrease in cost
Although alternative energy technologies have already decreased in cost significantly, the trend for solar and wind shows continued cost decreases, even if at a slower pace from before. Storage technologies – specifically batteries – are now decreasing in cost on a similar path to that which solar PV panels achieved between 2008 and 2013.  It is therefore likely that solar and wind power technologies, combined with battery storage, will become competitive in cost with fossil fuels and be able to provide power when the sun does not shine and the wind does not blow.
Interest from corporations, governments and consumers ensures long-term growth
The price volatility in the conventional energy markets – specifically the gas and power markets – has driven many companies to hedge their electricity prices by either building renewable energy plants or signing long-term contracts to buy power from renewable energy plants for a fixed price. Governments continue to support renewable energy, with increasing support coming from developing countries amid the decline in cost of wind and solar power. 
Energy security
Many countries have to import fossil fuels for their power generators, leaving them at the mercy of international energy prices and exposed to counterparty risk, particularly in developing countries. With much of the world’s fossil fuel reserves lying outside of the OECD, energy security remains a concern. From a political perspective, alternative energy is attractive as the power is then generally generated domestically and does not rely on imports. Alternative energy also reduces the exposure to fossil fuel commodity price risk that most countries face.
Climate change
The Paris agreement at the United Nations Framework Convention on Climate Change (UNFCCC) Conference of the Parties in 2015 confirmed that world leaders accept that reducing greenhouse gas emissions is necessary to avert disastrous global warming. This acknowledgement indicates longer-term support for alternative energy sources.
Pollution and health concerns
The global population is becoming increasingly urban. Local air pollution has quickly become a serious issue 

Fund Manager


Edward Guinness

Edward joined Guinness Asset Management in January 2006. He is manager of the Guinness Alternative Energy Fund and a fund manager in the Guinness EIS Team.
Prior to joining Guinness Asset Management, Edward worked from 2002 as a merger arbitrage analyst for the Arbitrage Associates Fund at the Tiedemann Investment Group in New York. In 1998 he joined HSBC Investment Bank, where he worked in the Corporate Finance Department in the Energy & Utilities Team and in the Telecoms & Technology Team. Edward graduated from the University of Cambridge with a Master’s degree in Engineering and Management Studies.
 

Investment process
Our stock selection is driven 50% by our top-down views and 50% by bottom-up stock analysis. The top-down views shape our energy sub-sector allocation, whilst bottom-up analysis is designed to identify the best stocks to populate our sub-sector allocation. The investment team applies a mixture of value and growth investing, with a bias towards value.


Key alternative energy equity sub-sectors


SolarWind


HydroelectricityBiomass


BiofuelsEnergy Efficiency


Geothermal


Top-down views
We conduct rigorous independent analysis of the fundamental drivers of alternative energy markets: energy commodity prices; alternative energy technology research and development; installation and equipment prices; political and economic support for the sector; government and private sector demand. This allows us to analyse likely demand for alternative energy equipment and services and creates our top-down view, which in turn informs our industry energy sub-sector allocation.


Guinness stock screening


QualityReturn on investment


ValuationRelative to peer group and history


EarningsAnalysts’ earnings forecast revisions


MomentumPrice movements versus peers


Bottom-up stock screening
The team operates a disciplined stock screening process. We review a universe of around 206 energy stocks each week to identify companies which look attractive on their return on investment, valuation, earnings sentiment and price momentum. Other sub-sector specific screens are also employed to generate ideas.
Stock due diligence
Stock ideas are taken from our screens. We then conduct due diligence to establish whether we have conviction to include the stock in our portfolio. The due diligence centres around detailed financial modelling.
Portfolio construction
Equally-weighted portfolio
The portfolio comprises around 30 equally-weighted positions. Our equally-weighted portfolio construction is designed to create a balance between maintaining fund concentration and managing stock-specific risk. It also imposes a structural sell discipline: an existing position must be sold to purchase a new holding. 
Sector weights
There is no benchmark adherence in the Fund’s sub-sector weights. 
Portfolio risk controls
Stock specific risk
Stock specific risk in the alternative energy sector tends to be higher than the broader market. By constructing the fund of 30 equally weighted positions, we avoid significant exposure to any one individual stock. 
Emerging market exposure
There are no limits to emerging market exposure.
Liquidity
The portfolio is liquid, with 90% of the Fund normally invested in companies with a market capitalisation over US $100 million.
Currency
The Fund is not hedged from a currency perspective.









Fund
Alternative Energy Fund
Date (period end)
30.06.2017


Clean Energy Index
Wilderhill Clean Energy Index
Fund Launch
19.12.2007


New Energy Index
Wilderhill New Energy Global Innovation Index
Basis
Total return, in USD



Please remember that past performance is not a guide to future performance. The value of an investment and the income from it can fall as well as rise as a result of market and currency movement, and you may not get back the amount originally invested.




Cumulative performance (USD, %)
				


B class
(OCF: 1.99%)
Year-to-date
1 
year
3 
years
5 
years
From 
launch


Fund
9.67
4.70
-36.12
24.93
-76.99


Clean Energy Index
18.29
14.02
-36.49
0.05
-82.47


New Energy Index
14.30
14.98
-8.93
72.86
-51.77







Annualised performance (USD, %)


B class
(OCF: 1.99%)
1 
year
3 
years
5 
years
10 
years
From 
launch


Fund
4.70
-13.86
4.55
-
-14.28


Clean Energy Index
14.02
-14.03
0.01
-14.03
-16.69


New Energy Index
14.98
-3.07
11.56
-5.56
-7.36







Calendar year performance (USD, %)
				


B class
(OCF: 1.99%)
2012
2013
2014
2015
2016


Fund
70.80
-12.05
-12.04
-15.44
9.67


Clean Energy Index
58.54
-16.93
-10.36
-22.12
18.29


New Energy Index
55.70
-2.16
1.51
-6.43
14.30







Discrete year performance to date (USD, %)
				


B Class (OCF: 1.99%)
12 months ending:
Jun-13
Jun-14
Jun-15
Jun-16
Jun-17


Fund
35.18
44.68
-20.82
-22.94
4.70


Clean Energy Index
21.83
29.31
-21.23
-29.29
14.02


New Energy Index
31.02
44.87
-7.01
-14.82
14.98




Source: Bloomberg, bid to bid basis, total return.

The Fund also has Sterling and Euro share classes available for investors.


Latest Guinness Alternative Energy Report

May '17
Quarterly update & outlook


Oct '16
Quarterly update & outlook


Aug '16
Fund update & outlook


May '16
Quarterly review & outlook


Jan '16
Quarterly review & outlook for 2016


Sep '15
Maintaining conviction in difficult times


Apr '15
Sign of continuing improvement


Jan '15
Prospects amid lower oil prices


Nov '14
Strong demand and supportive policy


Sep '14
Key drivers remain in place

 Sign up for our monthly Alternative Energy Report by email   Archive

Press

Investment Week | Oct '16
Is now the best time to access energy stocks
Samira Rüdig-Sotomayor discusses the Bull and Bear issues in the Alternative Energy sector


FT Adviser | Aug '15
 Fund review: “things could be looking up”
FT Adviser’s Philip Scott profiles Edward Guinness’s Alternative Energy Fund.


Money Week | Jul '14
How might renewables change the face of energy?
Edward Guinness joins Money Week’s panel of experts discussing how investors can profit from the growth in renewable energy.


CNBC | Jun '14
 VIDEO: How to be a winner in solar
Edward Guinness tells CNBC that solar remains a “high-growth area” and discusses how to invest in the sector.


Investment Week | Mar '14
 Alternative energy recovery only just starting
Edward Guinness says alternative energy is only just starting to recover properly from the 2008 crisis, creating opportunities for investors. 


Guardian | Feb '14
 Windfall profits for 2013’s best fund 
Patrick Collinson discusses the Fund’s power-packed returns from wind and solar investments


Blue & Green Tomorrow | Jan '14
  Meet the manager of the 2013’s best fund
This Fund delivered returns that surpassed the entire UK fund world.


Citywire Global | Dec '13
 Citywire profile: Power player returns to form
Alternatives expert Edward Guinness has been through the mill, but is now hitting a sweet spot


Seeking Alpha | Mar '13
 A roaring return in alternative energy
Edward Guinness discusses the sector with Seeking Alpha

 Archive

Webcasts

Jul '17
Performance and Portfolio review (Q3, 2017)

Apr '17
Performance and Portfolio review (Q2, 2017)

Jan '17
Performance and Portfolio review (Q1, 2017)

Oct '16
Performance and Portfolio review

Jul '16
Performance and Portfolio review
 Archive

Insights

Mar '16
Gas vs Renewables
Edward Guinness and Samira Rudig discuss the effect of low fossil fuel prices on renewable technologies


Mar '14
Prospects for Alternative Energy
Edward Guinness discusses performance and prospects for alternative energy investing

 Archive


Key documents

Factsheet
English | French
German | Italian


 KIIDs


Report & Accounts


Prospectus
Alternative Energy Fund Supplement
UK Country Supplement


Application form


Redemption form


Key documents for overseas investors on fundinfo.com
 For German investors
 For Swiss investors






Fact sheets


For information on the Fund’s current investments, please see the latest fact sheet:
English
French
German
Italian






Key facts


Launch date
19/12/2007
Pricing
Daily, forwards


Fund managers
(start date)
Edward Guinness (19/12/2007)
Valuation
2300 Dublin time


Benchmark
Wilderhill Clean Energy Index;
Wilderhill New Energy Global Innovation Index

Deal cut off time
1500 Dublin time


IA sector
IA Global
Year end
31 December


Structure
OEIC (UCITS)
Administrator
Capita Financial Administrators (Ireland) Ltd


Domicile
Ireland
Custodian
JP Morgan Bank (Ireland) plc


Underlying currency
US Dollar
UK Reporting Fund status
Yes


Redemption fee
2% within 30 days of purchase
ISA Eligible
Yes






Share classes



1.24% OCF
1.49% OCF
1.99% OCF


Currency
USD
GBP
USD
EUR
USD
GBP
EUR


Accumulation or Distribution
Acc
Acc
Acc
Acc
Acc
Acc
Acc


Name
E
X
A
D
B
C
C EUR Acc


Initial charge
0%
0%
0%
0%
2%
5%
5%


OCF*
(Total ongoing charges p.a.)
1.24%
1.24%
1.49%
1.49%
1.99%
1.99%
1.99%


Minimum direct investment
$10,000,000
£5,000,000
$200,000
€ 100,000
$1,000
£1,000
€ 1,000


Minimum platform investment Guinness Asset Management minimums do not apply. Platforms apply their own minimum investment levels. 


ISIN Code
IE00B3CCJ856
IE00B7LWDH14
IE00B2PGVJ29
IE00B3CCJ740
IE00B2PGVK34
IE00B3CCJ633
IE00BGHQF417


SEDOL
B3CCJ85
B7LWDH1
B2PGVJ2
B3CCJ74
B2PGVK3
B3CCJ63
BGHQF41


Bloomberg ticker
GUINAEE ID
GUINAEX ID
GUINAEA ID
GUINAED ID
GUINAEB ID
GUINAEC ID
GUINECE ID


Country registrations UK, CH, LUX, FIN, SGP	



*OCF = Ongoing Charges Figure, which includes the annual management charge.


Country codes

UK United Kingdom
CH Switzerland
LUX Luxembourg
FIN Finland
SGP Singapore (professional only)
GER Germany
FR France




  

 


 


























